OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  NATIONAL  FOOTBALL 

LEAGUE  (NFL)  RETIREMENT  SYSTEM 

S.  HRG.  110–1177 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  18,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

76–327 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 18, 2007  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

England Patriots, Denver Broncos, New York Jets 

Bain,  Bill,  Former  NFL  Player,  Los  Angeles  Rams,  Green  Bay  Packers,  New 
..........................................
Boyd, Brent, Former NFL Player, Minnesota Vikings  .........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Ditka, Mike, Member, NFL Hall of Fame; Former NFL Player, Chicago Bears, 
Philadelphia  Eagles,  Dallas  Cowboys;  and  Former  Head  Coach,  Chicago 
Bears, New Orleans Saints 
.................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Duerson,  Dave  R.,  Trustee,  Bert  Bell/Pete  Rozelle  NFL  Player  Retirement 
Plan;  and  Former  NFL  Player,  Chicago  Bears,  New  York  Giants,  and 
Phoenix Cardinals  ................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Goodell, Roger, Commissioner, National Football League  ...................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Johnston,  Daryl,  Sports  Broadcaster,  FOX;  and  Former  NFL  Player,  Dallas 
................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sayers,  Gale  Eugene,  Member,  NFL  Hall  of  Fame;  and  Former  NFL  Player, 
Chicago Bears  .......................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Upshaw, Gene, Executive Director, National Football League Players Associa-
........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Waters, Hon. Maxine, U.S. Representative from California  ................................
Webster,  Garrett,  Son  of  Mike  Webster,  Former  NFL  Player,  Pittsburgh 
........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Steelers and Kansas City Chiefs 

Cowboys 

tion 

APPENDIX 

Joint  response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller 
IV to the National Football League (NFL) and the National Football League 
Players Association (NFLPA)  ..............................................................................
Supplementary  information  provided  by  Eugene  ‘‘Mercury’’  Morris,  Former 
NFL Player, Miami Dolphins and San Diego Chargers  ....................................
Combined  response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Trent  Lott  and 
Hon. David Vitter to Roger Goodell  ....................................................................

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

Page 
1 
1 
2 
39 
37 
39 
82 
40 
40 

17 
23 
28 

68 
69 

12 
15 
62 
64 

6 
8 

71 
72 

42 
45 
3 

19 
21 

89 

85 

95 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  NATIONAL  FOOTBALL 

LEAGUE  (NFL)  RETIREMENT  SYSTEM 

TUESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  18,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:05  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  call  the  hearing  to  order.  This  is  a  hearing 
of the Senate Commerce Committee, a full committee hearing. I am 
chairman  of  the  Subcommittee  dealing  with  interstate  commerce, 
trade,  tourism,  and  sports.  We  will  be  joined  by  other  colleagues, 
but I want to start on time, because we have a series of votes that 
begin shortly after 12 o’clock today, and I do want to begin on time. 
I  should  say,  at  the  start,  that  I  am  a  football  fan.  I  watched 
Monday  Night  Football  last  evening.  Football  is  an  unbelievably 
popular sport, very interesting and wonderful sport in many ways. 
It is also big business. I call it ‘‘sport,’’ it is also big business, with 
mostly  wealthy  owners  and  players  that  are  paid  a  great  deal  of 
money.  There  are,  I  believe,  32  teams.  They  are  able  to  work  with 
and  speak  with  each  other  because  of  an  antitrust  exemption. 
Those 32 teams, of course, do not include teams from North Dakota 
or  Wyoming  or  states  similar  to  that.  We  reserve  these  national 
pastimes  for  the  large  population  centers,  and  many  states  do  not 
participate personally in them by having professional sports teams, 
and that’s certainly the case with my state. 

It  is  a  sport,  the  sport  of  football,  that  causes,  and  can  cause, 
substantial  physical  injury  to  many  athletes.  We  have  about  8,000 
former  players  of  this  sport.  There  is,  and  has  been,  controversy 
about  disability  issues,  how  former  players  have  been  treated. 
Those who have formerly played this professional sport believe that 
about  3  or  4  percent  of  the  living  retirees  qualify  for  some  type  of 
disability  benefit.  The  National  Football  League  owners  and  the 
Players  Association  say  that  is  much  higher  than  the  3  or  4  per-
cent. 

It  seems  to  me  that  the  Players  Association  represents  active 
players,  and  the  Commissioner  represents  the  owners.  We  have 
many  who  will  testify  here  who  are  former  players  in  this  sport, 
and  I  don’t  quite  know  who  represents  them,  if  anyone.  In  many 
cases,  they  are  great  athletes  who  ended  their  careers  with  real 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

2 

damage  to  their  bodies.  Some  live  in  pain.  And  the  question  is, 
what  happens  to  them?  Who  represents  them?  What  role  do  they 
have  with  respect  to  this  growing  industry  and  the  resources  that 
this  growing  industry  provides?  It’s  a  very  large  and  a  very  profit-
able  industry,  and,  it  seems  to  me,  an  industry  that  ought  to  be 
able  to  take  care  of  the  needs  of  those  who  helped  build  this  won-
derful sport. 

When  we  called  this  hearing,  I  did  not  know  what  to  expect,  in 
terms  of  communications.  I  must  tell  you,  I  have  received,  as 
Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee—and  I’m  chairing  the  full  com-
mittee at the request of Senator Inouye—I must tell you, I have re-
ceived  a  lot  of  mail,  a  lot  of  letters  from  former  football  players, 
and was surprised by that, and surprised by the message. I’ve had 
a chance to meet with people who feel strongly on both sides of the 
issue of the controversy over disability payments, and it is a worth-
while subject for us to discuss what has happened, how it has hap-
pened,  what  might  be  considered.  And  some  would  say,  Well,  why 
is  it  any  business  of  the  United  States  Congress?  Obviously,  we 
have,  in  the  jurisdiction  of  this  committee,  sports.  I’ve  been  in-
volved  in  sports  issues,  with  Senator  McCain  and  others,  dealing 
with  the  subject  of  boxing.  Boxing  is  a  sport  in  which  too  many 
young boxers are used up by promoters, and discarded, and end up 
with nothing. And so, we’ve attempted to create a National Boxing 
Commission. And, with respect to football, there is an antitrust ex-
emption  that  allows  the  teams  to  work  together  and  to  negotiate 
various things together. So, there is a reason for us to be interested 
and concerned, and that’s the purpose of this hearing. 

I’m  going  to  call  on  Congresswoman  Maxine  Waters,  who  has 
asked to testify today, and we appreciate having her here. I’ll take 
her  testimony  first.  I  don’t  expect  we  will  ask  questions,  but  we’re 
happy  to  have  her  here.  And  then  we  will  have  two  panels,  and  I 
will talk about the panels in a moment. But let me introduce Sen-
ator Hutchison for an opening comment. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator HUTCHISON. Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman. I really ap-
preciate  the  opportunity  to  be  at  this  hearing.  I  want  to  thank 
Chairman  Inouye,  as  well  as  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and,  of 
course, Mr. Chairman Dorgan. 

And  I  think  you  have  laid  it  out  very  well.  We  know  that  there 
are  players,  before  the  era  of  the  mega-salaries  especially,  who 
have had injuries that have manifested after the 5-year time period 
in  which  they  have  full  coverage.  And  so,  we  read  about  these 
things, and it does raise questions. And my hope is that, with this 
hearing,  we  will  hear  some  of  the  issues  on  both  sides,  and  then, 
hopefully, the NFL will be able to work it out with a good, fair ne-
gotiation  with  the  players  and  the  former  players,  with  everyone 
represented  from  their  different  perspectives,  because  I  do  think 
that  perspectives  are  different,  depending  on  the  era  in  which  a 
player  was  able  to  play.  And  I  also  think  that  your  reference  to 
boxing is one that does provide somewhat of a model, because this 
is a high-risk sport, there is no question about it, and so, we know 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

3 

that  probably  extra  care  on  the  medical  side  is  something  that  is 
certainly warranted. 

However,  I  do  hope  that  this  can  be  settled  in  an  amicable  way 
and  a  responsible  way  by  all  the  parties.  And,  as  we  gather  infor-
mation, maybe that will be helpful, and as we monitor those nego-
tiations. 

Let  me  just  say,  on  a  personal  note,  that  one  of  my  constituents 
is here, Daryl Johnston. I have known Daryl, from a personal level, 
because our children go to the same school, and so, I have watched 
him  and  his  wonderful  wife,  who  are  so  active  in  the  school  and 
give  back  so  much—so,  I’ve  known  him  personally,  but  know  he 
also had to retire, after 10 years with the Dallas Cowboys, because 
of neck injuries, and has had a view on this that I think is worthy 
for  us  to  hear.  He  is  a  person—Daryl  ‘‘Moose’’  Johnston—who 
played  for  Syracuse—he  was  an  All  American  there—then  earned 
his  bachelor’s  degree  in  economics,  and  is  a  FOX  Sports  NFL 
broadcaster  now,  has  a  great  career.  And  I  really  am  very  pleased 
that  he  could  become  a  part  of  the  panel,  and  I  thank  the  Chair-
man for allowing that to happen. 

And,  with  that,  I  will  listen  to  the  testimony.  I  do  have  to  leave 
a little earlier than the end of the hearing, so I will say that ahead 
of time, but look forward to having all of the testimony in writing. 

Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator, thank you very much. 
First, we will hear from Congresswoman Waters. 
Thank you very much for being with us. You may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MAXINE WATERS, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM CALIFORNIA 

Representative  WATERS.  Thank  you  very  much.  Good  morning, 

ladies and gentlemen—— 

Senator DORGAN. Is the microphone turned on? 
Ms. WATERS. Can you hear me now? Yes? Good morning. 
I’d like to thank you, Chairman Dorgan, for holding this hearing. 
And  I’d  like  to  thank  you,  Senator  Hutchison,  for  being  here  this 
morning. And I’d like to thank all of the witnesses who have come 
today  to  help  shed  some  light  on  many  of  the  concerns  that  have 
been identified by former players. 

The  National  Football  League’s  current  system  of  compensation 
for  its  disabled  retirees  is  an  issue  that  has  been  widely  discussed 
in Congress and the media. This issue also has great personal sig-
nificance  for  me.  My  husband,  Sidney  Williams,  played  football  in 
the NFL for 5 years. The NFL, we believe, has failed to fairly com-
pensate  its  retired  players  for  injuries  suffered  while  playing  a 
game  that  is  one  of  the  hallmarks  of  our  American  sporting  tradi-
tion.  These  players  chose  professional  football  as  a  career,  dedi-
cated  themselves  to  training  and  practice,  and  worked  and  played 
hard  in  a  highly  competitive  contact  sport.  These  players  have 
given much to the NFL, and, indeed, have given their blood, sweat, 
and  tears  to  the  game  of  football.  In  return,  the  NFL  owes  much 
to  its  retired  players  that  were  injured  as  a  result  of  competing  in 
the game that Americans cherish. 

My  purpose  here  today  is  to  talk  about  a  very  specific  case  that 
I worked on for almost a year for a gentleman by the name of Jim 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

4 

Shorter.  Mr.  Shorter  was  a  friend  of  my  husband’s  and  a  former 
NFL  player.  Mr.  Shorter  died  a  horrible  death,  a  death  caused  by 
years  of  neglect  of  football-related  injuries.  These  injuries  were 
compounded  by  the  onset  of  adult  diabetes  and  a  lack  of 
healthcare.  When  he  died,  Mr.  Shorter  had  undergone  several  am-
putations,  was  blind,  had  had  a  heart  attack,  and  was  on  dialysis. 
Furthermore, Jim Shorter died a broke man, stripped of his dignity 
and  his  silver  years  by  an  unfair  and  unyielding  NFL  disabilities 
program. This program, which is built like the rest of the functions 
of the NFL, from the blood, sweat, and tears of men like Jim Short-
er, was designed, in my belief, to refuse benefits for the very play-
ers that needed them most. 

At  issue  today  are  three  components  of  the  NFL  benefit  plan: 
pensions,  disability  benefits,  and  medical  insurance.  None  of  these 
adequately  compensate  the  NFL’s  disabled  players.  Despite  their 
hard  work,  injuries,  and  playing  through  those  injuries,  the  aver-
age  payout  to  retired  professional  football  players  is  less  than 
$2,000 a month. This is striking, given that the poverty level in the 
United States is approximately $1,800 a month. Many retired foot-
ball  players  receiving  pensions  have  serious  physical  problems 
stemming from their playing days. Some have trouble walking, oth-
ers have trouble sleeping, some have undergone multiple surgeries. 
In  a  few  cases,  former  players  have  even  committed  suicide.  One 
thing is clear, nearly all need more money than is provided by their 
pensions. 

Employer compensation to the NFL’s pension plan paled in com-
parison  to  Major  League  Baseball.  Total  pension  contributions  left 
an  average  payout  of  $13,000  per  football  player  and  $36,700  per 
baseball  player.  To  make  the  picture  even  clearer  concerning  the 
disproportionate  pension  system  between  football  and  baseball 
players,  if  former  Washington  cornerback  Darrell  Green,  who 
played 20 years, decides to collect, at age 55, he would get the larg-
est  pension  in  NFL  history,  $69,660  per  year.  A  baseball  player 
with a similar career, Cal Ripkin, Jr., stands to collect, at 62, about 
$160,000. These numbers are astounding, given that football gross-
es  considerably  more  revenue  and  income  than  baseball.  The 
MLB’s  gross  income  is  approximately  $4.3  billion,  while  the  NFL’s 
gross  is  over  $7.1  billion.  Baseball  continues  to  prosper  on  less  in-
come  and  higher  expenses.  There  is  no  excuse  for  the  NFL  retire-
ment  benefits  plan  not  to  at  least  match  the  MLB’s  benefit  plan. 
The  risk  of  long-term  injuries  to  which  NFL  players  are  exposed 
are legend. For example, there are growing concerns regarding the 
frequency of concussions among NFL players. In an aggressive con-
tact sport, there are likely thousands of cases of concussions, many 
of  which  may  result  in  subsequent  disabilities.  These  retirees  do 
not receive disability payments, because they do not realize the im-
pairments  were  caused  by  head  injuries  incurred  years  earlier. 
They are oftentimes too embarrassed to come forward, and the ben-
efit  system  has  been  at  least  slow  to  recognize  this  phenomenon. 
Former  safety  Andre  Waters,  a  12-year  veteran,  recently  com-
mitted  suicide,  44.  A  study  of  Waters’  brain  tissue  revealed  a  suc-
cession  of  football-related  concussions  that  left  Waters  with  the 
brain tissue of an 85-year-old man. The physical nature of the NFL 
often  leaves  veterans  unable  to  lead  normal  lives,  and  many  rely 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

5 

on their pensions to survive. Reform of the disability benefit system 
is necessary to allow retirees to receive the compensation that they 
deserve and need for their disability. 

Under  the  NFL’s  current  medical  insurance  plan,  the  League 
provides  insurance  to  vested  players  for  5  years  after  retirement. 
However,  the  5-year  period  fails  to  account  for  the  many  injuries 
that  will  not  manifest  serious  health  effects  until  the  end  of  this 
period. Because football is an intense contact sport, football players 
face  long-term  physical  ailments  that  other  athletes  are  lucky 
enough  to  avoid.  A  2003  University  of  North  Carolina  study  found 
that  263  of  the  2,500  retired  NFL  players  said  concussions  may 
have  had  a  permanent  effect  on  their  ability  to  think  and  remem-
ber  as  they  got  older.  In  2005,  just  before  the  Super  Bowl,  the 
Pittsburgh  Tribune-Review  produced  an  investigation  on  the  num-
ber of injuries professional players suffer on the job. The investiga-
tion  found  that,  in  the  2000  through  2003  seasons,  NFL  players 
racked up 6,558 injuries. More than half the athletes were hurt an-
nually,  with  the  number  spiking  at  68  percent  in  2003  and  2004. 
During typical 4-year careers, one of every ten NFL receivers expe-
riences a concussion. On average seven professional football players 
a  week  face  potentially  life-altering  head,  spine,  or  neck  trauma. 
The  effects  of  these  players’  injuries  do  not  become  apparent  until 
many years into the future. Long-term medical insurance is needed 
to treat the professional football players’ injuries. 

As  I  mentioned  at  the  beginning  of  my  remarks,  this  issue  of— 
is of personal concern to me. My husband, Sidney Williams, was an 
NFL  player  in  the  1960s.  During  his  6  professional  years,  he 
served  as  linebacker  on  one  championship  team.  Football  is  one  of 
America’s  greatest  sports.  Our  NFL  football  players  give  their  all 
on  the  field  and  play  hard  for  the  glory  of  the  game.  The  NFL 
should  not  forget  the  contributions  of  its  former  players,  and 
should  provide  them  with  an  adequate  system  to  address  their  re-
tirement and disability benefits. 

Mr. Chairman, I have here a folder about Mr. Jim Shorter’s case. 
I worked on the case for almost a year. It started in January 1999, 
when he informed me that he had been trying to get the attention 
of  the  Association,  and  they  had  not  returned  his  calls,  they  had 
not responded. I started writing letters to them, and I wrote to ev-
erybody,  including  Mr.  Tagliabue,  Mr.  Upshaw.  And,  finally,  they 
advised  us  what  we  needed  to  do,  getting  the  health  records.  Not 
only  did  I  get  Mr.  Shorter  all  of  the  examinations  that  he  needed, 
I  went  back  into  records,  years  past,  to  get  physical  examination 
records  in  order  to  help  present  his  case.  I  wrote  letters  to  every 
member of the board. At that time, it was—— 

Senator  DORGAN.  Congresswoman  Waters,  I’m  going  to  have  to 

ask you to summarize. We have ten witnesses today. 

Representative WATERS. Thank you. Well, we wrote letters to the 
board.  We  reviewed  the  Bert  Bell  Plan.  We  discovered  that  Mr. 
Shorter  had  received  early  retirement  after  he  left  football,  having 
made very little money. Of course he took early retirement, because 
he had no funds. But, at that time, the plan said, if you take early 
retirement, no matter what your disabilities are, you can never re-
ceive disability benefits. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

6 

And  so,  these  are  the  records,  and  the  Committee  is  welcome  to 
them.  Some,  perhaps  we  can  share  with  you  at  a  later  date,  but 
I  wanted  to  share  with  you,  today,  my  personal  knowledge  about 
the inadequacies of the plan. And I thank you very much. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Congresswoman  Waters,  we  will  include—if 
you will provide us with information, we will include relevant infor-
mation in the permanent committee record. 

Senator  DORGAN.  We  appreciate  very  much  your  coming  over 

from the U.S. House today to provide testimony. 

Thank you. 
Representative WATERS. You’re welcome. And thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Thank you very much. 
Representative WATERS. You’re welcome. 
Senator DORGAN. We have two panels today, and I want to men-
tion  the  first  panel.  Let  me  introduce  members  of  the  first  panel: 
Daryl  Johnston,  who  has  been  introduced  by  my  colleague  from 
Texas,  a  FOX  Sports  announcer,  former  NFL  player,  Dallas  Cow-
boys;  Dave  Duerson,  a  player  Trustee  for  the  NFL  Player  Retire-
ment  Plan,  and  former  NFL  player  for  the  Chicago  Bears;  Brent 
Boyd,  former  NFL  player  for  the  Minnesota  Vikings;  Bill  Bain, 
former  NFL  Player  for  the  Los  Angeles  Rams;  and  Garrett  Web-
ster, the son of NFL player Mike Webster, of the Pittsburgh Steel-
ers. 

My understanding is that we have a number of other retirees in 
the room who have traveled to Washington for the hearing. I have 
the  names  of  at  least  four  of  them.  Let  me  mention  them.  If  you 
are  in  the  room,  if  you  would  just  identify  yourself:  Conrad 
Dobler—is  Conrad  Dobler  here?  Thank  you.  David  Pear,  Dwight 
Harrison,  and  Delvin  Williams.  Thank  you  for  being  here.  We  ap-
preciate your attending the hearing. 

Let  us  begin  with  this  panel,  and  let  me  call  on  you,  Mr.  John-
ston. And let me say that the entire statement that you submit will 
be  made  a  part  of  the  permanent  record.  I  would  ask  that  each  of 
you summarize your statements, if you would. 

STATEMENT OF DARYL JOHNSTON, SPORTS BROADCASTER, 

FOX; AND FORMER NFL PLAYER, DALLAS COWBOYS 

Mr.  JOHNSTON.  Thank  you,  Senator  Dorgan.  Welcome,  to  all  the 

distinguished guests. 

My  name  is  Daryl  Johnston.  I  played  11  years  in  the  NFL  for 
the  Dallas  Cowboys,  at  the  running  back  position.  My  career  was 
ended  prematurely  due  to  a  neck  injury  I  suffered  in  the  opening 
game  of  the  1999  season.  I  know,  firsthand,  the  frustration  that 
many  NFL  players  experience  when  going  through  the  disability 
process. 

The  initial  doctor  that  filed  my  claim,  and  the  doctor  who  heard 
my appeal, are designated as neutral physicians, but, in reality, are 
handpicked  doctors  by  the  NFL  Players  Association.  The  Board 
that  denied  my  claim  is  selected  by  NFL  ownership  and  the  NFL 
Players  Association.  Obviously,  this  is  a  system  that  is,  by  design, 
not interested in assisting the retired player. 

Going through this process, the frustration causes us to use such 
strong words as ‘‘fraud,’’ ‘‘corruption,’’ ‘‘cronyism.’’ And I don’t think 
that  the  NFL  Retirement  Board  understands  that  they’re  not  only 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

7 

impacting  the  player,  but  the  families  of  these  players.  Divorce  is 
high.  People  are  fighting  for  the  custody  of  their  children.  I  was 
very fortunate to play at a time when the NFL Players Association 
had  regained  some  of  their  bargaining  power  and  used  that  in  the 
1993  collective  bargaining  agreement  to  implement  some  plans  for 
current  players,  such  as  a  severance  package,  a  401(k),  a  second- 
career  savings  plan,  and  5  years  in  a  COBRA  health  plan.  But 
none  of  these  programs  benefit  players  before  1993.  Players  such 
as  Mike  Mosley,  who  played  from  1982  to  1984,  who  received  full 
disability  for  6  years,  until  a  doctor,  hired  by  the  NFL,  ruled  sed-
entary work was possible, and, without warning, withdrew his pay-
ments in 2004. Mike now lives at home with his 75-year-old moth-
er,  his  14-year-old  daughter,  and  they’re  asked  to  survive  on  his 
mother’s $306-per-month Social Security check. 

I also played in an era when player safety was emphasized. The 
artificial  surfaces  that  we  played  on  were  much  safer  than  those 
played  on  the  generation  previous  to  me.  A  gentleman  such  as 
Conrad  Dobler,  who  spent  his  entire  10-year  career  playing  on  an 
experimental surface, known as Astroturf, that has a direct link to 
the  multiple  knee  and  hip  replacements  he’s  had.  In  a  span  of  1 
year he had seven surgeries performed, and spent nearly 100 days 
in the hospital last year. He’s been denied disability multiple times, 
even though he has been deemed to be 90 percent disabled. 

During  my  career,  there  was  also  raised  awareness  about  the 
concussion  issue  and  it’s  impact  on  NFL  players.  Stricter  protocols 
were put into place, with—about when a player could return to the 
field  of  play,  and,  also  a  whistleblower  policy  was  implemented  to 
make  sure  that  these  protocols  were  upheld  within  organizations. 
This  type  of  policy  would  have  benefited  Garrett  Webster’s  father, 
Mike  Webster,  who,  if  not  the  best,  one  of  the  best  centers  to  ever 
pay  in  the  NFL.  Upon  retirement,  he  was  impacted  by  dementia, 
was  homeless,  living  out  of  his  car,  and  never  received  a  dime  of 
disability from the NFL plan. 

The  NFL  Players  Association  is  trying  to  make  amends.  In  the 
most  recent  CBA,  they  did  create  a  program,  that  they  are  imple-
menting  the  ‘‘88  Plan,’’  named  for  Baltimore  Colts  tight  end  John 
Mackey.  The  88  Plan  provides  $88,000  a  year  for  residential  care 
facility  or  $54,000  a  year  for  home  care,  for  players  suffering  from 
dementia,  early  onset  Alzheimer’s,  as  John  Mackey  himself  is. 
However,  this  is  administered  as  a  reimbursement  plan.  Kay  Mor-
ris, who’s the wife of Bears linebacker Larry Morris, who played in 
the late 1950s and early 1960s, has yet to receive a disability pay-
ment  off  of  The  88  Plan,  although  she  has  already  incurred 
$200,000 in medical expenses. 

The reason that we have the retirees in the situation that they’re 
in  right  now  is  that  we  have  no  voice  and  we  have  no  bargaining 
power.  And  I  would  like  to  ask  the  Senate  oversight  committee  to 
help  us  find  our  voice,  to  help  us  increase  our  bargaining  power, 
so that we, the retirees, can do the same thing that the NFLPA did 
in the 1993 collective bargaining agreement for the current players. 
I also would like to request that this committee call on the Gov-
ernment  Accountability  Office  to  conduct  a  study  so  all  the  data 
can be known by all the members that will be involved in negotia-
tions  as  we  move  forward.  The  NFL,  as  has  been  mentioned,  is  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

8 

$7  billion-a-year  industry.  There  is  too  much  money  here  for  this 
problem  to  exist.  With  the  help  of  all  the  parties  involved,  Gene 
Upshaw,  Roger  Goodell,  who  will  testify  later,  Dave  Duerson,  who 
sits  to  my  left,  the  retired  players  who  are  in  this  room,  we  can 
fix this problem. The money is there to fix this problem. And there 
is  no  reason  for  our  players  to  be  in  the  situations  that  they’re  in. 
And, with your help, I hope that we can take the first steps in cre-
ating  a  disability  program  that  gives  NFL  retirees  a  voice  and  en-
sures  that  the  players  who  founded  this  league  are  no  longer  for-
gotten. 

Thank you for your time. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Johnston follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DARYL JOHNSTON, SPORTS BROADCASTER, FOX; AND 

FORMER NFL PLAYER, DALLAS COWBOYS 

Chairman  Inouye,  Subcommittee  Chairman  Dorgan,  Ranking  Member  Stevens, 
Subcommittee  Ranking  Member  DeMint,  Members  of  the  Committee  and  distin-
guished  guests,  my  name  is  Daryl  Johnston.  I  had  the  privilege  of  playing  profes-
sional football for the Dallas Cowboys for 11 years as a Running Back. I was forced 
to  discontinue  playing  when  a  neck  injury  sidelined  my  career.  I  am  here  today  to 
help implement positive change to the NFL’s existing disability system, which is in 
dire need of reform. As a member of a fairly recent generation of retirees who ended 
his  career  in  1999,  I  want  to  assure  you  that  this  problem  is  a  crucial  concern  for 
anyone who has ever played or will play professional football. 

Growing  up,  I  knew  I  always  wanted  to  play  football.  My  heroes  were  Larry 
Csonka, Rocky Blier, and Roger Staubach because of their unwavering courage and 
love of the game. They played with their hearts, they played with passion, and these 
men were my heroes. As a Pop Warner player, I always considered football a contact 
sport.  At  the  college  level,  my  coach  taught  us  football  is  not  a  contact  sport—that 
if you want a contact sport, then take ballroom dancing. Football is a collision sport. 
I  was  also  taught  the  difference  between  pain  and  injury,  which  are  quite  different 
concepts in the world of the NFL. If you are not injured, the emphasis is to get back 
out  on  the  field  and  perform  your  job.  You  play  through  the  pain—and  thus  put 
yourself  at  greater  physical  risk  for  life  after  football.  With  the  size  and  speed  of 
the players today, and with the nature of new equipment design, the collisions have 
become more violent every year. The severity of collisions was evidenced once again 
just recently when Kevin Everett with the Buffalo Bills suffered a catastrophic spi-
nal  injury.  A  career  ending  injury  is  every  player’s  worst  fear  when  he  steps  onto 
a football field. 

In  the  late  1960s  and  early  1970s,  the  players  competed  on  a  new  experimental 
surface  called  Astroturf.  Astroturf  basically  consisted  of  a  thin,  carpet-like  cushion 
between the playing surface and the concrete. NFL organizations chose to put down 
a low-maintenance, synthetic surface to allow for revenue producing events in their 
stadiums  without  regard  for  the  damaging  effects  this  hard  surface  would  have  on 
the players’ bodies. For decades, the NFLPA has knowingly misled players to believe 
that  artificial  turf  posed  no  more  threat  to  injury  than  natural  grass.  As  a  player, 
one  knows  and  experiences  firsthand  on  Monday  morning,  from  the  aches,  pains, 
bruises,  and  abrasions  that  result  from  playing  on  an  inferior  artificial  surface  the 
day  before.  And  this  type  of  surface  is  responsible  for  as  many  concussions—prob-
ably more—than the actual collisions you see on the field. 

I  recently  met  Conrad  Dobler,  a  10-year  veteran  Offensive  Lineman  for  the  St. 
Louis  Cardinals.  He  has  had  multiple  knee  and  hip  replacements  from  playing  on 
Astroturf.  He  has  had  as  many  as  seven  surgeries  in  1  year,  and  he’s  spent  nearly 
100  days  in  the  hospital  this  past  year.  He  has  been  denied  disability  benefits  nu-
merous times by the NFL Players Union, yet has been told by doctors he is severely 
disabled.  He’s  never  received  a  penny  of  disability  money  from  the  union  or  the 
league. The NFLPA has nothing in place to take care of players suffering these med-
ical  challenges  from  the  physical  abuse  of  an  NFL  career.  Another  issue  unac-
counted  for  under  the  NFLPA’s  disability  plans  are  the  degenerative  nerve  condi-
tions that result from the violent collisions associated with the game of football. As 
a  player,  you  always  believe  the  Union  will  be  there  for  you  at  the  end  of  your  ca-
reer. However, as I learned, that is not the case. The union is only obligated to rep-
resent and protect active employees—not retired players. Therefore, they only focus 
on the interest of active players. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

9 

Highly  recognizable  players  are  suffering  heart-wrenching  setbacks  and  near 
hopeless  predicaments.  Mike  Mosley,  a  receiver  for  the  Buffalo  Bills  from  1982–84, 
experienced  knee,  neck,  and  back  injuries  that  shortened  his  career  and  left  him 
permanently  disabled.  Mosley  played  20  games  in  3  seasons  as  a  wide  receiver.  He 
received full disability payments for 6 years, and then a doctor assigned by the NFL 
ruled sedentary work was possible so, in 2004, all his disability payments were im-
mediately cutoff without warning. He has lost his house, his truck, his savings, and 
his  entire  quality  of  life.  He’s  had  to  move  in  with  his  75  year  old  Mom  (living  off 
a  $306  social  security  check),  and  has  sole  custody  of  a  14  year  old  daughter  he’s 
trying to raise—for whom he cannot even buy clothes. He also has no health insur-
ance  and  cannot  afford  any  medical  care.  It  has  ruined  his  life.  In  a  medical  emer-
gency, he will no doubt become the responsibility of the state. So, much as you and 
I  send  tax  money  that  should  pay  for  our  schools  and  teachers  to  build  NFL  sta-
diums,  we  will  pay  for  Mike’s  care  someday  because  the  NFL  doesn’t  want  to  pick 
up their own check. 

Brian DeMarco, a former offensive lineman for the Jacksonville Jaguars and Cin-
cinnati  Bengals,  is  damaged  so  badly  from  his  5  years  playing  pro  football  that  he 
is  only  a  fraction  less  disabled  than  a  quadriplegic  at  age  35.  He  has  had  so  many 
injuries  that  only  people  who  have  been  in  horrendous  car  crashes  might  under-
stand—all  from  playing  America’s  favorite  sport.  DeMarco’s  career  ended  amid  se-
vere  health  problems  after  the  1999  season.  After  4  attempts  over  several  years  to 
navigate the NFL’s disability system’s red tape, he was unable to even get his appli-
cation  process  started  and  be  assigned  a  doctor  for  evaluation—even  though  his 
back  was  broken  in  17  places.  He’s  been  homeless  3  times  in  the  last  4  years,  and 
has  lived  in  storage  units  for  5  months  with  his  wife  and  2  children.  He  has  con-
stant  pain  from  his  crushed  spine,  numerous  physical  ailments,  and  is  unable  to 
hold  a  job.  This  is  a  man  who’s  given  up  his  quality  of  life  for  this  sport.  Because 
of  injuries  and  runaway  medical  bills  and  an  inability  to  work  or  get  any  kind  of 
health insurance, the once proud and well-off DeMarco was as down and out as you 
can  get  in  this  country.  The  NFL  Players  Association  has  given  him  virtually  no 
help. He has called the NFLPA over 100 times in the last year but has experienced 
no  success  in  getting  a  claim  opened.  At  one  point,  he  was  actually  told  that  he 
needed  to  help  himself  before  the  NFLPA  could  help  him  and  he  was  told  to  get 
a job and sent bus fare to search for one by an NFLPA representative. And, finally, 
whenever  he  has  had  the  temerity  to  raise  his  voice  and  discuss  his  problems  in 
public, the NFL’s and NFLPA’s representatives have branded him a fraud. 

The  urgency  and  demand  in  the  NFL  to  get  back  on  the  field  creates  a  greater 
risk. The cumulative effect of multiple surgeries throughout your career is damaging 
to the body. This toughness, a sign of the times in that NFL era in the early 1960s 
explains  why  Larry  Morris,  a  linebacker  for  the  Bears  from  1959  to  1965,  once  re-
turned  to  action  6  weeks  after  knee  surgery,  removed  a  cast  on  his  broken  thumb 
during a game and played through 4 concussions. After one such knock in the head 
during  the  1964  season,  the  NFL  encouraged  Larry  to  ignore  dizzy  spells  and  ring-
ing  in  his  ears  so  he  could  play.  Larry  is  best  known  for  being  the  most  valuable 
player  for  the  Bears  in  the  1963  NFL  Championship  game.  Larry  now  suffers  from 
dementia  at  age  73  and  cannot  be  left  unattended.  His  healthcare  expenses  have 
sapped more than $200,000. His wife of 50 years, Kay Morris is still waiting for the 
full  benefits  to  which  Larry  is  entitled  under  the  new  ‘‘88  Plan’’—named  after  the 
number  of  Baltimore  Colt  great  John  Mackey—but  the  award  to  date  is  at  a  lower 
level and administrative difficulties with that Plan have prevented her from obtain-
ing  adequate  support.  It  has  been  proven  that  almost  all  medical  claims  coming 
from  brain  trauma  due  to  concussions  are  denied  or  only  given  lesser  benefits  stat-
ing that the injuries and mental issues such as depression and early onset dementia 
cannot be proven that they are a direct result of football. (In a recent article in the 
Charlotte  Observer,  an  NFL  Plan  attorney  divulged  that  there  have  only  been  four 
such  claims  made  successfully  in  the  history  of  the  Plan—only  four  concussion 
cases!)  It  is  difficult  for  families  who  are  technologically  challenged  and  struggling 
to afford food and healthcare to navigate this bureaucratic maze. 

My own career was ended prematurely. I had five remaining years of a seven-year 
contract.  I  suffered  a  herniated  disk  at  C–6  and  C–7.  After  surgery,  I  battled  my 
way  back  onto  the  field  and  played  1  year  and  one  game.  I  herniated  a  disk  again 
at C–5 and C–6. I had an agreement with my doctor that, if this happened, I would 
retire  and  walk  away  from  the  game.  I  chose  quality  of  life  with  my  new  family 
moving forward under the impression that the union would provide financial assist-
ance in lieu of the money I left on the table with my contract. I discovered by going 
through  the  NFLPA  Disability  process  that  this  system  was  put  in  place  to  deny 
claims by former players. The only concern that they had was that I could maintain 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

10 

another job—any other job—and generate income with no regard to the injuries that 
were a direct result of playing the game of football. 

The  doctor  I  met  with  is  considered  a  neutral  physician  but,  in  reality,  he  was 
a  physician  designated  by  the  NFLPA.  I  was  not  allowed  to  bring  in  x-rays,  MRI’s, 
and the doctor could not consult with the trainers from my team or the doctor who 
performed  my  surgery.  He  denied  my  claim.  His  only  interest  was  whether  I  was 
capable  of  holding  another  job.  He  showed  little  interest  in  my  physical  condition 
and the injuries sustained from an 11 year NFL career. 

Upon  appeal,  to  another  designated  NFLPA  physician,  my  claim  was  denied  as 
I  walked  into  the  office.  He  did  not  examine  me,  nor  did  he  interview  me.  My  im-
pression  was  the  decision  was  made  long  before  I  walked  through  the  door.  I  am 
not  the  first  to  have  experienced  this  routine  treatment  of  injured  players.  When 
I talked to other colleagues about my case, their instructions to me were to just keep 
fighting and, eventually, I would be accepted. The system has no set standards that 
instill confidence and trust with any player going through the process that they will 
be granted disability benefits. 

Former NFL players are hurting physically, emotionally, and financially. There is 
a  tremendous  amount  of  pride  in  NFL  players.  We  don’t  ask  for  much  but  we  will 
beg  for  nothing.  This  system  forces  us  to  beg  for  benefits  that  we  have  earned  and 
to  which  we  are  rightfully  entitled.  The  League  needs  to  take  care  of  these  leg-
endary players who made the game of football what it is today. 

The  NFL  claims  to  have  paid  benefits  to  284  former  players—only  about  3  or  4 
percent  of  the  estimated  7,000  NFL  retirees  who  have  received  disability  payments 
(this  is  the  Plan’s  own  figure;  it  has  also  used  8,000  in  testimony  before  the  House 
of Representatives and 9,000 in public statements afterwards, but I’ll use the lower 
number to give the most flattering picture of their efforts). A meager 3 or 4 percent 
at most who have received disability payments is not nearly enough for a game that 
takes  the  unique  toll  on  human  bodies  that  football  does.  That  this  discrepancy 
should  exist  in  a  game  that  realizes  over  $7  billion  in  annual  revenue  is  a  stain 
upon  the  game’s  integrity.  The  issue  of  former  NFL  players’  needing  financial  and 
medical  assistance  is  hardly  is  a  new  one.  The  story  of  former  Pittsburgh  center 
Mike  Webster,  a  Hall  of  Fame  player,  came  to  light  a  decade  ago.  Crippled  by  the 
constant  banging  during  his  career,  Webster  became  homeless.  He  applied  several 
times for disability, but was unanimously turned down each and every time. He died 
of  a  heart  attack  in  2002,  and  his  family  sued  the  NFL  for  benefits  the  league  had 
denied him. They won $1.5 million. 

In  recent  months  the  league  has  taken  positive  measures  to  acknowledge  those 
realities  by  implementing  ‘‘The  88  Plan’’  into  the  most  recent  labor  agreement  in 
honor  of  former  Baltimore  Colts  tight  end  John  Mackey.  Like  Morris,  Mackey  suf-
fers  from  dementia—but  on  a  more  severe  level.  The  ‘‘88  Plan’’  provides  up  to 
$88,000 a year for families to put toward a residential care facility or up to $54,000 
for home care. In the case of Kay Morris, Kay doesn’t believe a nursing home is the 
best place for her husband, and the $54,000 allotted for home care just isn’t enough 
money to pay for nursing help and necessary medical attention. This added program 
is a step in the right direction; however, it is not enough. Moreover, since the Mac-
key  Plan  is  administered  as  a  reimbursement  plan,  many  qualifying  players  do  not 
have the front money to participate and obtain care. 

To protect their economic interests, the NFL and the current players’ union have 
allowed  the  Plan’s  procedures  to  become  an  obstacle  course  for  former  players  in 
order to prevent them from getting benefits. They have not published or prescribed 
rules or standards for the determination of benefit eligibility. There are documented 
cases, such as Brent Boyd’s, in which the Plan has disregarded the medical opinions 
of  its  own  ‘‘Plan  Approved’’  doctors  when  the  Board  does  not  want  to  pay  benefits. 
In  order  to  minimize  the  amount  owners  must  pay,  the  Board  denies  many  former 
players’  claims.  This  is  an  inherent  conflict  of  interest  that  favors  the  owners  and 
active players and has led to tragic results for many severely disabled NFL retirees. 
The Retirement Board created a 42-month limit on retroactive disability amounts 
for  retired  players,  which  is  not  only  against  the  retired  player’s  best  interests  but 
also  a  direct  violation  of  the  ERISA  law.  The  imposition  of  a  limitation  on  the 
amount a player is able to recover reduces the accrued benefit. Degenerative condi-
tions  do  not  always  show  up  within  42  months.  Therefore,  this  makes  applying  for 
this benefit impossible due to the time limitation. 

The  NFL  Retirement  Board,  not  the  NFLPA,  determines  disability  claims.  Rep-
resentatives  are  appointed  by  the  NFL  owners  and  the  NFL  Players  Association. 
There  is  no  one  on  the  board  looking  out  for  the  interests  of  former  players.  This 
six-member  board  votes  unanimously  almost  every  time.  The  Groom  law  firm  who 
established  the  pension  fund  in  the  1993  Collective  Bargaining  Agreement  also 
serves  as  counsel  to  defend  the  distribution  of  disability  payments.  They  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

11 

earned $3.15 million for defending claims in the past year—about one-sixth of what 
the Plan says it pays out in disability benefits. This is an obvious conflict of interest. 
The  emphasis  is  only  on  the  current  player.  The  players  who  built  the  NFL  have 
been left behind. 

The retired player has no voice in the current system. The salaries paid to players 
who built the NFL pale in comparison to the salaries the players receive today. The 
NFLPA,  however,  continues  to  focus  on  the  current  player  and  his  financial  sta-
bility.  In  1993,  the  Collective  Bargaining  Agreement  (CBA)  added  many  new  bene-
fits  in  addition  to  the  pension.  It  added  a  severance,  a  5  year  COBRA  Health  Plan 
after retirement, a 401k Plan, and a second career savings plan—none of which was 
retroactive  before  1993  and  there  had  been  no  changes  in  benefits  for  the  previous 
twenty-three years. 

Delvin  Williams,  who  played  8  years  as  a  running  back  in  the  NFL,  experienced 
this  firsthand.  After  8  years,  6  surgeries,  2  concussions,  broken  ribs,  a  dislocated 
thumb, knee and spinal injuries, as well as numerous other joint and vertebrae inju-
ries, his professional football career ended in 1981, when the Green Bay Packers re-
leased him. He was one of approximately 285 out of 7,000 retired NFL Players who 
received  degenerative  disability  benefits.  However,  it  did  not  come  without  a  fight 
and  persistence.  He  started  the  process  in  1983  and  was  awarded  a  football  degen-
erative  disability  benefit  in  July  1995—12  years  later!  In  12  years,  he  was  turned 
down twice and lost at arbitration before being awarded the disability pension ben-
efit. 

The  NFL  may  be  concerned  about  the  small  number  of  players  who  might  abuse 
the system, but in ostensibly protecting against this small problem, they are turning 
their backs on literally hundreds of players who need assistance. The NFLPA looks 
at  this  as  protecting  themselves  against  a  player,  however,  this  is  destroying  the 
family  unit  and  quality  of  life—families  are  divorcing,  players  are  losing  custody  of 
their  children,  losing  their  houses,  living  in  homeless  shelters,  etc.  There  are  lots 
of players in dire need. They were the foundation of the NFL. The league and active 
players are making millions of dollars. These former players are losing their health, 
homes, and dignity. Even the great Johnny Unitas was denied disability. 

The  retirement  plan  has  been  contorted  into  a  way  for  the  players  association  to 
aid  the  active  players.  They  have  cut  out  the  retired  players  and  diverted  this 
money  into  new  plans  for  active  players.  Major  League  Baseball,  which  draws  an-
nual  revenues  of  $4.3  billion,  pays  out  an  average  of  $36,700  in  benefits  to  its  par-
ticipating players. Compare that to the NFL, which is currently drawing $7.1 billion 
in  annual  revenues,  yet  its  average  benefit  payout  is  $13,000.  This  is  an  incredible 
injustice. 

These  disabled  football  players  helped  build  the  NFL  into  a  multi-billion  dollar 
industry that continues to grow. Many of these individuals are suffering from debili-
tating injuries, post-traumatic stress, and dementia after sacrificing their bodies and 
minds for the League—for the NFL’s success. They face mounting medical problems 
and  financial  hardships  and  the  League  must  do  more  to  assist  them.  The  league 
has  not  only  forgotten  them,  but  has  attempted  to  strangle  their  quality  of  life 
through  an  unwieldy  retirement  and  disability  benefit  system.  This  disability  plan 
is grossly inadequate for those who need it the most—the former players. 

Why am I here? I am not here to cause controversy, but to affect positive change. 
We  want  to  fix  this  issue.  As  Senators,  you  have  the  ability  to  make  a  difference 
and  the  power  to  create  change  immediately.  After  presentation  of  these  facts,  my 
hopes  are  high  that  this  situation  will  be  resolved.  There  is  an  excessive  amount 
of  money  generated  by  the  NFL—the  money  is  there  to  solve  this  problem.  This  is 
a  $7  billion  dollar  industry.  Why  is  it  not  being  funneled  into  the  right  areas  and 
why  is  it  not  being  administered  to  accomplish  what  it  was  set  up  to  do?  I  implore 
you  to  make  educated  decisions  and  take  care  of  those  retired  players—the  heroes 
that  have  made  the  game  of  football  the  number  one  spectator  sport  in  America. 
These  retired  players  are  being  denied  benefits  while  the  NFL  continues  to  profit 
off their work. These are the giants that helped build the league. 

I am asking the Senate Committee for oversight to ensure the NFLPA is working 
toward  correcting  the  problem  in  good  faith.  I  would  like  to  request  the  NFLPA  be 
fiscally  responsible  in  paying  disability  claims.  Claim  information  needs  to  be  pub-
licly  divulged  so  all  can  see  the  record  of  disability  claims  that  have  been  paid.  A 
major frustration has been the lack of openness on the part of the NFLPA to share 
the financial aspects of the Plan. The Plan completes a valuation once a year, which 
compares the assets to the liabilities for the past year. There is nothing confidential 
or  privileged  about  the  information  included  in  this  report.  If  copies  of  this  report 
for the past 5 years were made available to retired players, a huge increase in trust 
could  be  achieved.  Why  has  this  not  happened  before  now?  This  simple  request  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

12 

information should be volunteered by the NFLPA with openness as evidence of prop-
er administration of the plan. 

What  do  we  hope  to  accomplish?  Our  hope  is  to  bring  a  measure  of  fairness  to 
the relationship between the League and retired disabled football players. We would 
like  to  rework  the  structure  of  the  disability  system.  The  system  must  be  neutral 
to all parties. The framework must include a designated group of retirees from each 
decade of the NFL in order to provide a voice for forgotten players. The voices that 
need to be heard are those of retired players who are suffering medically and finan-
cially  from  the  harsh  realities  of  their  post  NFL  careers.  It  is  necessary  they  be 
voted  in  by  their  peers,  not  appointed  or  hand  picked  by  the  NFL  Committee.  The 
league  needs  to  take  a  hard  look  at  doing  more  for  veteran  players,  and  address 
the core issue of overhauling the current disability system. My goal is to help create 
a  system  that  addresses  the  needs  of  former  players  that  are  in  dire  straights  be-
cause of the injuries they suffered as a direct result of playing professional football. 
There  are  unique  circumstances  to  some  of  these  individuals  that  the  system  must 
account  for  and  take  into  consideration.  The  retired  players  from  the  previous  era 
must be provided a voice as the NFL moves forward. 

Roger  Goodell,  the  Commissioner  of  the  NFL  is  forming  its  first  alliance  to  im-
prove medical services for ailing retired players. As a form of recognition that a seri-
ous problem exists, this is a step in the right direction, but the alliance was devised 
and  announced  without  gaining  sufficient  input  from  advocates  who  have  rep-
resented the interests of retirees for years. A better negotiation process would have 
produced a better alliance. To his credit, Mr. Goodell is cleaning up the NFL regard-
ing the actions of certain contemporary players, but now he needs to restore the dig-
nity of the Players who built this league, which has been robbed from many of them 
by  the  disability  process.  According  to  the  Integrity  Clause  of  the  NFL,  ‘‘The  Com-
missioner is in charge of the integrity of the game, its management and its players.’’ 
Webster  defines  the  term  ‘‘integrity’’  as  ‘‘a  noun  . . .  [that]  means  honesty.  . . .  A 
trustworthiness  and  incorruptibility  to  the  degree  that  one  is  incapable  of  being 
false  to  an  agreement,  contract,  responsibility  or  pledge.’’  We  have  an  ethical  and 
fiduciary  responsibility  to  the  Public—the  people  who  drive  the  ‘‘engine  of  success’’ 
of the NFL. The fans and retired players are counting on the Commissioner and the 
Senate to be truthful and honest, and to make a difference in the lives of these bro-
ken  heroes  and  past  football  giants  that  made  football  the  number  one  spectator 
sport in America. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Johnson, thank you very much. 
Next,  we’ll  hear  from  Mr.  Dave  Duerson,  the  player  Trustee  for 
the  NFL  ‘Player  Retirement  Plan,  and  former  NFL  player  for  the 
Chicago Bears. 
Mr. Duerson? 

STATEMENT  OF  DAVE  R.  DUERSON,  TRUSTEE,  BERT  BELL/ 
PETE  ROZELLE  NFL  PLAYER  RETIREMENT  PLAN;  AND 
FORMER NFL PLAYER, CHICAGO BEARS, NEW YORK GIANTS, 
AND PHOENIX CARDINALS 
Mr. DUERSON. Mr. Chairman, it’s a pleasure to be here. It’s been 
quite  some  time  since  I’ve  walked  these  halls,  back  as  a  summer 
intern in 1982, for Senator Dick Lugar. So, please say hello for me 
to him. 

But,  to  you,  Chairman  and  the  members  of  the  Committee,  I’m 
David  R.  Duerson,  an  11-year  retired  NFL  veteran.  It  is  my  privi-
lege  to  serve  as  a  trustee  of  the  collectively  bargained  plans  cov-
ering NFL players. 

I  was  born  in  Muncie,  Indiana,  in  1960,  to  Julian  Arthur 
Duerson, Jr. My parents were married for 59 years, until my moth-
er’s  death,  almost  4  years  ago.  My  father  is  my  hero.  He  has  two 
Bronze  Stars  from  World  War  II,  having  fought  in  the  European 
theater, yet the medal he is most proud of is his Medal of Conduct. 
He  also  believes  that  every  male  child  should  serve  2  years  in  the 
armed  services.  My  dad  spent  38  years  with  General  Motors,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

13 

was  an  active  member  in  the  UAW.  I  stood  alongside  of  him,  as  a 
very  small  child,  on  many  picket  lines,  and  I  can  still  remember 
the  day,  in  1974,  that  we  became  a  two-car,  and  then  a  three-car, 
family. I asked my dad, ‘‘What changed?’’ And he said that GM had 
just given him the job, in 1974, that he was qualified to do in 1945, 
upon returning from the war. My dad also told me that he was not 
raising  any  average  kids.  God,  integrity,  and  education  forms  the 
foundation from which the Duerson name is built upon. 

I  attended  the  University  of  Notre  Dame  on  a  football/baseball 
scholarship, graduating in May 1983 with a BA in economics. I was 
a  4-year  starter,  two-time  All-American  captain,  Most  Valuable 
Player,  and  was  drafted  by  the  Bears  in  1983  as  the  64th  player 
overall.  I  also  graduated  from  McDonald’s  Hamburger  University 
and  Harvard  Business  School’s  Owner/Presidents  Management 
Program. 

Since retiring from the NFL, I have owned three McDonald’s res-
taurants  and  two  world-class  meat  processing  companies.  My  first 
company  ranked  as  high  as  the  44th  largest  African-American- 
owned and -operated business in the United States, with 2001 rev-
enue in excess of $63 million. 

I had an extremely blessed NFL career, which included four con-
secutive  Pro  Bowls,  two  World  Championships,  1987  NFL  Man  of 
the  Year,  and  1988  NFLPA  Humanitarian  of  the  Year.  My  service 
to  the  NFLPA  has  been  uninterrupted  since  the  end  of  my  rookie 
year, when I was voted assistant player representative, until today, 
as a trustee. I represented both the Bears and the Giants as player 
rep,  and  the  Arizona  Cardinals  as  rep,  and  as  a  member  of  the 
NFLPA  Executive  Committee.  I  was  also  a  named  plaintiff  in  the 
Federal  lawsuit  which  brought  free  agency  to  the  NFL  in  1993, 
along with Reggie White, Michael Buck, Hardy Nickerson, and Van 
McElroy. 

I personally observed Gene Upshaw and his staff take our union 
from insolvency to an organization with a for-profit wing that gen-
erates millions of dollars for the players. I also watched them take 
us  through  decertification  and  recertification  of  the  exact  same 
union, the first time in the history of organized labor that that oc-
curred.  It  was  Gene  who  coined  the  phrase,  ‘‘Past,  Present,  Fu-
ture.’’  The  focus  has  always  been  on  honoring  those  players  who 
played  before  us.  I’m  very  proud  of  the  role  my  teammates  had  in 
leading  the  strike.  The  union  meeting  to  strike  was  held  in  Chi-
cago.  I  will  never  forget  the  comment  that  our  head  coach,  Mike 
Ditka,  made  when  we  returned  to  work.  During  the  strike,  the 
league brought in replacement players. Mike kept four of those re-
placement players, and he told all of us that, ‘‘Those guys, the four 
SCAB  players,  are  the  real  Bears.’’  Mike’s  comments  furthered  my 
resolve,  which  ultimately  led  to  my  role  as  a  plaintiff  in  U.S.  Dis-
trict Court. 

Fighting  for  players’  rights  became  a  passion  for  me,  and  it’s 
even  stronger  today.  I  was  honored  when  I  received  an  invitation, 
upon  retiring  from  the  NFL,  to  become  alternate  trustee  of  the 
players’  plans,  to  serve  alongside  of  Tom  Condon,  Jeff  Van  Note, 
and the late great Len Teeuws. Each man has operated with abso-
lute integrity and with great resolve in carrying out their fiduciary 
responsibility. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

14 

Our  meetings  with  the  NFL  trustees  have  oftentimes  been  spir-
ited, and, on occasion, contentious, but always with both sides oper-
ating  within  ERISA  guidelines.  In  all  cases,  Federal  law  requires 
us  to  follow  the  terms  of  the  plan,  which  states  that  if  an  indi-
vidual is, quote, ‘‘employable,’’ he does not qualify for total and per-
manent disability. That is not an arbitrary decision being made on 
the part of the board. It is the law. 

1993 was a pivotal year in regards to player salaries and benefits 
as a result of collective bargaining in Dallas, Texas, and a new col-
lective bargaining agreement was agreed to. In that same meeting, 
the Executive Committee moved to create a pension benefit for the 
pre-’59ers,  those  men  who  played  prior  to  the  creation  of  benefits. 
We got there with Mike Kenn as President and an 11-member Ex-
ecutive  Committee,  and  a  few  strong  player  reps  who  wouldn’t 
bend. Since 1993, with every negotiation and extension, the players 
have reached back to fund increases and pass players benefits. 

Can  the  process  be  improved?  Absolutely.  Can  the  process  be 
sped up? It must be. But, remember, we are bound by Federal law 
and  the  terms  of  the  plan.  Can  more  be  placed  into  the  coffers  for 
disability benefits? Again, absolutely. But those decisions are made 
by  the  current  players,  who,  by  the  way,  are  putting  6  percent  of 
their  collectively  negotiated  package  into  total  benefits.  That’s 
$82,000  per  player  per  year,  that  comes  directly  from  additional 
salary  they  would  realize,  that’s  going  into  benefits  to  the  benefit 
of retired players. 

Gene  and  his  staff  have  done  yeomen’s  work  on  more  than  one 
occasion.  I  pay  tribute  to  all  of  those  players  who,  over  the  years, 
sacrificed  time  with  family—and,  oftentimes,  careers—to  join  in 
this fight. I can personally recall numerous men who lost their jobs 
because of their union involvement. Today, we are as close to labor 
peace  as  we’ve  ever  been,  but  the  day  is  coming  when  the  agree-
ment  will  run  out,  and  a  system  very  much  like  pre-1993  becomes 
a possibility again, with salaries being set and no free agency. I can 
uniquely relate to the players, both current and retired, as well as 
management,  since  I  had  as  many  as  252  employees.  I  paid  their 
benefits out of my pocket. And I can also relate to the players, who 
are  feeling  a  significant  financial  crunch,  as  I  lost  my  business  in 
2006  to  receivership  due  to  a  cash-flow  challenge  associated  with 
a  late  startup  after  construction.  I  won  a  Federal  lawsuit  in  Octo-
ber  2004,  for  $34.592  million,  but,  because  the  company  is  based 
in  the  Netherlands,  I  have  been  unable  to  secure  any  of  the  indi-
viduals’ assets, as of yet, but I will. It has cost me my business and 
my home, and I’m exhausting assets as I speak. But God has been 
good,  and  he  has  been  good  to  those  men  who  take  issue  with 
where they find themselves today. 

This,  Capitol  Hill,  is  not  the  proper  venue  for  this  discussion  of, 
How  do  we  improve  disability  benefits?  I  am  a  retired  player,  and 
every  man  playing  today  will  very  soon  join  our  ranks.  The  place 
for  this  discussion  is  at  the  annual  player  rep  meeting.  Retired 
players  need  to  be  there,  300  strong.  It’s  there  that  the  decisions 
are made, and it’s there that our voice will be heard, and influence 
felt. Eight men thoroughly immersed in a truly united spirit are far 
greater assets than 80 with lukewarm enthusiasm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

15 

The  game  is  better  than  it  has  ever  been,  and  the  players  are 
compensated at unprecedented levels. I didn’t realize the impact of 
it,  but  one  of  my  sons  might,  or  their  children,  when  they  have 
them.  I’m  excited  about  what  we’ve  accomplished  so  far,  and  it’s 
been a very fair life. 

I thank you. God bless you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Duerson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVE R.  DUERSON,  TRUSTEE,  BERT BELL/PETE ROZELLE 
NFL PLAYER RETIREMENT PLAN; AND FORMER NFL PLAYER, CHICAGO BEARS, NEW 
YORK GIANTS, AND PHOENIX CARDINALS 
Chairman  Dorgan  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  David  R.  Duerson,  an 
11-year  retired  NFL  Veteran.  It  is  my  privilege  to  serve  as  a  Trustee  of  the  collec-
tively bargaining plans covering NFL players. 

I  was  born  in  Muncie,  IN,  in  1960,  to  Arthur  and  Julia  Duerson,  Jr.  My  parents 
were  married  for  59  years,  until  my  mother’s  death,  of  almost  4  years.  My  father 
is my hero! He has 2 Bronze Stars from WWII, having fought in The European The-
atre,  yet  the  medal  he  is  most  proud  of  is  his  Medal  of  Conduct!  He  also  believes 
that  every  male  child  should  do  2  years  in  The  Armed  Services!  My  dad  spent  38 
years  with  General  Motors,  and  was  an  active  member  in  The  UAW.  I  stood  along 
side  of  him,  as  a  very  small  child,  on  many  picket  lines.  I  can  still  remember  the 
day, in 1974, that we became a 2-car, and then 3-car family. I asked my dad ‘‘what 
changed?’’,  and  he  said  that  GM  had  just  given  him  the  job  in  1974  that  he  was 
qualified to do in 1945, upon returning from the War. My dad also told me that he 
was not raising any ‘‘average kids!’’ He proved it to me, by taking Baseball (my best 
sport)  away  from  me  one  summer,  because  I  brought  home  less  than  acceptable 
grades!  GOD,  Integrity,  and  Education  forms  the  foundation  from  which  the 
Duerson name is built upon. 

I  attended  The  University  of  Notre  Dame  (1979–1983)  on  a  Football/Baseball 
Scholarship, graduating in May 1983 with a B.A. in Economics. I was a 4-year start-
er,  2-time  All-American,  Captain  and  MVP  of  The  Fighting  Irish,  and  was  drafted 
by The Bears in 1983, as the 64th player overall. I also graduated from McDonald’s 
Hamburger  University  in  1994,  and  am  an  Alum  of  Harvard  Business  School’s 
Owner/President/Management Program (OPM30), finishing in May 2001. 

Since retiring from NFL football in April 1994, I have been in the private sector. 
While finishing my career in Phoenix, with The Cardinals, I would play on Sunday 
and be behind a McDonald’s counter on Monday and Tuesday . . . which ultimately 
led  to  my  having  3  McDonald’s  restaurants  in  Louisville,  KY  for  6  months,  before 
moving  to  the  supply-side.  From  April  1995–December  2006  I  owned  2  world-class, 
1st-tier meat processing companies, serving internationally the likes of McDonald’s, 
Burger  King,  The  Olive  Garden,  and  Sara  Lee,  as  well  as,  The  USDA’s  National 
School  Lunch  Program  and  military  bases  throughout  The  European  Theatre,  and 
others. In 1998–99, we were the 44th largest African-American owned and operated 
company in The United States. Our 2002 revenue was in excess of $63M. 

I had an extremely blessed NFL career, which included: 4 consecutive Pro Bowls, 
All-Pro  3-times  as  a  Strong  Safety  and  once  as  a  Free  Safety,  2  World  Champion-
ships (Chicago Bears SB XX, and NY Giants SB XXV), 1987 NFL Man Of The Year 
and  1988  NFLPA  Humanitarian  Of  the  Year.  My  service  to  The  NFLPA  has  been 
uninterrupted,  since  the  end  of  my  rookie  year  (1983)  with  The  Bears,  when  I  was 
voted  Assistant  Player  Representative,  until  today  as  a  Trustee.  I  represented  both 
The  Bears  and  The  Giants  in  the  role  of  Player  Rep  and  The  Arizona  Cardinals  as 
Rep  and  as  a  member  of  The  NFLPA  Executive  Committee.  I  was  also  a  named 
plaintiff,  in  The  Federal  Lawsuit  which  brought  Free  Agency  to  The  NFL,  in  1993, 
along with Reggie White, Michael Buck, Hardy Nickerson, and Van McElroy. 

I  personally  observed  Gene  Upshaw  and  his  staff  take  our  union  from  insolvency 
to  an  organization  with  a  For-Profit  wing  that  generates  millions  of  dollars  for  the 
players.  I  also  watched  him  take  us  through  Decertification  and  Recertification  (of 
the exact same union) . . . the first time in the history of Organized Labor that that 
occurred!  It  was  I  who  moved  to  give  Gene  and  his  staff  a  Vote  Of  Confidence  . . . 
it  was  unanimous!  I  also  recall  during  those  lean  years  the  number  of  times  that 
Gene and his staff would not cash their pay cheques, because there was not enough 
money to pay them . . . they kept their cheques in their desk drawers! It was Gene 
who  coined  the  phrase,  our  motto  and  mission  statement:  ‘‘Past,  Present,  Future!’’ 
The focus has always been on honoring those players, who played before us! 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

16 

I became team Player Rep in 1987, the year of our strike. I am very proud of the 
role  my  teammates  had  in  leading  the  strike,  and  we  were  the  last  group  of  men 
to  return  to  the  practice  field,  when  the  strike  was  called  off,  and  no  one  crossed 
the picket line! The union meeting to strike was held in Chicago. I will never forget 
the  comment  that  our  Head  Coach,  Mike  Ditka,  made  when  we  returned  for  our 
first meeting. As a result of the strike, The League brought in replacement players 
(SCABS) who played (3) games in place of the striking players. Mike kept 4 of those 
replacement  players,  when  we  returned,  and  he  told  all  of  us  that  ‘‘Those  guys  (the 
4  SCAB  players)  are  THE  REAL  BEARS!’’  Mike’s  comments  furthered  my  resolve, 
which  ultimately  led  to  my  role  as  a  plaintiff  in  U.S.  District  Court.  It  stung  my 
conscience,  as  much  as  my  dad’s  comments  regarding  GM  and  the  29  years  it  took 
them to give him the job he was qualified to do in 1945. And also of my first meet-
ing  with  Buddy  Ryan,  my  rookie  year,  who  asked  me:  ‘‘Golden  Domer,  you  one  of 
those doctors or lawyers?’’ I said ‘‘yes sir!’’ He said ‘‘well, you won’t be here too long, 
because I don’t like smart Niggas!’’ I called my dad and told him that ‘‘I didn’t grad-
uate  from  college  to  go  through  this!!!’’  My  dad  said:  ‘‘It  sounds  to  me  like  you’re 
in  The  Army!’’  It  was  a  very  short  phone  call.  From  that,  I  learned  to  persevere. 
Fighting for players’ rights became a passion for me and it’s even stronger today. 
I was honored when I received an invitation, upon retiring from the NFL, to become 
Alternate  Trustee  of  the  player  plans,  to  serve  along  side  of  Tom  Condon,  Jeff  Van 
Note,  and  the  late  great  Len  Teeuws.  Each  man  has  operated  with  absolute  integ-
rity  and  with  great  resolve,  in  carrying  out  their  fiduciary  responsibility.  In  fact, 
during  the  years  that  we  played  without  a  union  representing  us,  those  men  were 
totally  naked,  in  terms  of  liability,  without  any  financial  backing  from  the  players, 
had a suit arisen!!! 

I  recall  receiving  my  first  set  of  documents  with  players’  applications  and  renew-
als,  with  all  of  their  medical  records,  and  turning  to  my  wife  and  saying:  ‘‘I  now 
know  far  more  than  I  care  to  know  about  these  men  and  their  financial  &  family 
situations.’’ Our meetings with the NFL Trustees have oftentimes been spirited and 
on occasion contentious, but always with both sides operating within ERISA Guide-
lines.  I  can  say,  without  question,  that  Tom,  Jeff,  Len,  and  I  have  fought  for  every 
individual player who has filed an application for benefits. Len was a tireless cham-
pion  for  the  men  who  served  in  The  Armed  Services,  to  get  accredited  seasons  for 
them, during those years when they were serving our country. In replacing Len, as 
a  full  trustee,  upon  his  retirement,  I  have  continued  that  fight.  Trace  Armstrong 
now serves as the Alternate. We are even more diligent in our efforts to gain bene-
fits  for  any  and  all  players  who  are  deemed  totally  &  permanently  disabled!  In  all 
cases,  Federal  law  requires  us  to  follow  the  terms  of  the  Plan,  which  states  that 
if  an  individual  is  ‘‘employable’’,  he  does  not  qualify  for  total  and  permanent  dis-
ability. That is not an arbitrary decision being made on the part of the Board. . . . 
It Is The Law! 

1993  was  a  pivotal  year,  in  regards  to  player  salaries  and  benefits.  As  a  result 
of  collective  bargaining,  in  Dallas,  TX,  a  new  CBA  was  agreed  to.  The  very  first 
thing negotiated was Benefits, and I immediately left the room to go and call Daryl 
Stingley  to  let  him  know  that  his  benefits  were  tripling!  In  that  same  meeting,  the 
Executive  Committee  moved  to  create  a  Pension  Benefit  for  The  Pre-59’ers  . . . 
those  men  who  played  prior  to  the  creation  of  benefits,  who  had  not  received  one 
from the guys who came after them. We got there with Mike Kenn as President and 
an  11-membered  Executive  Committee,  and  a  few  strong  player  reps  who  wouldn’t 
bend!  Since  1993,  every  negotiation  and  extension  of  the  current  agreement,  the 
players  have  reached  back  (out  of  their  pockets  to  the  tune  of  $82K  per  year,  per 
player this year) to fund increases in PAST PLAYER’S BENEFITS! 

Can  the  process  be  improved?  Absolutely!  Can  the  process  be  sped  up?  It  must 
be!  But  remember,  we  are  bound  by  Federal  law  and  the  terms  of  the  Plan,  and 
quite  frankly,  the  only  reason  the  players  have  a  seat  on  the  Board  is  because  it 
was  collectively  bargained  . . .  just  as  with  my  companies,  I  as  management  could 
run the benefit portion without employee input! Can more be placed into the coffers 
for  Disability  Benefits?  Absolutely!  But,  those  decisions  are  made  by  the  current 
players who, by the way, are putting 6 percent of their collectively negotiated pack-
age into total benefits. That $82K per player per year comes directly from additional 
salary they could realize! 

I  have  seen  our  benefit  numbers  grow  from  under  $7M  to  over  $2.5B,  since  the 
year  I  became  a  rep.  Gene  and  his  staff  have  done  yeoman’s  work,  on  more  than 
one occasion. I pay tribute to all of those player reps, who over the years, sacrificed 
time with family and oftentimes, careers, to join in this fight. I can personally recall 
numerous  men  who  lost  their  jobs  because  of  their  union  involvement.  Today,  we 
are  as  close  to  labor  peace  as  we’ve  ever  been. . . .  The  ‘‘Poison  Pill’’  at  the  end 
of the agreement, placed their by The Special Magistrate is responsible for that. The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

17 

day is coming when the agreement WILL run out, and a system very much like pre- 
1993  becomes  a  possibility,  again,  with  salaries  being  set  and  no  Free  Agency.  On 
that day, benefits will be frozen or simply taken away. 

I can uniquely relate to the players, both current and retired, as well as, manage-
ment,  since  I  had  as  many  as  252  employees  . . .  I  paid  their  benefits  out  of  my 
pocket. I can also relate to the players who are feeling a significant financial crunch, 
as I lost my business in 2006 to receivership, due to cash-flow challenges, associated 
with a late startup, after construction. I won a Federal Lawsuit in October 2004 for 
$34.592M,  but  because  the  company  is  based  in  The  Netherlands,  I  have  been  un-
able  to  secure  any  of  the  individual’s  assets,  as  of  yet,  but  I  will.  The  Hedge  Fund 
wasn’t  concerned  with  my  challenge,  nor  my  family’s.  It  has  cost  me  my  business 
and my home, and I’m exhausting assets as I speak. But, GOD has been good, and 
HE  has  been  good  to  those  men  who  take  issue  with  where  they  find  themselves 
today. 

I have had some great coaches: Terry Hitchcock, Dan Devine, Jim Johnson, Mike 
Ditka,  Buddy  Ryan,  Bill  Parcells,  and  Bill  Bellichek.  I’ve  had  and  have  great  men-
tors and known great leaders. 

This  (Capitol  Hill)  is  not  the  proper  venue  for  this  discussion,  of  how  do  we  im-
prove  disability  benefits.  I  am  a  retired  player,  and  every  man  playing  today  will 
very  soon  join  our  ranks.  The  place  for  this  discussion  is  with  the  current  players, 
at  their  Annual  Player  Rep  Meeting,  in  March.  Retired  Players  need  to  go  there 
300+ strong! It’s there that the decisions are made, and it’s there that our voice will 
be heard and influence felt! ‘‘Eight men thoroughly immersed in true unionized spir-
it are far greater assets, than eighty, with lukewarm enthusiasm!’’ 

The game is better than it has ever been, and the players are compensated at un-
precedented  levels.  Salaries  and  benefits  skyrocketed  as  a  result  of  Reggie  White, 
Michael Buck, Hardy Nickerson, Van McElroy, and myself, and others. I didn’t real-
ize  the  impact  of  it,  but  one  of  my  sons  might,  or  their  children  (when  they  have 
them).  I’m  excited  about  what  we’ve  accomplished  so  far  and  it’s  been  a  very  fair 
life. 

Thank you. GOD Bless You! 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Duerson,  thank  you  very  much.  As  you 
know,  we  have  arranged  the  sounds  of  a  carpenter  as  accompani-
ment for your testimony. We apologize for that. But—see if we can 
stop it. Thank you for your statement. 

Mr. Bill Bain is a former NFL player for the Los Angeles Rams. 
Mr. Bain, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF BILL BAIN, FORMER NFL PLAYER, 

LOS ANGELES RAMS, GREEN BAY PACKERS, NEW ENGLAND 

PATRIOTS, DENVER BRONCOS, NEW YORK JETS 

Mr. BAIN. Good morning, Mr. Chairman, Senators, and members 

of the Committee. 

My  name  is  Bill  Bain.  I  am  happy  to  be  here  in  support  of  the 
NFLPA.  I  played  12  years  in  the  NFL,  most  of  them  on  running 
teams.  It  was  my  pleasure  to  spend  8  years  with  the  L.A.  Rams. 
I  got  to  play  with  Hall  of  Famers  Jack  Youngblood,  Jackie  Slater, 
and Eric Dickerson. In 1983, Eric set the rookie record, which still 
stands  after  24  years.  In  1984,  Eric  set  the  NFL  rushing  record, 
which  still  stands  after  23  years.  I  was  very  proud  to  be  part  of 
that L.A. Ram offensive line. 

Now,  as  I  stated  before,  I’ve  been  on  running  teams  most  of  my 
career.  The  injuries  I  have  received  can  best  be  described  by  an 
equation  developed  by  a  physicist  that  says,  ‘‘Two  280-pound  line-
men hitting head-on 60 times a game is the equivalent to two cars 
hitting head-on at 40 miles an hour.’’ On running teams, you prac-
tice  run-blocking  on  Wednesday,  Thursday,  and  Sunday.  By  doing 
so over 12 years, I developed a condition called venous insufficiency 
in  both  legs.  That  means  that  the  veins  have  collapsed,  making  it 
difficult for blood to return—back up to my heart. It just pools into 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

18 

my  feet,  in  my  legs.  My  legs,  from  my  calf  down,  are  the  color  of 
this  tie.  After  retiring,  in  1987,  I  could  not  use  my  college  degree 
to  help  my  family,  because  the  employers  that  wanted  to  hire  me 
were  afraid  that  my  medical  conditions  would  increase  the  future 
medical insurance premiums beyond their acceptable levels. It was 
then  that  I  was  forced  to  take  various  physically  demanding  jobs 
to  help  my  family  out.  This  deteriorated  my  legs  even  further, 
causing ulcers, which would ooze and bleed and take 4 to 6 months 
to heal. An ulcer can best be described as a worm in an apple, with 
stuff oozing out of it. 

In 1993, I received two letters from the NFL Players Benefits Of-
fice advising me of a financial condition of two funds that were ne-
gotiated  by  the  NFLPA  in  the  most  recent  CBA,  which  was  nego-
tiated  after  I  had  retired.  I  called  the  NFL  office.  My  call  was  di-
rected to Miki Yaris-Davis. And she is a godsend. Anyway, she ex-
plained to me what the two programs were. I got off the phone, ex-
plained  what  the  two  programs  were  to  my  wife.  She—we  both 
looked at each other and, kind of, laughed. And she said, ‘‘You can 
easily qualify for this.’’ 

I  called  the  NFLPA  and  requested  a  physical  exam.  A  form  was 
sent  to  me  immediately.  I  had  a  doctor’s  appointment  made.  How-
ever, when I got to that doctor’s appointment, unbeknownst to me, 
I  needed  to  pay  $300  up  front  for  the  exam.  The  doctor  would  not 
see me. Finally, on September 15, 1996, 2 years 9 months after re-
ceiving  the  two  letters,  I  was  able  to  save  up  $300  to  pay  the  up- 
front  fee  for  the  physical  and  take  the  examination.  On  January 
16,  the  Retirement  Board  met,  and  on  January  18th  I  received  a 
letter of denial. The letter stated that Dr. Schultz did not consider 
me permanently damaged goods. 

Between January 19 and March 15, I started the appeal process. 
I collected letters from two workman’s comp attorneys, three physi-
cians,  and  two  personal  friends,  all  who  have  known  me  well  and 
had  followed  my  career.  One  of  the  attorneys  was  Mike  Bagby. 
Mike’s  a  great  friend.  Mike  Bagby  is  a  lawyer,  and  he  has  associ-
ates,  and  they  specialize  in  workman’s  comp  attorney  law  for  the 
employer;  and  he’s  out  of  Santa  Ana,  California.  Mike  read  Dr. 
Schultz’s  report  and  asked  me  if  I  had  a  surgically  repaired  scar 
on  my  right  knee.  My  answer  was  no,  it’s  on  my  left  knee.  Then 
Mike asked me how come there was no reference to the venous in-
sufficiency?  And  I  answered,  ‘‘Mike,  because  he  didn’t  ask  me  to 
take  my  socks  off.’’  I  presented  these  letters  to  the  board  on  April 
24, 1997. I had my appeal hearing. It ended at a 3–3 tie. And that’s 
a  good  thing—it’s  three  players  and  three  owners—it  was  a  good 
thing,  because,  with  that  decision  as  a  tie,  I  get  to  go  see  a  MAP 
doctor. ‘‘MAP,’’ meaning Medical Advisory Physician. 

On  May  28,  1997,  I  was  examined  by  Dr.  Tiboni.  Thank  God  I 
took  my  wife  with  me,  who’s  an  RN.  During  the  exam,  Dr.  Tiboni 
stated,  ‘‘You’re  kinda  messed  up,  but  not  so  badly  that  you  should 
receive  disability.’’  That’s  when  my  wife  said—as  I  said,  ‘‘She’s  an 
RN’’—that’s when my wife said, ‘‘Bill, take down your socks.’’ Well, 
Dr.  Tiboni—looked—he  just  went  like  that,  a  look  of  complete  as-
tonishment. Dr. Tiboni examined my feet and my legs for the next 
10  minutes,  and  then  said,  ‘‘Congratulations,  you’ve  flunked  your 
physical.’’ This is a good thing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

19 

On  July  23,  the  Board  granted  my  appeal  for  total  and  perma-
nent  disability  benefits.  On  August  15,  1997,  the  Feast  of  the  As-
sumption,  I  received  my  first  check.  During  that  tough,  long  year 
process,  I  wanted  to  quit  several  times,  but  due  to  the  support  of 
the NFLPA and Miki Yaris-Davis, I didn’t. 

In  closing,  I  want  to  say  that,  without  the  NFLPA’s  efforts,  I’d 
be upside down. Without the Federal Social Security disability ben-
efits,  I’d  be  inside  out.  Without  my  wife  and  her  job  and  the  med-
ical  benefits  her  job  provides,  I  don’t  know  where  I  would  be,  my 
four  daughters  would  be,  my  whole  family  would  be.  I  thank  the 
NFLPA  so  very  much  for  all  their  help,  because  they  stuck  by  me. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Bain,  thank  you  very  much  for  being  with 

us and sharing that story and your testimony. 

Next, we’ll hear from Mr. Garrett Webster, the son of NFL player 

Mike Webster, from the Pittsburgh Steelers. 

Mr. Webster, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF GARRETT WEBSTER, SON OF MIKE WEBSTER, 

FORMER NFL PLAYER, PITTSBURGH STEELERS AND 

KANSAS CITY CHIEFS 

Mr. WEBSTER. Thank you, Senator. 
Ladies and gentlemen, before I begin my testimony, I would just 
like  to  express  my  gratitude  for  being  included  in  today’s  pro-
ceedings. I am humbled to be here today in the capital of the great-
est  country  in  the  world  and  to  share  the  story  of  a  great  football 
player  and  a  great  man  who  was  abandoned  by  the  League  he 
helped build. 

Today,  you  will  hear  firsthand  from  former  players  about  what 
it’s  like  to  try  and  obtain  disabilities  from  the  NFL.  You  will  hear 
what  it’s  like  to  be  in  constant  pain.  You  will  hear  what  it  is  like 
to  fear  the  loss  of  your  mind,  body,  and  perhaps  even  your  very 
soul while you are still relatively young. 

But  that’s  not  my  story.  I  cannot  tell  you  what  it’s  like  to  wake 
up and not be able to walk out—walk to the shower without being 
in  constant  pain.  I  cannot  tell  you  what  it’s  like  to  fear  the  loss  of 
your mind and then to feel it actually happening. I cannot tell you 
what it’s like to become a stranger even to yourself. 

However,  what  I  can  tell  you,  and  what  I  will  tell  you,  is  what 
it’s  like  to  stand  by,  helpless,  as  your  father’s  life  is  turned  into  a 
constant living hell that most people would take their own lives to 
escape from. 

My  father  was  Iron  Mike  Webster.  He  played  17  years  and  was 
perhaps  the  most  widely  respect  player  in  the  League  during  that 
time  period.  For—he  was  mainly  respected  for  his  work  ethic  and 
his  devotion  to  his  city  and  his  team,  the  Pittsburgh  Steelers.  He 
was  the  Steeler  the  fans  viewed  as  one  of  their  own,  a  blue-collar 
man who would dedicate countless hours to help raising millions of 
dollars for spina bifida, who would stay long after autograph shows 
so  everyone  got  their  souvenir  signed,  who  greeted  everyone  with 
a  handshake  from  those  massive  hands,  and  made  them  feel  like 
they were a personal friend. Ask all of these people who Mike Web-
ster  was,  and  they  will  tell  you  he  is  the  definition  of  an  all-time 
great. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

20 

I  am  proud  of  my  father,  and,  as  all  sons  are,  I  think  my  dad 
was the greatest dad in the world. When I was young, I remember 
my dad wrestling with my brother Colin and I in the pool, chasing 
robins  with  my  sisters,  Brooke  and  Hillary,  out  in  our  front  yard, 
and reading stories into a tape recorder so we could hear his voice 
while he was on long road trips. My mother, who could not be here 
today, remembers my dad as a good father and husband, who could 
remember  the  street  layouts  of  Chicago  after  taking  one  look  at  a 
map,  and  a  man  who  would  play  practical  jokes  on  the  neighbors, 
not limited to putting a few rubber snakes in Mrs. Gregg’s mailbox. 
But, as I grew older and I grew more and more aware of my dad 
and  his  condition,  I  knew  that  the  Mike  Webster  that  I  grew  up 
and  loved  was  dying.  I  remember  the  day  that  I  knew  something 
was  wrong,  when,  on  my  10th  birthday,  my  dad  was  nowhere  to 
be  found.  I  didn’t  even  receive  a  phone  call,  which  was  not  like 
him,  because  he  would  usually  call  me  every  single  night  before  I 
went to sleep, and call me his ‘‘Little Buddy.’’ 

Later  that  month,  I  found  out  why,  when  our  family  discovered 
Iron Mike Webster, bloated to over 300 pounds, shivering naked in 
a  bed  in  a  rat-infested  motel,  and,  at  his  side  were  not  pictures  of 
his  kids,  nor  his  Super  Bowl  rings,  nor  autographs  or  any  glory 
that  you  associate  with  football,  but  a  bucket  of  human  waste,  be-
cause he was too weak to make it to the bathroom. 

As  time  passed,  my  dad’s  condition  only  got  worse.  I  have  lived 
through  things  I  would  not  wish  on  my  worst  enemy.  Have  any  of 
you people around here had to shock your own father with a taser 
so  he  could  go  a  few  minutes  without  pain?  Have  any  of  you  had 
to  receive  a  phone  call  from  your  father  telling  you  he  was  about 
to  kill  himself  so  he  could  get  away  from  it  all?  Have  any  of  you 
had to witness a once-proud, strong man as Mike Webster, have to 
beg  for  KFC  and  perhaps  offer  autographs  just  so  he  could  eat 
something? Well, I have. And I cannot forget those experiences. 

My father is gone now. I cannot help him. But I can do what he 
would  do  for  his  teammates  and  fellow  football  players  if  he  were 
here,  healthy,  and  the  man  that  he  was  before  the  repeated  head 
injuries  suffered  on  the  football  field  took  his  mind  and  body  from 
him at an early age, and took him from me far too soon. 

What I’m asking is that the NFL Players Union and the National 
Football  League,  as  a  whole,  look  beyond  the  bottom  line  and  help 
the  past,  present,  and  future  gladiators,  in  every  way  that  they 
can, to find peace, self respect, and a measure of health when their 
very short time in the game is over, and they don’t end up relieving 
themselves  in  the  oven  as—in  a  flash  of  dementia,  as  my  father 
once did. Believe me, there are millions of kids who play this beau-
tiful  game  of  football  and  have  no  idea  of  the  risks.  I’m  calling  on 
the League, the Players Union, the Commissioner, the retired play-
ers,  and  the  U.S.  Government  to  put  aside  egos  and  hurt  feelings 
and  work  in  a  way  to  educate  people  about  the  health  risks  in-
volved  with  playing  the  game,  and  to  take  care  of  those  athletes 
who  got  hurt  while  playing  it  in  a  fair  and  balanced  way,  whether 
it be with healthcare, social workers, insurance, or whatever can be 
provided by a multibillion-dollar corporation. 

A  final  plea,  I  will  make  to  you,  Commissioner  Roger  Goodell.  I 
personally  think  that  you’re  a  good  man  who  wants  to  promote 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

21 

positive  change  in  today’s  game.  You  have  shown  good  leadership 
with things, such as making sure the NFL players are accountable 
when  they  break  the  law,  so  they  are  good  role  models  for  kids 
today. I am making a plea to you, not as the son of Mike Webster, 
not as a 23-year-old kid who has lost his best friend and father, but 
as a young man who desperately wants no one to ever feel the pain 
that  I  feel  every  morning,  to  feel  the  loneliness  that  I  feel  when  I 
have to turn to my father for advice and he is not there, to feel the 
heartbreak  that  I  feel  when  I  hear  about  Chris  Benoit,  Andre  Wa-
ters,  Reggie  White,  Justin  Strzelczyk,  and  the  web  of  people  con-
nected  to  them  that  have  had  brain  injuries,  and  those  brain  inju-
ries have destroyed their lives by repeated concussions and head— 
other head injuries. I ask you, Mr. Goodell, to use your position as 
NFL Commissioner, to lead the charge to educate the public about 
brain  injuries  and  show  them  how  to  rehab  and  take  care  of  those 
injuries, and take care of people that are slowly becoming a strang-
er to themselves and those around them. I pledge to offer whatever 
help I can, and support. My father would like that, I know. I would 
give  my  life  to  never  see  another  family  end  up  like  mine.  I  am 
ready to help. Please join me. 

Ladies  and  gentlemen  of  the  Senate,  I  thank  you  for  your  time. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Webster follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GARRETT WEBSTER, SON OF MIKE WEBSTER, FORMER NFL 

PLAYER, PITTSBURGH STEELERS AND KANSAS CITY CHIEFS 

The following people all helped Mr. Mike Webster in his final years, and I would 

like to include their names on this document—— 

Bob Fitzsimmons 
Sunny Jani 
Devin Jani 
Alexis Jani 
Dr. Charles Kelly 
Dr. Jim Vodvarka 
Freddy Shaheen 
Sam Nuci 
Terry Despoy 
Cy Smith 
Pamela Webster 
Brooke Webster 
Colin Webster 
Garrett Webster 
And the entire Pittsburgh Steelers Family. 

Ladies  and  gentleman,  before  I  begin  my  testimony,  I  would  like  to  express  my 
gratitude  for  being  included  in  today’s  proceedings.  I  am  humbled  to  be  able  to  ap-
pear  here  today,  in  the  capitol  of  the  greatest  country  in  the  world,  to  share  the 
story  of  a  great  football  player  and  a  great  man  who  was  abandoned  by  the  league 
he helped build. 

Because  I  am  proud  of  the  way  my  father  lived  and  still  agonized  at  the  way  he 
died,  I  may  struggle  in  my  oral  presentation  of  this  testimony  against  being  inap-
propriate. I hope I am at my best for you Members of the Committee who have kind-
ly taken oversight of the great injustices of the NFL’s disability system, and for the 
men who have suffered, and who continue to suffer, under it. I know that, for their 
sake  and  for  the  memory  of  my  father,  whom  I  represent  today,  that  I  must  try  to 
put hurt feelings aside and coolly expose the deceptions in that system that will rob 
other  children  of  fathers,  mothers  of  sons,  and  wives  of  husbands  if  it  is  allowed 
to  continue.  I  ask  you  to  listen  with  open  hearts  and  open  minds  with  concern  not 
for  icons,  superstars,  quarterbacks,  lineman,  or  football  players,  but  for  your  fellow 
human beings. In return, I will try to be as brave before my task as my father was 
in life. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

22 

Today  you  will  hear,  first  hand,  from  former  players  about  what  it’s  like  to  try 
and  obtain  relief  for  their  disabilities  from  the  NFL.  You  will  hear  what  its  like  to 
be in constant pain. You will hear what its like to fear the loss of your mind, body, 
and  perhaps  even  your  very  soul  while  you  are  still  relatively  young.  But  that  is 
not  my  story.  I  cannot  tell  you  what  its  like  to  wake  up  and  not  be  able  to  walk 
to the shower without being in constant pain. I cannot tell you what its like to fear 
the  loss  of  your  mind  and  to  feel  it  actually  happening.  I  cannot  tell  you  what  its 
like  to  become  a  stranger  even  to  yourself.  However  what  I  can  tell  you,  and  what 
I  will  tell  you,  is  what  its  like  to  stand  by,  helpless,  as  your  father’s  life  is  turned 
into  a  constant  living  hell  that  most  people  would  take  their  own  lives  to  escape. 
My father was Iron Mike Webster. He played 17 years and was perhaps the most 
widely respected player in the league during the 1970s and 80s for his strength, for 
his  work  ethic,  and  for  his  devotion  to  his  team,  the  Pittsburgh  Steelers.  He  was 
the Steeler the fans viewed as one of them—a regular man who dedicated hundreds 
of  hours  to  helping  raise  millions  of  dollars  for  spina  bifida,  who  would  stay  long 
after autograph shows so everyone got a souvenir signed, who greeted everyone with 
a  handshake  from  those  massive  hands  and  made  them  feel  like  they  where  a  per-
sonal  friend.  Ask  all  of  these  people  who  Mike  Webster  was  and  they  will  tell  you 
that he is the definition of an all time great. 

I  would  love  to  tell  you  that  Iron  Mike  Webster  lived  out  his  remaining  years, 
a  proud  man,  sharp  as  a  tack,  humorous,  warm,  and  caring,  a  wonderful  husband 
and father. But I cannot lie and, because I care about my Dad’s memory and I care 
about the people that are here today who are suffering under the same system that 
failed  him  so  miserably,  I  must  try  to  tell  the  truth  as  I  saw  it,  through  the  eyes 
of a surviving son. 

I’m proud of my father, and as all sons are, I think my dad was the greatest dad 
in  the  world.  When  I  was  young,  I  remember  my  dad  wrestling  with  my  brother 
Colin  and  I  in  the  pool,  chasing  robins  with  my  sisters  Brooke  and  Hillary  in  our 
front yard and reading stories into a tape recorder so we could hear his voice when 
he  was  away  on  road  trips.  My  Mother,  who  could  not  be  here  today,  remembers 
my dad as a good father and husband who could remember the street layouts of Chi-
cago  after  taking  one  look  at  a  map,  and  who  would  play  practical  jokes  on  the 
neighbors, not limited to putting a few rubber snakes in Mrs. Gregg’s mailbox. 

But, as I grew older, I grew more and more aware that the Mike Webster I knew 
was  dying.  I  remember  the  day  I  knew  something  was  wrong  when,  on  my  10th 
birthday, my dad was nowhere to be found. I didn’t even receive a phone call, which 
was  not  like  him.  Later  that  month  I  found  out  why,  when  our  family  discovered 
‘‘Iron  Mike’’  bloated  to  over  300  pounds,  shivering  in  a  bed  at  a  rat  infested  motel. 
At  his  side  were  not  pictures  of  his  kids,  nor  his  super  bowl  rings,  but  a  bucket  of 
human waste because he was too weak to make it to the bathroom. 

As  time  passed,  my  dad’s  condition  only  got  worse.  I  have  lived  through  things 
I would not wish on my worst enemy. Have any of you had to shock a family mem-
ber  with  a  tazer  so  he  could  be  without  pain  for  a  few  moments,  have  any  of  you, 
at  the  age  of  13,  received  a  phone  call  from  your  father  in  which  he  tells  you  he 
is  about  to  kill  himself?  Have  any  of  you  witnessed  a  once  strong,  proud  man,  re-
duce himself to begging for Kentucky Fried Chicken? I hope not. I have and I cannot 
forget. 

My  father  is  gone,  now.  I  cannot  help  him.  But  I  can  do  what  he  would  do  for 
his teammates and fellow football players if he were here, and healthy, and the man 
he was before repeated head injuries suffered on the football field took his mind and 
body from him at an early age, and took him from me far too soon. What I’m asking 
is  that  the  NFL  Players  Union  and  the  National  Football  League  as  a  whole  look 
beyond  the  bottom  line  and  help  the  modern  day  gladiators  in  every  way  they  can 
to  find  peace,  self  respect  and  a  measure  of  health  when  there  very  short  time  in 
the  game  is  over  so  they  don’t  end  up  relieving  themselves  in  an  oven  in  a  flash 
of  dementia  as  my  father  did  once.  Believe  me,  there  are  millions  of  kids  who  play 
this  beautiful  game  of  football  who  have  no  idea  of  the  risks.  I’m  calling  on  the 
League,  the  Players  Union,  the  Commissioner,  the  retired  players,  and  the  U.S. 
Government to put aside egos and hurt feelings and work on a way to educate peo-
ple about the health risks involved with playing the game, and to take care of those 
athletes  who  got  hurt  while  playing  it  in  a  fair  and  balanced  way,  whether  that  be 
with  healthcare,  social  workers,  insurance  or  whatever  help  can  be  provided  by  a 
multi-billion dollar corporation. 

The  final  plea  I  will  make  is  to  you,  Commissioner  Goodell.  I  personally  think 
that you’re a good man who wants to promote positive change in today’s game. You 
have  shown  good  leadership  with  things  such  as  making  sure  NFL  players  are  ac-
countable when they break the law, so they are good role models for kids today. I’m 
making a plea to you, not as the son of Mike Webster, not as a 23 year-old kid who 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

23 

has  lost  his  best  friend  and  father,  but  as  a  young  man  who  desperately  wants  no 
one  to  ever  feel  the  pain  that  I  feel  every  morning,  to  feel  the  loneliness  when  I 
feel  when  I  need  to  turn  to  my  father  for  advice  and  he  is  not  there,  to  feel  the 
heartbreak that I feel when I hear about Chris Beniot, Andre Waters, Reggie White, 
Justin Strylzick and the web of people connected to them, that have had there lives 
destroyed by repeated concussions and head injuries. I ask you, Mr. Goodell, to use 
your  position  as  NFL  Commissioner  to  lead  the  charge  to  educate  the  public  about 
brain injuries and show them how to rehab and take care of someone that is slowly 
becoming  a  stranger  to  himself  and  those  around  him.  I  pledge  to  offer  whatever 
help  I  can  in  support.  My  father  would  like  that,  I  know.  I  would  give  my  life  to 
never see another family end up like mine. I am ready to help. Please join me. 

Ladies and gentlemen of the Senate, I thank you for your time. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Webster,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 

here today and for providing your testimony, as well. 

Finally, we will hear from Brent Boyd, who’s a former NFL play-

er for the Minnesota Vikings. 
Mr. Boyd, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF BRENT BOYD, FORMER NFL PLAYER, 

MINNESOTA VIKINGS 

Mr.  BOYD.  All  right,  thank  you,  Senator  Dorgan  and  the  Com-
mittee, and especially your dedicated staff, who’s been so generous 
with their time and hard work going—leading into this hearing. 

Before  my  clock  starts,  as  I  was  allowed  in  the  House,  I  request 
a  chance  to  explain  my  invisible  disability,  because  it  affects  my 
testimony.  I  do  have  brain  damage.  It’s  been  located  on  brain 
scans. The damaged part of the brain gets—when I’m under stress, 
gets  less  blood,  instead  of  more,  like  normal  people,  in—besides 
causing  problems  communicating,  it  causes  excruciating  pain.  So, 
you  know,  this  is  a  Senate  hearing,  it’s  fairly  stressful,  and,  you 
know,  the  5-minute  clock  is  a  little  stressful,  so  I  need  to—I  beg 
of you to let me go slow and tell the story. There’s a lot to tell. I’m 
going  to  need  questions  to  tell—I  can’t  get  it  all  into  5  minutes. 
Thank you for accommodating my disability. 

And  now,  to  begin,  I’m  Brent  Boyd.  I’m  a  native  Californian.  I 
graduated with honors from UCLA, am now a resident of Reno, Ne-
vada. 

My wife, Gina, a U.S. Postal mechanic, and son, Anders, 19 years 
old,  fireman  in  training,  they  couldn’t  make  it  with  this  trip.  My 
neurologist prefers, I don’t travel alone, so I want to thank and ac-
knowledge that I have been escorted by one of America’s most deco-
rated  Vietnam  heroes:  retired  Colonel  Jack  Kelly,  United  States 
Marine  Corps,  has  escorted  me  from  the  West  Coast  and  around 
town. 

Although I just turned 50 this year, I am already on medications 
for  dementia  and  Alzheimer’s.  As  is  all  too  common  for  NFL  play-
ers,  the  snowball  of  dementia  has  started  rolling,  so  please  grant 
me  the  opportunity  to  tell  this  whole  story  while  I’m  able.  I  have 
a lot to tell. The Committee needs to hear a lot. So, as long as we’re 
here  and  we  have  this  time  together,  let’s  take  advantage  of  it, 
please.  And  exhaust  me  with  questions.  I  am  fighting  for  my  life, 
I’ll stay here all day to answer questions. 

In addition to my own story, in the last week or two, players who 
have  found  my  e-mail  address  have  written  their  own  stories.  And 
I  haven’t  counted  them.  There  are  150,  200  letters,  probably.  I 
would like to submit this into the official record. Instead of a form 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

24 

letter,  where,  you  know,  faceless  signatures  are  on  it,  each  story 
here  tells  their  own  story  of  their  disability  and  their  journey 
through the rigged disability board. And each story is different and 
unique  in  its  own  way,  but  each  has  the  common  thread  of  the 
fraud and corruption of this disability process. 

May I submit this? 
Senator DORGAN. Without objection, we will include it—— 
Mr. BOYD. OK. 
Senator DORGAN.—in the permanent record, Mr. Boyd. 
Mr.  BOYD.  Also,  I  wrote  the  Boyd  Plan,  which  is  attached  to  my 
written  testimony,  and  this  was  in  answer  to  Chairwoman 
Sanchez’s  written  follow  up  question,  but  it’s  the  only—to  date— 
comprehensive solution to this. So, I’m here to complain, but there 
is  also  a  solution  to  the  process  of  the  plan.  So,  I  would  like—just 
to let you know, I can answer questions not only anecdotally about 
myself, but about these other things. 

Now I got lost. 
There  are—they  keep  changing  the  number  of  former  players, 
but,  you  know,  there  are  approximately  8,000  former  players  in 
this most violent sport since the gladiators. We read, Sunday, only 
four  qualify  for  concussion  disability.  They  claim  317  disability  re-
cipients,  which  is  a  ridiculous  number,  to  begin  with,  but  their 
2006  tax  filings  show  only  121  of  the  8,000  former  players  are  re-
ceiving any disability payments. 

The  most  disgusting  number  is  this.  They’re  taking  $3.1  million 
out  of  our  own  pension  fund  to  pay  Doug  Ell  and  Groom  law  firm 
to fight us, with our own money, and to alter and change the plan, 
and turn it into a jungle of red tape. By contrast, baseball is paying 
their attorneys $170,000 to do the same job. 

Now,  I  love  football.  Everybody  in  this  room  loves  football.  I  am 
aware  that  I’m  putting  a  damper  on  this  party.  Everyone  loves 
football. They play Fantasy Football. They don’t want to hear about 
this  ugly  side,  about  all  the  carnage.  It’s  like  hearing  Santa  Claus 
beat  up  the  reindeer.  When  a  horse  gets  crippled,  like  Barbaro, 
you’d think President Lincoln got shot again. When decades of NFL 
players  are  crippled  and  are  denied  benefits  and  left  destitute  by 
a  rigged  system,  we  are  shoved  into  the  shadow  so  the  party  can 
continue. 

I am depending on your questioning to allow for details, but here 

is the story, in short. 

It  was  not  until  1999  that  doctors  correctly  diagnosed  my  prob-
lems  as  being  connected  with  concussions.  Once  they  did  that,  I 
was  sent  for  a  2-day  neurological  report—brain  scans  show,  clear 
as  day—it’s  on  the  brain  scan,  there  is  brain  damage.  It’s  on  the 
picture.  It’s  important,  because  when  they  shopped  and  got  to  the 
third  doctor  who  denied  me—in  his  report,  he  admits  he  never 
looked at any brain scan. 

Well,  hearing  this,  friend  and  baseball  agent  Barry  Axelrod 
helped me file my claim. When I called the NFL to alert them that 
I was filing my claim, I was told not to bother, and their quote was, 
‘‘The  owners  would  never  open  that  can  of  worms  by  approving  a 
claim  for  head  injury.’’  The  liability  is  so  great,  it’s  like  tobacco 
companies  fighting  against  the  link  between  smoking  and  cancer, 
it’s like automakers, when they have faulty designs, trying to deny 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

25 

any  liability.  This  is  a  $7  billion  to  $8  billion  industry.  I’m  just  a 
guy  who  has  been,  off  and  on,  homeless,  and  am  fighting,  you 
know, on the computer in my bedroom. But that’s—this is the truth 
of the situation. 

So,  you  have  the  statement  saying  they  will  never  open  this  can 
of  worms.  Shortly  after  that,  my  Viking  medical  files  disappeared. 
Out  of  the  blue,  you  know,  it  has  to  be,  the  NFL  destroyed  these 
files  to  remove  the  pesky  contemporaneous  notes  that  would  prove 
my claim instantly, and then to allow the Path & Groom Law’s ex-
perts at manipulating ERISA. 

I was sent to a doctor picked by the NFL, as expected. This doc-
tor  was  picked  off  a  preapproved  list  of  physicians.  I  was  living  in 
San  Diego  at  the  time,  single  father  with  a  young  son.  This  neu-
rologist  enthusiastically  supported  my  claim,  to  the  point  of—the 
NFL  only  asked  him  to  examine  me  1  day;  he  voluntarily  brought 
me back a second day, because, at the end of the first day, he said, 
‘‘I  suspect  you  have  vertigo  as  a  result  of  these  concussions,  and  I 
need  another  full  day  to  confirm  that.’’  His  tests  confirmed,  I  have 
vertigo  from  NFL  concussions.  This  report  was  sent  to  the  NFL 
Disability  Board.  NFL  Disability  Board  does  not  care.  The  NFL 
Disability  Board  ignores  the  basic  tenet  of  ERISA.  They  only  look 
for reasons to deny a claim, they never look for reasons to approve 
a claim. 

Importantly—after  they  ignored  him,  they  sent  me  to  a  second 
doctor;  this  time,  a  psychiatrist—first  one  was  a  neurologist.  And 
the  second—the  psychiatrist  was  even  more  enthusiastically  in 
support of my claim. He sees NFL players often, and he says mine 
was  the  most  profound  that  he  had  seen.  And  then—most  impor-
tantly,  these  first  two  NFL  doctors—there  is  a  mandatory  NFL 
form  that  the  NFL  asked  these  doctors  to  fill  out.  The  reason  for 
this  form  is  to  remove  any  doubt  as  to  cause  of—causation,  make 
sure  there  are  no  claims  of  ambivalence  or  ‘‘equivalitization,’’  if  I 
said that right. The first two doctors checked the boxes—you know, 
it  asked  them  if  I  was  fully  disabled,  permanently  disabled,  yes; 
part of the body: brain. Question is, on both of these—I’ll just hold 
up  one—Is  the  disability  a  result  of  injury?  Yes.  Is  the  injury  re-
sulting  from  football-related  activity?  Yes.  Both  NFL—remember, 
they’re  NFL  doctors—checked  these  claims,  sent  them  to  the  Dis-
ability Board. The Disability Board doesn’t want to hear it, because 
it’s in support of a player. 

Now, again, this form proves causation and removes doubt about 
equivocating.  The  third  doctor,  who  had  denied  my  claim,  has  yet, 
to  this  day,  to  fill  out  this  questionnaire.  His  name  is  Dr.  Barry 
Gordon,  from  Johns  Hopkins.  This  third  doctor  never  says,  in  his 
report what they used to deny me, that—it’s not found in his report 
that  he  says—even  says  I  am  not  disabled  by  the  NFL.  He  does 
make  a  ridiculous  statement  that  says,  ‘‘Concussions  could  not 
cause headaches.’’ And anybody who believes that, raise your hand. 
‘‘Concussions  don’t  cause  depression,  dizziness,  and  fatigue,’’  my 
four  symptoms  he  admits  I  have,  says  they  are  impossible  to  link 
to concussions. 

To  this  day,  despite  what  you’re  told  in  the  misleading  NFL 
white papers, we still have no idea what Dr. Gordon’s answer is to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

26 

the  question,  whether  my  disability  is  football-related.  But  that  I 
was  close  enough  for  them  to  vote  unanimously  to  deny  my  claim. 
Now, again, I was a single dad, often homeless. I was kept alive 
by charity. To the disgrace of the National Football League, it was 
Major League Baseball who kept me alive. Through Barry Axelrod, 
baseball  players  Mark  Grace,  Rick  Sutcliffe,  Jeff  Bagwell,  along 
with  UCLA  alums,  actor  Mark  Harmon,  Bill  Walton,  and  others, 
formed a charity to move my son out of a campground or out of the 
cheap  motel  we  were  living  in,  into  an  apartment  near  my  son’s 
school. And I need to thank the San Diego Native American Health 
Clinic,  of  which  I  don’t  qualify,  but  they  provided  emergency  med-
ical and dental care, just out of pity. 

So, after a 9-month delay, in which I was still reliant on charity, 
I was forced to leave my young son in San Diego and travel to Bal-
timore  to  see  Dr.  Barry  Gordon.  We  fought  this.  There  are  plenty 
of doctors in Southern California—Doug Ell said, ‘‘You see Dr. Gor-
don—only Dr. Gordon, or you’re denied.’’ So, I had no choice but to 
go. 

Importantly,  those  first  two  doctors  were  selected  off  that 
preapproved list, Dr. Gordon was handpicked by Doug Ell of Groom 
Law. 

Since  I  had  already  seen  a  neurologist,  they  can’t  just  send  me 
to  another  neurologist  and—say  they  weren’t  happy  with  the  first 
neurologist’s  report,  they  needed  to  have  another  excuse  to  go.  So, 
I  was  told  I  was  being  flown  coast  to  coast  to  take  a  complex,  so-
phisticated  neuropsychological  exam.  And,  before  we  get  into  that 
plan,  I  want  to—it’s  important  for  you  to  know  that,  after  these 
first  two  doctor  reports,  the  wording  of  the  plan,  the  hangup  for 
Mr. Ell, was—the plan says that I am to be awarded full disability 
if my disability is ‘‘caused by, or even relates to, a head injury.’’ No 
percentage  of  causation,  just  if  it  relates  to  a  head  injury.  So, 
again,  incredibly,  Dr.  Gordon  admits,  in  his  report,  he  never  both-
ered  to  look  at  existing  brain  scans,  never  ordered  his  own.  He 
ruled  on  a  body  part  he  never  looked  at.  As  they  teach  in  law 
school, ‘‘Don’t ask, if you don’t want the answer.’’ 

And  now,  this  neuropsychological  test,  that  was  all  important  to 
deciding my case, that they forced me to fly coast to coast, was not 
given  by  Dr.  Gordon,  as  they  had  been  telling  me  the  whole  time. 
This  story  gets  more  ridiculous  as  we  go  along,  so  hang  with  me. 
I  show  up  in  Baltimore,  and  this  neurological  test,  which  takes 
years  to  learn  how  to  administer—is  supposed  to  be  only  given  by 
a  Ph.D.,  especially  if  it’s  a  case  with  legal  ramifications,  and  it 
takes years to understand the nuance—this is—it’s not just reading 
what  was  checked,  you  know,  on  the  paper,  you’ve  got  to  under-
stand  the  nuances  of  the  person  taking  the  test.  It’s  supposed  to 
be  given  by  a  neuropsychologist.  They  didn’t  bother  hiring  a 
neuropsychologist. It was a young linguistics student named Laura 
Atella,  who  kept  telling  me,  over  and  over,  as  a  running  joke,  she 
had  never  seen  the  test  til  the  day  before.  She  took  it  home  the 
night before, and practiced on her boyfriend. This was the test they 
flew  me  coast  to  coast,  this  was  the  test  that  was  going  to  decide 
the  fate  of  me  and  my  son.  They  don’t  hire  a  neuropsychologist, 
they  pull  a  linguistics  student,  with  no  medical  training,  off  the 
street, she gives me the test. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

27 

Her  test  was  paired  with  Dr.  Gordon’s  report.  And  Dr.  Gordon’s 
report,  again,  says,  ‘‘concussions  could  not  cause  headaches.’’  And, 
again,  I’m  asking  anybody  to  raise  their  hand  who  agrees  with 
that.  My—now,  this  claim  that,  for  years,  while  all  the  reports 
were  in  my  favor,  stretched  for  years,  once  they  got  this  report  I 
was denied, by the end of the week. It only took days. 

Now, after my Ninth Circuit case—too late for my case—I found 
a  1990  medical  journal,  fully  documented  by  our  same  Dr.  Barry 
Gordon,  who  said  all  of  my  symptoms—he  admitted  my  symptoms 
had  expression—dizziness,  fatigue—when  paid  by  the  NFL,  said, 
‘‘You  can’t  link  those  symptoms  to  concussions.’’  Here’s  an  article, 
called  ‘‘Postconcussion  Syndrome,’’  written  by  Dr.  Barry  Gordon  at 
Johns  Hopkins.  The  very  first  paragraph  says,  ‘‘Overall,  headache, 
fatigue, and dizziness are the most common symptoms.’’ And then, 
to  make  it  easier,  on  his—page  one,  he  creates  a  chart,  Table  1. 
Title of the chart is, ‘‘Symptoms of Postconcussional Syndrome.’’ All 
the symptoms—all my symptoms are on this chart, the same symp-
toms,  when  paid  by  Doug  Ell,  he  wrote,  ‘‘you  can’t  link  to  concus-
sions.’’ This is his own medical independent research for review by 
other neurologists by his own peers. 

So,  this  process  took  years.  And,  to  this  day,  my  supposed  advo-
cates have never returned a call or e-mail. That’s why so many vet-
erans  are  so  angry.  Mr.  Upshaw’s  in  the  paper,  saying,  ‘‘Why  are 
they mad at me? Why are they mad at Tom Condon?’’ This is why 
Lanny Davis is brought into the process. 

During these years, they kept getting it wrong. You know, we get 
90  days  between  when  we  can  get  a  report.  I  tried  to  try  to  call 
Gene  Upshaw  or  Tom  Condon  or  members  of  the  Disability  Board 
and  say,  ‘‘Hey,  it’s  wrong.  Fix  it  before  the  next  meeting.’’  They 
don’t  answer  a  call.  To  this  day,  they  have  never  answered  a  call. 
They’re  not—they  are  our  trusted  advocates.  We  don’t  get  to  pick 
them.  They’re  supposed  to  stand  up  and  defend  us.  They  don’t  re-
turn  our  calls.  They  are  like  dirty  cops,  sitting  idly  by  in  these 
meetings,  as  doctor-shopping  and  schemes  for  false  denials  are 
cooked up and executed right in front of them. 

We  wouldn’t  be  here,  we  wouldn’t  have  a  need  for  this  hearing 
today,  if  they  would  just  stand  up  and  do  their  job  and  advocate. 
We  wouldn’t  be  here  today  if  not  for  the  willing  collusion  of  all 
sides—the  Commissioner—the  previous  Commissioner,  at  least— 
Mr.  Upshaw,  who  are—both  attend  the  meeting.  There  are  three 
owners and three people appointed by Mr. Upshaw who are the six 
who actually vote. They all have to—— 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Boyd, I’m going to have to ask you to sum-

marize. I have—— 

Mr. BOYD. OK. I know I got—that’s why I say—— 
Senator DORGAN. But we have—— 
Mr. BOYD. In review, I can speak for thousands of players, I can 
speak about solutions. I suffer both from the rigged system and the 
extra issue of concussions. To review—I was told they would never 
open  a  can  of  worms.  My  medical  files  disappeared.  I  was  flown 
cross-country for a sophisticated neuropsychological exam that was 
given  by  a  young  linguistics  student.  The  doctor  who  denied  me 
didn’t  bother  to  look  at  the  brain  scans.  He  wrote  ‘‘concussions 
could  not  cause  headaches,’’  but  his  independent  medical  research 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

28 

is  totally  contradictory  to  what  he  wrote  when  paid  by  the  NFL. 
This is fraud, corruption, collusion. It’s rampant in the NFL. I have 
over 150 letters from—saying the same story. 

Thank  you.  Please  exhaust  me  with  questions.  And—sorry  to  go 

on so long. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Boyd follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BRENT BOYD, FORMER NFL PLAYER, MINNESOTA VIKINGS 
Dear Members of the Senate Committee on Commerce: 
I am Brent Boyd, disabled former National Football League player. I am here for 
double  duty  . . .  to  explain  to  you  the  corrupt  NFL  Disability  process  in  general, 
and  to  also  address  the  more  controversial  issue  of  concussions.  The  NFL  would 
rather you not look into the topic of head injuries, their liability is huge. 

I want to thank you for inviting me to testify, I have an incredible but true story 
that is guaranteed to open your eyes in anger. I thank you for your interest in this 
issue on behalf of thousands of hurting former players, I tip my hat to your courage 
on  taking  on  this  $7–8  $BILLION  sports  league.  While  they  have  owned  the  legal 
process, today is our time for justice. 

I  am  50  years  old,  a  native  of  Southern  California  and  currently  reside  in  Reno, 
NV. My wife Gina, a U.S. Postal mechanic, and son Anders, a firefighter in training, 
could  not  accompany  me  today.  My  neurologist  prefers  I  don’t  travel  alone,  and  I 
am  honored  to  be  escorted  cross-country  by  one  of  America’s  highly  decorated  Ma-
rines from Vietnam, Retired Colonel John ‘‘Jack’’ Kelly, USMC. 

For  your  convenience,  and  edification,  I  have  broken  up  my  testimony  into  3 
parts.  One,  my  written  testimony  from  the  June  26th  House  hearing,  for  which  I 
was also a witness. This is invaluable to walk you through the NFL disability proc-
ess  and  makes  clear  as  day  the  false  disability  claim  denials  and  doctor  shopping. 
This  testimony  spells  out  clearly  what  happened  in  my  case,  and  I  pray  you  ask 
plenty of questions because 5 minutes is not near enough time to explain the crime 
committed against me. 

Also,  you  will  see  how  fiercely  the  NFL  is  fighting  to  avoid  full  liability  for  our 
concussions. Another issue is the generations who served as guinea pigs for the hor-
rible  Astroturf  playing  surfaces.  We  literally  played  on  concrete,  and  many  concus-
sions did not involve hitting another player but just the ground, and it ruined knees 
and bodies as well as minds. 

The second section, entitled ‘‘Delay, Deny, and Hope We Die’’ (after the NFL’s fa-
mous  delay  tactics  hoping  for  the  OSHA  life  expectancy  of  52  years  or  the  destitu-
tion and depression to force suicides) describes the problem in a more general sense, 
with facts and figures that will outrage you. This is a presentation first written for 
Senator Harry Reid’s staff on August 20, 2007. 

Only 4 players in the history of the NFL qualify for disability due to concussions. 
Only 121 TOTAL are receiving any benefits for any reason, according to their 2006 
tax return. $3.1 million per year spent on legal fees out of our own retirement fund 
solely to alter the plan and fight us in court . . . baseball spends approx. $170,000 
by  contrast.  This  section  also  tells  you  why  not  to  be  tricked  by  the  boasts  that  we 
lost in court . . . once the process has been corrupted in the early stages, all courts 
are hogtied by ‘‘full discretion’’ wording, courts do not rule on medical evidence. For 
the NFL to claim we had a fair day in court is disingenuous. 

But  I  am  not  here  only  to  complain. . . .  I  have  written  the  only  comprehensive 
solution  to  this  process,  ‘‘The  Boyd  Plan’’,  the  final  section.  This  is  a  response  to 
chair  Linda  Sanchez’  written  follow  up  question  after  last  June’s  House  hearings. 
The Boyd Plan is a simple solution to solving the ‘‘Process’’ players must go through 
to receive a claim, how to streamline, make transparent, add actual medical profes-
sionals  to  interpret  stacks  of  doctor’s  reports  instead  of  the  plan’s  attorneys.  The 
Boyd  Plan  at  worst  is  a  starting  point  for  debating  the  answers  to  how  to  fix  the 
‘‘process’’ side of the problem. 

The  current  process  is  so  corrupted,  so  rigged  against  disabled  players,  and  is 
done  in  medieval  secrecy.  Doctor  shopping  is  flagrant  and  in  the  open,  the  NFL, 
with their absolute power, are like war criminals in that they once had total power 
and  never  dreamed  they  would  be  caught,  exposed,  and  held  accountable  for  so 
many unforgivable offenses. That includes needless homelessness and suicides. Doug 
Ell and Groom Law can manipulate the legal process, but they can’t fool the distin-
guished members of this Commerce committee. 

I  am  fighting  for  my  life  here  today,  for  benefits  for  my  family—in  full  and  fully 
retroactive—we do not expect half-measures or partial settlements. There are count-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

29 

less  proud  men  who  are  destitute,  homeless,  on  the  brink  of  suicide  from  the  pain 
and financial shame. 

Lastly,  it  is  important  for  all  of  you  to  know  that  I  received  over  a  hundred  e- 
mails  in  the  last  2  weeks,  each  from  a  different  player  with  a  different  injury  and 
a  different  story.  But  each  has  a  common  thread,  the  thread  of  a  rigged  system,  of 
doctor shopping, of a union that doesn’t care. 

Because  I  have  received  so  many  letters,  which  will  be  made  part  of  the  record, 
and  the  fact  I  authored  the  ‘‘Boyd  Plan’’,  I  ask  you  to  exhaust  me  with  questions. 
Not just anecdotal regarding my own experience, but perhaps on the general nature 
of the widespread problem for which I can speak with confidence. And because ‘‘the 
Boyd  Plan’’  offers  solutions,  I  ask  to  be  also  included  in  questions  and  answers  re-
garding what to do next. 

Please  allow  me  to  help  you  understand  this  NFL  disability  issue  and  how  to  fix 

it. 

Respectfully, 

ATTACHMENT 1 

BRENT BOYD 

TESTIMONY OF BRENT BOYD, DISABLED FORMER NFL PLAYER TO THE SUBCOMMITTEE 
ON COMMERCIAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE LAW OF THE U.S.  HOUSE OF REPRESENTA-
TIVES’ COMMITTEE ON THE JUDICIARY 
Hearing  on  the  National  Football  League’s  System  for  Compensating  Retired 

Players: An Uneven Playing Field? 

June 26, 2007 

Madam Chairwoman, Ranking Member Cannon, Members of the Committee: 
My  name  is  Brent  Boyd.  I  played  for  the  Minnesota  Vikings  from  1980–86.  I  am 
a native Southern Californian, was raised in La Habra, CA, graduated WITH HON-
ORS from UCLA and am a proud resident of Reno, NV since 2002. I am here today 
with  my  wife  Gina,  who  is  a  mechanic  for  the  U.S.  Postal  Service.  My  18  year  old 
son Anders couldn’t come, he is home fighting wildfires for the BLM. I am on Social 
Security  disability  due  to  my  post  concussion  injuries  from  the  NFL,  but  receive 
only the minimum ‘‘non-football related’’ disability benefits from the NFL. 

First  of  all,  thank  you  for  having  the  courage  to  hold  these  hearings.  It’s  long 
overdue and I am sure what you hear today will lead to immediate further hearings 
and big changes demanded by Congress of the NFL leadership. It’s high time to ex-
pose the corruption of the NFL Disability Board, especially with Groom Law Group’s 
absolute power and members like Tom Condon, whose unforgivable co-chairmanship 
is  responsible  for  all  this  needless  suffering  that  lead  to  you  calling  this  hearing. 
I would also like to thank Jennifer Smith and the Gridiron Greats for making my 
travel here today possible. We could never have afforded to be here and I am grate-
ful for their assistance. 

I  am  here  today  because  I  have  a  remarkable  but  true  story  about  my  claim  de-
nial,  doctor  shopping  and  fraud.  And  betrayal  by  the  League  I  love.  My  case  also 
involves the subject of concussions. Just like the tobacco companies fought like hell 
to  deny  any  link  between  smoking  and  cancer,  the  NFL  is  desperately  fighting  to 
avoid any liability for all the carnage left behind by these NFL concussions. 

Joe  Montana  was  recently  asked  about  my  NFL  concussions  disability  claims  de-

nial by Mike Sullivan of San Diego’s North County Times, 

‘‘Once  they  say  there  is  an  issue,  then  they  have  to  fix  it,’’  Montana  said.  ‘‘As 
long as they never admit that there is one, then they never have to fix it. 
‘‘They’re  never  going  to  admit  it  because  then  they  have  to  go  about  and  try 
to correct it.’’ 

I  am  here  to  illustrate  for  you  how  the  NFL  disability  process  is  corrupted,  how 
Tom Condon, Gene Upshaw, the NFL, and Doug Ell of Groom Law orchestrate these 
fraudulent  decisions,  and  I  am  sure  if  I  can  walk  you  thru  my  experience  you  will 
get a feel for the travesty that has befallen countless other disabled players. 

Before  I  get  to  the  details  of  my  case,  I  would  be  remiss  if  I  didn’t  point  out  to 
you that another loser when we are denied benefits are the hard working American 
taxpayers.  These  32  NFL  billionaire  team  owners  hire  their  ‘‘dream  team’’  of  attor-
neys  to  get  them  out  of  paying  their  legal  obligation.  So  we  are  then  cast  upon  the 
taxpayers,  thru  Social  Security  and  Medicare,  and  our  communities  through  local 
charities  and  churches.  The  same  Taxpayers  who  are  already  paying  for  the  sta-
diums  they  can’t  afford  to  go  watch  a  game  in,  are  the  poor  people  stuck  with  the 
bill every time the NFL’s money buys them a disability denial in court. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

30 

Plus,  our  court  cases  set  legal  precedents  that  make  it  harder  for  the  average 
truck  driver,  saleswoman,  office  worker,  mechanics  and  so  on  to  ever  collect  a  dis-
ability claim. The NFL Disability Board isn’t just sticking it to football players, they 
are sticking it to the American workers and taxpayers as well. 

My concussions started in August 1980 . . . that was one of only God knows how 
many  concussions  I  suffered.  This  one  sticks  out  in  my  memory  because  I  tempo-
rarily  lost  sight  in  my  right  eye  and  became  very  frightened.  We  didn’t  even  count 
concussions or keep track of them back then, a concussion was not considered a seri-
ous  injury,  as  opposed  to  an  injury  to  a  weight  bearing  bone.  A  concussion  was  a 
‘‘nuisance’’  injury,  like  getting  hit  in  the  funny  bone.  It’s  a  pain  in  the  butt,  hurts 
like  heck  for  a  while.  But  like  a  hit  to  the  funny  bone  the  symptoms  faded  away 
soon and you never considered it again once it subsided . . . you surely didn’t think 
getting ‘‘dinged’’ was going to affect you the rest of your life, and in fact in my case, 
destroy my life. 

A little background info about myself first, 
I was an ‘‘A’’ student growing up in La Habra, Ca. 
A  month  prior  to  going  to  my  first  NFL  training  camp,  I  graduated  WITH  HON-
ORS  from  UCLA,  June  1980.  That  took  a  tremendous  amount  of  drive  and  deter-
mination. I was drafted in the third round to Minnesota, a feat which also requires 
a  great  deal  of  effort  and  self  sacrifice.  My  whole  life  up  to  that  point  was  of  hard 
work, dedication, and an ability to set goals and successfully reach them. 

As a rookie, we had only 9 days between the start of training camp and our first 
exhibition  game.  We  didn’t  have  all  the  off-season  practices  they  have  today.  In 
those 9 days as a rookie I was able to learn and play all five offensive line positions, 
something I’m told hasn’t happened often if at all in the NFL. 

The  end  of  that  month  was  when  that  first  concussion  occurred  in  a  preseason 
game in Miami, that’s the concussion I remember most because of going temporarily 
blind, but there were so many more in the 7 years that I played. 

When  I  complained  to  the  medical  staff  about  headaches,  I  was  told  it  was  from 
the anti-inflammatory medications I was taking for my knees. Mainly a drug called 
Indocin,  which  was  notorious  for  giving  headaches  but  worked  miracles  on  injured 
knees.  I  kept  asking  for  a  brain  scan  because  of  my  headaches. . . .  I  think  I  was 
more  afraid  I  had  a  brain  tumor,  because  I  was  never  told  my  concussions  would 
have these long lasting effects. I was always denied the brain scan. 

Upon being released mid-season 1986, I was given an ‘‘exit exam’’. I was released 
because  of  poor  performance  and  lackadaisical  effort.  I  had  been  complaining  of  a 
sore  leg  all  season,  and  was  told  it  was  just  shin  splints.  On  my  exit  exam  I  asked 
for both a leg x-ray and a brain scan. 

Again,  I  was  denied  a  brain  scan  for  headaches,  but  was  granted  the  x-ray.  The 
leg  x-ray  showed  I  had  been  playing  8  weeks  on  a  broken  leg.  This  was  never  an-
nounced  to  the  media  or  my  coaches  or  teammates,  they  were  left  to  think  I  was 
dogging  it,  physically  with  my  leg  and  mentally  with  my  inability  to  retain  plays 
and keep the energy and focus required to play in the NFL. 

I  continued  to  take  Indocin  until  the  mid  to  late  1990s,  dealing  with  the  head-
aches  but  still  believing  it  was  from  Indocin.  When  I  stopped  taking  Indocin,  my 
headaches never subsided. 

I tore my knee again around 1996 while playing with my son at Disneyland, and 
had  more  surgery.  A  friend  told  me  about  the  NFL  disability  plan  and  said  if  any-
one qualified, I might because of my knee. In 1996 or 1997, I called the union, Miki 
Yaras-Davis  helped  me  write  a  letter,  and  they  sent  me  to  a  doctor,  who  said  I 
didn’t  qualify.  I  left  it  at  that,  I  thought  this  was  some  informal  process  between 
ex-players  and  NFLPA.  I  don’t  believe  I  even  submitted  my  own  doctor’s  reports, 
it  was  not  presented  to  me  as  any  legal  thing,  I  was  never  told  to  get  an  attorney 
or  about  this  behemoth  called  ERISA  that  a  few  years  later  would  rule  my  life.  I 
simply  asked  if  my  knee  qualified,  they  said  no,  and  that  was  that.  I  didn’t  even 
know I was allowed to appeal. 

After  a  life  of  hard-driven  success,  suddenly  the  1980s  and  1990s  were  nothing 
but one failure after another for me. I couldn’t concentrate, I always felt sick—dizzy, 
a little nauseous, and always very tired. I had a splitting headache that never went 
away, but was eased through self medication. In the 1980s, before the news my son 
was  conceived,  I  was  like  many  20-somethings  and  used  cocaine,  in  my  case  I  was 
desperate  for  the  energy  to  make  up  for  my  fatigue.  (my  cocaine  use  was  stopped 
for good in 1987 with news of a son on his way.) 

And the alcohol numbs my headaches and physical pains. 
I  spent  years  searching  for  a  medical  answer,  doctors  could  find  nothing  wrong 
below  the  neck.  They  were  also  trying  to  treat  depression,  which  they  came  to  be-
lieve  was  the  cause  of  my  fatigue  . . .  over  the  years  I  took  every  anti-depressant 
in every dosage and in every combination with other drugs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

31 

I stopped drinking for many years with no positive change in my symptoms. 
From  mid  to  late  1990s  I  was  checked  for  every  form  of  cancer,  and  had  every 
organ  x-rayed,  MRI’d  and  ultrasounded.  I  had  tubes  and  cameras  stuck  up  both 
ends. 

After  years  of  hoping  to  find  relief  but  not  getting  any  better,  1  day  one  of  my 
psychiatrists  told  me  a  probable  reason  NONE  of  these  drugs  had  any  effect  could 
be if I had an organic brain injury. He then asked if I ever had a concussion? That 
was  in  1999,  and  that  was  the  first  time  any  doctor  had  ever  asked  me  about  con-
cussions. 

I  was  sent  to  neurologists  and  had  brain  scans  and  SPECT  scans  and  all  kinds 
of  testing  done.  The  scans  showed  the  exact  location  of  the  brain  injury,  and  they 
explained  how  the  areas  damaged  correlated  to  the  symptoms  I  was  having,  both 
the temporary loss of sight in 1980 and the lingering symptoms of depression, head-
aches,  fatigue,  dizziness.  They  said  the  concussions  also  gave  me  ‘‘trauma-induced 
A.D.D.’’. 

I  was  relieved  to  find  a  medical  cause  after  all  those  years.  For  over  15  years  I 
had been stung by words like ‘‘lazy’’, ‘‘crazy’’, ‘‘alcoholic’’ , ‘‘failure’’, and all this was 
from  my  loved  ones!  My  employers  were  even  harder  on  me.  Worst  of  all,  I  came 
to believe it myself. I thought my failures were from a character flaw. 

I lost my home, my car, my first marriage, and job after job after job. I was then 
a  single  father,  and  we  were  scrambling  for  a  roof  over  our  heads.  (I  divorced  in 
1992,  and  was  a  single  Dad  until  marrying  Gina  in  2004)  We  lived  in  some  nice 
places  sometimes,  but  we  were  homeless  at  others.  We  lived  in  cheap  motels  and 
even had to pitch a tent in a campground more than once. 

My  son  went  without  getting  his  needs  met,  my  son  Anders  is  the  REAL  victim 
of  this  crime.  Even  in  the  years  after  we  filed  our  disability  claim,  and  the  NFL 
knew we were in dire straits, my son lost teeth because of lack of basic dental care, 
he had a significant vision problem that needed surgery in kindergarten and glasses 
thereafter.  He  went  to  school  every  day  with  old  beat  up  scratched  glasses  that  no 
man could see thru. He has learning disorders that I could not afford tutoring help 
for, and he was always grading poorly in school. 

But this kid has tenacity, he still showed up to school everyday with a smile, did 
homework  without  argument,  got  straight  ‘‘O’s’’  for  Outstanding  citizenship  but  D’s 
and  F’s  for  the  class  grade.  He  never  quit,  never  gave  up,  never  gave  in  and  took 
up drugs or any of the temptations of this era . . . and he is now a fine young man, 
a  high  school  grad  in  2006  and  a  fireman  in  training.  He  is  spending  this  summer 
fighting  wildfires  for  the  BLM.  My  son  Anders  has  suffered  so  greatly,  so  much  of 
it  purposefully  at  the  hands  of  Tom  Condon  and  the  NFL,  and  I  love  and  admire 
him for his perseverance. 

When  I  think  of  what  the  corrupt  NFL  Disability  Board  needlessly  put  my  child 

through is when I get my angriest! 

We  did  get  help  from  the  NFL  Players  Assistance  Trust,  but  it  was  $5,000  that 
could not be given directly to me. It helped pay past doctor bills, yes, but it did not 
alleviate the stress and fear of where would we sleep tomorrow and how was I going 
to feed and clothe my son. 

Now to what I’m here to describe, the fraud and corruption of the NFL Disability 

process. 

Once  my  team  of  treating  doctors  concluded  clearly  that  I  had  suffered  organic 
brain  damage  from  NFL  concussions,  and  that  I  was  total  and  permanently  dis-
abled,  we  filed  my  claim  with  the  NFL.  I  was  helped  by  a  good  friend  and  fellow 
UCLA alum Barry Axelrod. Barry is both an attorney and a prominent sports agent, 
but  he  was  neither  to  me.  He  was  just  a  friend  helping  a  friend,  for  free.  We  sub-
mitted piles of doctor’s reports and brain scans. 

Upon filing my claim, I was told by Miki Yaras-Davis of the NFLPA not to bother 
filing,  her  exact  words  were  ‘‘the  owners  will  never  open  that  can  of  worms’’  by 
granting a claim for concussions. 

Shortly  after  that,  my  Vikings  medical  files  mysteriously  ‘‘disappeared’’.  The 
courts were never made aware of this. Medical files are sacred to a player, we were 
not ever allowed in the same room with them. We had to trust that after our career 
the NFL would store the files and present them in the event of a claim. 

In  essence,  they  destroyed  the  evidence  that  would  have  easily  proven  my  claim. 
The 9th Circuit would mistakenly hold that against ME, not them, and said without 
any  contemporaneous  notes  the  Disability  Board  could  send  me  from  one  doctor  to 
another. 

There were contemporaneous notes, I believe Groom Law destroyed them to clear 

their path for manipulation of the process. 

Now  starts  the  process  of  seeing  an  NFL  doctor  to  see  if  he  agrees  or  disagrees 
with  my  claim.  I  am  living  in  San  Diego,  they  send  me  to  an  NFL  chosen  neurolo-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

32 

gist in San Diego, Dr. J Sterling Ford. Dr Ford not only totally agrees with my doc-
tor’s  and  approves  my  claim,  this  NFL  doctor  voluntarily  asks  me  to  come  back  a 
second day to test for vertigo, which he suspected I was suffering as a result of the 
concussions.  His  testing  confirmed  his  suspicions;  according  to  the  NFL’s  own  neu-
rologist I do have vertigo caused by head injury. 

So  at  this  point  we  have  several  of  my  treating  physicians  and  the  NFL’s  own 

doctor all agreeing, we feel that will mean automatic approval. 

Barry Axelrod organizes a group of his Major League Baseball clients and friends 
and  other  UCLA  alumni  to  create  a  charity  to  move  my  son  and  I  out  of  the  cheap 
motel  we  were  living  in  and  into  an  apartment  near  his  school.  They  believe,  with 
all of this overwhelming evidence in my favor, it will only be a matter of weeks until 
the next Board meeting that they will need to support me. There was no way I could 
be denied my claim! These guys were not doing this for publicity, quite the opposite. 
The individual identities of this group from 2000–2002 was not known to me, other 
than Barry Axelrod, until last February’s ESPN report. 

The  group  included  the  great  baseball  players  Mark  Grace,  Rick  Sutcliffe,  Jeff 
Bagwell; actor Mark Harmon, NBA legend Bill Walton and his ex-NFL player broth-
er  Bruce,  and  many  others.  Without  the  help  of  these  guys,  I  would  not  have  sur-
vived to be here today. Along with Pastor Don Seltzer and the folks at North Coast 
Presbyterian Church in Encinitas, CA. They cared about my son and me . . . while 
at  the  exact  same  time  the  NFL  didn’t  give  a  damn  if  we  died,  in  fact  they  hoped 
I  would  put  a  bullet  in  my  head  and  solve  their  problem,  and  were  busy  scheming 
a way to deny my benefits. 

The  NFL  decided  not  to  listen  to  their  own  first  doctor,  because  his  opinion  was 
in  favor  of  a  player,  so  the  NFL  selects  a  second  doctor  of  their  own  choosing,  this 
time  a  psychiatrist  in  Long  Beach,  CA.  His  name  is  very  long,  Dr.  Branko 
Radisavljevic, but he says to call him Dr. Branko. 

Dr.  Branko  enthusiastically  supports  my  claim,  and  joins  every  other  doctor  to 
this  point.  Every  doctor  had  the  same  opinion,  it  was  all  one  voice  that  included 
my own doctors and now TWO NFL doctors. Unfortunately for Condon and Ells, all 
these reports were FAVORABLE to a disabled player . . . that’s no good. . . . 

The Board meets every 90 days, we know there is no way they can delay approv-
ing my claim any longer . . . but instead my case is ‘‘tabled’’ at their next meeting, 
meaning  90  more  days  of  stress.  Only  the  next  meeting  doesn’t  bring  approval  ei-
ther. That means 6 extra months now of relying on charity to survive. 

They  DO  decide  at  this  point  that  I  AM  totally  and  permanently  disabled  and 
begin  giving  me  the  $1,500/mo  ‘‘non-football’’  related  disability,  Despite  the  glaring 
fact that every doctor had said it was concussions that caused my suffering. But re-
member, they don’t want to admit it is concussion-related, they ‘‘don’t want to open 
that can of worms’’. 

So after an 8-month delay to give them time to buy a doctor, and 8 more months 
of  relying  on  charity  to  survive,  I  am  forced  to  travel  from  San  Diego  to  Baltimore 
to see Barry Gordon at Johns Hopkins. The reason given is they wanted me to take 
a  sophisticated  neuropsychological  exam. 
test  at  any 
neuropsychologist  in  San  Diego,  as  Social  Security  sent  me  to  when  they  approved 
my  disability  claim  for  post-concussion  . . .  but  they  insisted  I  see  Gordon  and 
ONLY  Gordon.  If  I  refuse  or  hold  out  for  another  doctor,  I  am  told,  I  am  denied. 
Gordon  is  not  on  the  list  of  pre-approved  ‘‘neutral’’  physicians  normally  used  by 
the  Board,  he  is  hand  picked  by  Doug  Ells  of  Groom  Law.  Gordon  is  also  walking 
distance to NFL Benefits headquarters in Baltimore. Axelrod and I smell a rat, but 
we have no choice, if I don’t go I am denied anyway, they will not agree to a doctor 
in Southern California. 

So, I arrange for care for my son, they fly me coast to coast, pay for taxis, meals, 

I  can 

take 

this 

hotels, even replaced clothes when my luggage was lost. 

They went to ALL that expense, but they didn’t go to the most important expense, 
HIRING  A  NEUROPYSCHOLOGIST  to  give  me  the  test.  This  test  takes  years  to 
understand  the  nuances  and  complexities,  and,  especially  in  cases  with  legal  rami-
fications,  should  only  be  given  by  someone  with  a  Ph.D.,  . . .  a  neuropsychologist! 
I  thought  Gordon  was  going  to  be  giving  me  the  test  himself,  that’s  why  all  the 
bother  to  fly  across  country.  But  I  wind  up  seeing  him  for  only  about  30  minutes. 
He bangs my knee with a hammer, tickles the bottom of my feet, and conducts tests 
I  now  am  told  by  neurologists  were  just  for  show  and  his  tests  only  tested  the 
NERVE ENDINGS, not the brain. 

Barry Gordon writes in his report that ‘‘the records available to me are incomplete 
in  ways  that  may  be  relevant  for  my  impressions.’’  He  also  admits  he  didn’t  bother 
to  look  at  the  existing  brain  scans  and  ordered  none  of  his  own.  This  is  like  diag-
nosing  a  broken  leg  without  seeing  an  x-ray—he  was  deciding  my  fate  by  opining 
on a body part he never bothered to look at! 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

33 

Instead of hiring a neuropsychologist to give me this neuropsychological test they 
deem  SO  important  to  deciding  my  case,  this  neuropsychological  test  was  instead 
given to me unsupervised by a young grad student in LINGUISTICS, with no med-
ical background. Her name is Lara Atella. 

Lara  Atella  keeps  apologizing  and  laughing,  she  keeps  telling  me  she  had  never 
seen this test until the day before, and she took it home to practice on her boyfriend. 
I spend 99 percent of my time in Johns Hopkins with Lara, and am sent home won-
dering why I didn’t see much of Dr. Gordon. 

Atella’s  test  result  was  paired  with  Gordon’s  ridiculous  report  stating  that  my 
symptoms  of  headaches,  depression,  dizziness,  and  fatigue  COULD  NOT  BE 
CAUSED BY CONCUSSIONS! 

Let  me  repeat  in  case  you  didn’t  grasp  that—concussions  COULD  NOT  cause 

Does anyone REALLY believe that? 
This  process  has  been  stretched  out  years  when  all  the  doctor’s  reports  were  in 

headaches! 

my favor. 

Armed with a report unfavorable to a player, Within DAYS I am immediately de-
nied  my  claim  by  a  unanimous  vote.  Upshaw  and  his  appointees,  Tom  Condon  and 
Jeff  Van  Note,  and  Len  Teeuws,  my  advocates  in  those  Board  meetings,  never  said 
a word of protest . . . at this point they should have been screaming bloody murder, 
crying  out  this  is  a  bunch  of  bull,  and  insisting  this  fraud  stops  right  there.  You 
know, advocating! Doing their appointed duty! 

None  of  this  could  have  been  possible  without  the  FULL  knowledge,  cooperation, 
and  participation  from  all  sides  on  the  Board.  Commisioner  Taglibue,  Upshaw,  the 
NFLPA,  and  especially  Tom  Condon  and  Jeff  Van  Note.  And  it  was  all  masterfully 
orchestrated  by  Doug  Ell  of  Groom  Law  Group,  located  at  1701  Pennsylvania  Ave 
across the street from the White House. 

What’s  worse,  as  my  only  advocates  allowed  in  Board  meetings,  Condon  and  Up-
shaw and Upshaw’s other appointees never once, including to this day, returned my 
phone calls, letters or e-mails. Or made any effort to understand my case. They sim-
ply followed orders from Doug Ell and Groom Law. 

They will tell you they found the first two NFL doctor’s reports ‘‘equivocal.’’ I have 
spoken  with  those  two  NFL  doctors  since,  and  they  are  furious  I  was  denied  and 
furious they were characterized as equivocal. I hope you can subpoena them. These 
doctors  will  tell  you  NO  ONE,  not  even  my  advocates,  had  ever  called  for  clarifica-
tion.  The  NFL  couldn’t  risk  clarifying,  they  didn’t  want  the  truth.  It  was  easier  to 
wait 8 months and fly me cross country than to pick up a phone? 

As  they  teach  in  law  school,  don’t  ask  a  question  if  you  don’t  want  the  answer. 
If you read Dr. Gordon’s report, you will find a gold mine of equivocalization. The 
fine  tooth  comb  used  by  Groom  Law  to  play  semantics  with  doctors  who  approved 
my claim is suddenly missing when a report supports denial. 

Not only that, but the first two doctors filled out the required NFL questionnaire. 
This  is  where  they  avoid  confusion  and  are  asked  to  check  boxes  simply  yes  or  no. 
Both Ford and Branko checked ‘‘yes’’ to the questions ‘‘am I disabled from an injury’’ 
and  ‘‘was  this  injury  a  result  of  playing  football’’  Both  checked  Yes.  Period.  Case 
closed. 

Despite  many  demands  on  record  from  NFL  Benefits  Office  to  Gordon  to  attach 
his  questionnaire  to  his  invoice  or  he  wouldn’t  get  paid,  he  never  filled  that  form 
out.  And  he  was  paid.  That  leaves  HIS  report  incomplete.  Gordon  never  answers 
the question ‘‘is my disability ‘‘football-related’’!!! 

Gordon’s  report  gives  possible  alternative  reasons  for  my  symptoms,  which  in-
cluded  chronic  pain  and  other  football-related  causes,  so  maybe  he  still  could  have 
checked  the  box  ‘‘yes’’  when  asked  if  my  disability  was  football  related  . . .  all  he 
said  was  it  was  impossible  to  link  headaches  with  concussions.  We  still  don’t  know 
Gordon’s answer to that question! 

Wait, you think this is bad enough already? Here’s where it gets even better. . . . 
The most important and most damning proof of fraud and doctor shopping comes 
from Dr. Gordon himself. After my 9th Circuit case, I found this 1990 medical jour-
nal,  containing  an  article  by  our  same  Barry  Gordon.  It’s  titled  ‘‘postconcussional 
syndrome’’.  You  only  need  read  the  first  paragraph  to  see  he  is  adamant  that  my 
symptoms,  headache,  depression,  dizziness,  and  fatigue  are  THE  MOST  COMMON 
SYMPTOMS  of  post  concussion.  He  even  makes  it  easier  for  the  reader,  he  creates 
a chart, table 1, titled ‘‘most common symptoms of post concussion’’ . . . right there 
in  that  list  are  ALL  of  my  symptoms,  the  same  symptoms,  that  when  paid  by  the 
NFL he wrote were impossible to link to concussions. 

His article also says he orders a brain scan ‘‘in essentially all patients’’. He didn’t 

go to that bother with me. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

34 

If  that’s  not  proof  of  fraud  and  corruption,  than  we  need  to  remove  the  words 

fraud and corruption from our vocabulary. 

The  only  reason  they  aren’t  in  jail  is  that  there  are  some  holes  in  Federal  Laws 
that you in Congress need to fix to help EVERY American worker, mainly the ‘‘full 
discretion’’  allowed  to  the  Board,  and  you  need  to  return  the  ‘‘treating  physician 
rule’’  removed  from  law  by  Groom  Law  Group’s  secret  intervention  in  Supreme 
Court ‘‘Nord v. Black &Decker’’ (my attorney was on the losing end of that decision). 
The  NFLPA  fiercely  tries  to  claim  no  responsibility  in  our  claim  denials.  Here  is 
a quote from Feb. 11, 2007 ESPN article on my case by John Barr and Arty Berko, 
that  accompanied  their  story  on  me  on  ESPN  TV’s  ‘‘Outside  the  Lines,’’  catching 
Gene Upshaw in flat out lies: 

‘‘While  nobody  from  the  NFLPA  would  speak  with  ESPN  about  Boyd’s  case, 
NFLPA Executive Director Gene Upshaw did address Boyd’s allegations at a re-
cent news conference. 
‘‘To say that the NFLPA is ‘doctor shopping,’ we don’t have anything to do with 
it, with the process,’’ Upshaw said. 

The  facts  say  otherwise.  The  retirement  board,  the  ultimate  authority  on  dis-
ability  cases,  is  made  up  of  three  league  and  three  union  representatives.  To  say 
the union has nothing to do with the process is simply untrue. 

Upshaw went on to say, ‘‘If a doctor determines that a player is entitled to a dis-
ability and he meets the standards he gets it.’’ But in Boyd’s case, two doctors, cho-
sen  by  the  retirement  board,  determined  his  disability  was  football-related  and  his 
claim was still rejected. 

The  NFLPA  is  quoted  recently  as  saying  they  were  only  doing  what  ERISA  de-
mands  them  to  do.  In  other  words,  ‘‘The  devil  made  them  do  it!’’  Nonsense.  ERISA 
demands  that  they  look  EQUALLY  as  hard  for  evidence  to  APPROVE  a  claim  as 
they look for evidence to DENY a claim. That clearly is not happening in the NFL. 
The real ‘‘devil that made them do it’’ is in reality Doug Ell and Groom Law, with 

their scorch and burn, leave no witnesses, win at all cost strategies. 

This NFL Disability Board has blinders on and only seeks reasons to DENY. 
Courts  are  hogtied  by  the  ‘‘full  discretion’’  wording,  and  the  absence  of  discovery 
and  depositions  in  ERISA  cases.  Only  you  in  Congress,  with  your  oversight  of  the 
NFL,  and  your  gifting  of  anti-trust  exemptions,  and  your  power  of  subpoena  under 
oath, can fix this scam. 

ERISA  gives  the  Board  ‘‘full  discretion’’,  which  is  the  opposite  of  what  they  are 
claiming  now  in  public.  Instead  of  LIMITING  their  options,  ‘‘full  discretion’’  gives 
the  Board  the  widest  possible  range  of  options  possible.  The  only  restrictions  on 
their ‘‘discretion’’ are what their stomachs and conscience had handle. 

ERISA  does  not  ‘‘force’’  the  Board  to  ignore  evidence  supporting  players’  claims, 
nor to draw up elaborate doctor shopping schemes to defeat them, as Dave Duerson 
recently hinted. (Duerson is the newest robot member of the Board) 

Congress gives the Board ‘‘full discretion’’ through ERISA, which gives the Board 
absolute  power.  AND  WE  ALL  KNOW  THAT  ABSOLUTE  POWER  CORRUPTS!. 
Please eliminate the ‘‘full discretion’’ wording in ERISA. 

A 1994 OSHA study said life expectancy for NFL players is 55 years, 52 for line-
men . . . that is why Condon and the Board’s tactics are to ‘‘delay, deny, and hope 
we die. . . .’’ 

I  beg  this  Committee  to  hold  further  hearings,  subpoena  Tom  Condon,  Gene  Up-
shaw,  Doug  Ell,  Paul  Tagliubue,  and  Barry  Gordon.  Clean  house  in  the  NFL  Dis-
ability Board, punish Groom Law and Tom Condon and Gene Upshaw for their con-
flicts of interests and selfish greedy actions. 

And most of all, someone FINALLY hold the NFL/NFLPA accountable for all the 
needless  suffering  that  their  blatant  doctor  shopping  and  fraudulent  claims  denials 
have caused countless NFL retired players. 

I also welcome questions regarding ‘‘88 Plan’’. 
I have e-mailed several attachments to my testimony and ask that they all be offi-

cially included in the record. 

Thank You, 

BRENT BOYD 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

35 

ATTACHMENT 2 

‘‘THE BOYD PLAN’’ 

Brief Outline: 
1.  Fire  Groom  Law—there  can  and  will  be  no  trust  until  Groom  is  replaced. 
Groom  Law  is  a  symbol  of  years  of  too  many  unfair  decisions,  questionable  tactics, 
doctor  shopping,  needless  suffering,  needless  homelessness,  needless  deaths,  need-
less suicides—Groom Law must go before any healing begins! 

2.  Eliminate  the  ‘‘full  discretion’’  wording  or  implication  in  our  plan;  investigate 
etiology of ‘‘full dicretion’’ into our plan; full discretion equals absolute power; abso-
lute power corrupts—and predictably we have seen that abuse as the outcome of al-
lowing full discretion to NFL disability board. We need checks and balances. 

3.  Define  the  plan’s  definition  of  ‘‘disability’’  in  terms  set  in  stone  and  easily  un-
derstood  by  all,  in  definitive  terms  that  will  be  easily  interpreted  the  same  way  by 
players,  the  board  and  every  court—not  open  to  Groom’s  manipulation  (full  discre-
tion—and  Groom—will  be  gone  so  that  will  help)  and  remake  this  new  definition 
of  disability  so  that  it  is  not  so  overwhelmingly  prohibitive  to  approval  of  claim— 
don’t continue with Groom’s ever changing and impossible to meet definition. 

Current unwritten but strictly adhered to definitions of disability include the infa-
mous ‘‘can he sell pencils on the street corner’’ quote or ‘‘wash windshields’’ criteria, 
which  are  obscene  and  must  be  eliminated  along  with  all  those  who  support  these 
draconian standards. The men who built this multi-billion dollar league deserve dig-
nity if not wealth. 

And eliminate the ‘‘15 years after playing’’ limit for full benefits, most disabilities 
don’t  degenerate  into  full  disabilities  until  long  after  that  period.  It  is  when  guys 
enter their 50s and beyond that these disabilities become debilitating and they can’t 
live on the lesser benefit amount . . . and remember, OSHA says NFL linemen life 
expectancy is 52 years. 

4.  Ensure  transparency—shine  the  light!  Print  the  minutes  of  board  meetings, 
record  all  debates,  report  each  vote—allow  Congressional  representatives  to  sit  in 
on  any  meeting  at  will.  The  NFL  disability  board  shall  no  longer  act  as  a  secret 
medieval organization. 

5. Treating physician rule—give more weight to our own doctors who treat us reg-
ularly for years than is given to opposing doctors who see us for 30 minutes. Reim-
burse  the  plan  for  all  fees  paid  to  Groom  Law  when  they  covertly  helped  remove 
treating physician rule from ERISA—by joining non-football related court cases (e.g., 
Nord  v.  Black  &  Decker  in  Supreme  Court)  those  fees  paid  to  Groom  were  taken 
out  of  our  own  pension  funds—using  our  own  money  to  take  our  own  rights  away, 
all without our knowledge! 

6.  If  NFL’s  own  chosen  physicians  agree  with  a  player’s  claim,  so  should  the  dis-

ability board. 

Doctor  shopping  carries  ‘‘death  penalty’’—similar  to  NCAA  football  programs  in 

violation of certain rules—or gambling in NFL—— 

If  NFL’s  own  chosen  doctor  agrees  with  player’s  claims,  no  more  ignoring  that 
doctor  and  sending  players  to  endless  doctors  until  finally  one  supports  denial.  If 
board  claims  a  doctor  to  be  ‘‘equivocal,’’  simply  pick  up  phone  and  clarify  instead 
of delaying for months and doctor shopping. 

Any  knowledge  of  or  connection  with  doctor-shopping  or  fraudulently  denying  a 
player  his  rightful  benefits  will  result  in  no  further  association  with  NFL  in  any 
capacity, ever—this must be considered a sacred intolerable offense! 

7.  Let  retired  players  select  our  own  3  advocates  to  the  board,  not  selected  by 
NFLPA  executive  director.  Replace  all  existing  board  members.  Active  players’ 
agents  and  actual  or  de  facto  employees  of  NFL  are  not  acceptable  as  players  reps 
board members, they have blatant conflict of interest. 

Destroy  the  longstanding  mentality  of  board  that  defines  ‘‘fiduciary  duties’’  to 
mean only to protect the ‘‘pot of money’’. Players rights and disabled players receiv-
ing  their  rightful  benefits  have  equal  or  greater  weight  to  the  fiduciaries  as  does 
the ‘‘pot of money’’. 

The  board  must  look  equally  as  hard  for  reasons  to  approve  a  claim  as  they  look 
for  reason  to  deny  a  claim.  ‘‘Fiduciary  duties’’  do  not  mean  solely  to  automatically 
reject  a  player’s  claim  and  save  the  plan’s  money.  Give  players’  rights  equal  atten-
tion, equal rights, and even more protection than the ‘‘pot of money.’’ 

8.  Allow  players  and/or  representative  to  attend  board  meetings—that’s  not  cur-
rently  allowed  (at  least  not  at  time  of  my  claim)—especially  allow  them  to  attend 
the final appeals meeting. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

36 

Stop holding board meetings at 5-star resorts, meet at more practical locations so 
players  can  afford  to  attend;  also  it  will  stop  wasting  our  precious  plan  money! 
(Aren’t they claiming we are short on cash?) 

9. Add 3 medical professionals to board, not just to explain complex medical issues 
to the otherwise all-laymen board—but give these doctors votes! This will eliminate 
the 3 to 3 votes that lead to doctor shopping. Pay these doctors out of a blind trust 
favoring neither side, rotate these doctors often to prevent the buying of doctors by 
the league that has been suspected in the past. 

The  doctors  on  the  board  shall  have  no  information  as  to  the  financial  health  of 
the pension fund, and shall leave the room when any issues other than medical are 
discussed. 

10.  Write  the  rules.  Once  and  for  all.  This  sounds  simple  but  has  not  happened 
successfully.  Currently  Groom  Law  unilaterally  makes  up  or  changes  rules  on  the 
fly to suit their needs, at the expense of players’ rights. Right now rules and regula-
tions are a moving target. 

11.  No  more  lengthy,  strategic,  and  painful  delays.  Keep  the  claims  process  and 

voting a fluid process. 

Hold  meetings  monthly  instead  of  every  90  days—more  often  using  modern  tech-
nology. Send player to a doctor immediately after he files a claim. Send all doctor’s 
reports  immediately  to  player/attorney  to  allow  speedy  response.  Use  today’s  tech-
nology to keep the process moving. 

12. The current system of two ‘‘gatekeepers’’ was not in place at time of my claim, 
but  like  most  elements  of  Groom  Law’s  changes  to  our  plan,  all  without  valid  plan 
purposes,  this  one  doesn’t  pass  the  ‘‘smell  test’’  either.  A  one  to  one  tie  means  de-
nial?  This  is  obviously  Doug  Ell’s  ideal  vision  of  a  plan,  the  player  has  no  chance 
from the get-go. 

13.  This  one  is  for  Congress  only—remove  ‘‘full  discretion’’  and  ‘‘deference’’  from 
not  only  the  NFL  plan  but  from  ERISA;  sit  in  on  NFL  disability  board  meetings 
at your pleasure; 

Set  goals  and  expectations  for  the  disability  board  to  meet  annually  in  order  to 
keep  anti-trust  and  other  Congressional  gifts,  without  which  they  could  not  exist. 
Do  not  allow  certain  disabilities—especially  concussions!—to  be  constantly  denied 
as  disability  claims.  Congress  must  step  in  to  permanently  protect  the  brain  dam-
aged players. 

For  the  sake  of  all  American  workers  everywhere,  rework  ERISA!  ERISA  is  a 

mess. ERISA is a disaster for American workers, a gold mine for attorneys. 

Keep Congressional oversight and pressure on the NFL disability board . . . play-

ers desperately depend on your protection! 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Boyd, thank you very much. Let me thank 

all the members of this panel. 

We  have  two  panels  today,  with  ten  witnesses.  I  want  to  have 
the next panel begin testifying at a quarter after 11. That’s 10 min-
utes from now. And I’m sorry we don’t have unlimited time, but we 
will  begin  a  series  of  votes  on  the  floor  of  the  Senate  at  12:15.  So, 
we’re—let me make a couple of comments. 

First  of  all,  the  panel  that  we  have  heard  from  first  is  a  panel 
that  has  very  strong  feelings  about  this  issue.  I  think  it—you  con-
tribute  to  a  body  of  knowledge  here,  and  information,  that  de-
scribes  a  problem.  You  know,  I  mean—and  we’re  going  to  have  a 
second  panel  in  which  some  of  that  will  be  reacted  to,  some  of  it 
will be described again. 

But I’ve written a list of questions. I—what I’m going to want to 
do  is  submit  some  questions  to  you  in  writing,  if  you’re  willing  to 
respond to them. 

You raise a lot of important things. You know, Mr. Johnston, just 
very quickly, the concussion issues—seems to me that’s probably a 
very  significant  issue  in  this  sport,  probably  not  very  well  de-
scribed,  or  not  very  well  discussed  in  the  early  years  of  the  sport. 
Do you think it’s been addressed now for current players? It is ob-
viously  safer,  they  have  more  procedures.  Is  it  addressed  suffi-
ciently for current players? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

37 

Mr.  JOHNSTON.  More  so  now  than  it  was  in  the  past.  There  are 
improvements in equipment. There are a lot of different things that 
have contributed to that. But the protocol for getting a player back 
onto  the  field,  he  has  to  pass  a  series  of  tests.  They  are  forced 
sometimes, with the severity of the concussion, to sit out the game 
the  following  week.  So,  they  are  making  some  strides  there.  But, 
back  in  the  day,  back  when  Mr.  Boyd  played,  it  was  a  badge  of 
honor to go out on the field. We joked with each other, ‘‘The light’s 
on, but nobody’s home.’’ ‘‘The elevator doesn’t go to the top.’’ So, we 
wore  that  as  a  badge  of  honor  back  at  that  time.  It’s  changed,  but 
it’s  an  issue  that  is  going  to  affect  the  players  from  the  previous 
generation, absolutely. 

Senator  DORGAN.  One  of  the  overlying  questions  here  is  that 
Commissioner Goodell represents the owners and Mr. Upshaw rep-
resents  current  players  for  the  Players  Association.  The  question 
is—and I will ask others about this in the next panel, as well—the 
implication, I guess, is that the retired players don’t have an advo-
cate,  or  are  not  represented.  And  I  think  Mr.  Upshaw  will  say, 
‘‘Well,  we  have  bargained  and  made  some  substantial  changes  to 
try to improve things.’’ But we will ask some questions about that. 
I’ve  been  joined  by  several  colleagues.  I’d  like  very  much  to  call 
the second panel up at 11:15. We, unfortunately, don’t have unlim-
ited  time  this  morning,  because  of  the  votes  that  will  occur  in  the 
Senate. 

Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for 

putting this together. 

I  wanted  to  welcome  Mr.  Boyd,  who’s  a  former  Viking.  And  Mr. 
Boyd  knows  well  that  my  father  used  to  cover  the  Vikings  and 
wrote  several  books  including  ‘‘True  Hearts  and  Purple  Heads,’’ 
and ‘‘Will the Vikings Ever Win the Super Bowl?’’ and ‘‘Will Amer-
ica Accept Love at Halftime,’’ my favorite one. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. But I just wanted to thank you for sharing 
your  difficult  story  today.  And  I  think  that  all  active  players  will 
one day be former players, and the average career, of an NFL play-
er  is  short,  and  I  would  hope  that  active  players  have  a  strong  in-
terest  in  the  fair  treatment  of  retired  players.  I  appreciated  you 
coming,  Mr.  Boyd,  and  sharing  your  story  with  me,  as  well  as  the 
other  players.  I’m  sure  that  everyone  can  agree  that  the  NFL  and 
the  NFL  Players  Association  would  do  best  if  they  came  to  an 
agreement  in  a  fair  and  an  appropriate  way  about  how  former 
players should be treated. 

I  have  one  quick  question,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  that  is—of  some 
of  the  retired  players—what  were  your  understandings  about  your 
retirement  when  you  were  an  active  player?  Did  anyone  ever  ex-
plain to you how your retirement plan worked? What advice would 
you  give  now  to  active  players  about  their  consideration  of  their 
benefits as they go forward? 

Mr.  BOYD.  Real  quickly—and  they  can  answer,  too—but  we  un-
derstood  that  it  would  be  physical,  orthopaedic  risk.  And,  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

38 

know,  I  have  all  that—replaced  knee  and  replaced  hip’s  coming 
next,  and—but  they  never  explained  to  us  was  that  concussions 
would  have  the—would—a  mild  concussion  would—could  destroy 
your  life.  We  thought  that  we’d  have  a  safety  net.  NFL  players 
take  incredible  risks  with  their  health  and  their  life,  and  we 
thought  at  least  there  would  be  a  safety  net.  But,  incredibly, 
they’re  paying  millions  of  dollars—the  process  is  there,  the  money 
is  there—they’re  paying  millions  of  dollars  to  get  great  attorneys 
to make sure we don’t get those benefits. 

Mr.  DUERSON.  If  I  understood  the  question  in  regards  to  what 
the  players  knew,  in  terms  of  benefits  and  that  information,  that 
education process is quite thorough, and the players have a full un-
derstanding  in  regards  to  the  choices  they  make.  And,  even  for 
those  players  who—some  years  ago,  who  played—perhaps  in  the 
1960s  and  1970s,  who  took  the  early  retirement  benefits,  signed 
documents  that  they,  in  fact,  yes,  understood  the  penalties  associ-
ated  with  taking  early  retirement,  and  the  ramifications  of  that. 
So,  from  the  standpoint  of  player  reps  on  each  team,  those  meet-
ings, and—as well as seminars that take place—were taking place, 
certainly,  in  the  1980s  when  I  played,  and  they’re  most  certainly 
taking  place  now—that  education  process  is  quite  thorough.  But, 
for  individual  players,  they  have  to  make  those  decisions  them-
selves. 

And  also,  in  regards  to  the  issue  of  Alzheimer’s,  my  father’s  84, 
and, as I had mentioned earlier, Senator, spent 30 years with Gen-
eral  Motors.  He  also  has—he  has  Alzheimer’s  and  brain  damage, 
but never played a professional sport. So, the challenge, you know, 
in  terms  of  where  the  damage  comes  from,  is  a  fair  question,  and 
one that—you know, that has been addressed, and that—and is one 
that we, in fact, ask. 

But  I  would  just  say,  to  Mr.  Boyd,  that  I’ve  never  received  a 

phone call from him. 

Mr. BOYD. Well, he is new, he wasn’t—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. All right. 
Mr. BOYD.—there during my process. 
Mr. DUERSON. Well, but various names were mentioned, and so— 
and  then  I  was  a  trustee  at  that  time,  as  well,  and  I  can  tell  you 
that, for any player who’s ever given me a call, I’ve—— 

Mr. BOYD. They don’t—ask my wife—there are plenty of people— 

we’ve got a stack of letters—who had called. 

Mr. JOHNSTON. Mr. Duerson’s statement that his father has Alz-
heimer’s and he worked for GM at a plant, and that automatically 
excludes NFL—— 

Mr. DUERSON. No, I didn’t say—— 
Mr.  JOHNSTON.  Well,  that’s  the  reasoning,  that’s  the—that’s  the 

line you’re trying to connect. 

ish. 

Mr. DUERSON. No, I’m not, Moose, I—— 
Mr. JOHNSTON. And—well, but if—just let me finish. Let me fin-

Senator  DORGAN.  Can  we  let  Mr.  Johnston  speak,  here,  please? 
Mr. DUERSON. Well—but he’s putting words in my mouth. 
Mr. JOHNSTON. Well, I’m not—but that’s—— 
Senator DORGAN. One at a time, please. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

39 

Mr.  JOHNSTON.—the  process—that’s  how  we  understand  the 
process  to  be,  that  they’re  looking  for  ways  to  deny  claims.  We 
don’t  know  if  it’s  a  100  percent  certainty  that  playing  in  the—the 
National  Football  League  will  cause  you  to  have  early  onset  Alz-
heimer’s  or  dementia.  We  don’t  know  that  100  percent.  But  there 
is definite information that leads us that way. And, you know, try-
ing  to—trying  to  prevent  one  or  two  or  three  people  going  through 
this system and receiving benefits, and tightening the purse strings 
down  is  turning  your  back  and  denying  benefits  to  the  other  98 
percent,  99  percent  of  the  people  who  rightfully  qualify.  That’s  the 
impression  that  we  get,  as  players,  is  there  is  so  much  concern 
about  opening  Pandora’s  Box  and  these  funds  being  depleted,  that 
you’re turning your back on everybody that rightfully deserves this 
disability payment. 

Senator DORGAN. Let me just say, we will not serve the interests 
of  the  inquiry  of  this  hearing  if  we  don’t  get  the  second  panel  up, 
because we’ve spent nearly an hour on this panel. 

I’ll  call  on  Senator  McCaskill  and  then  Senator  Kerry,  and  then 

I want to call the second panel up. 

Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman—I heard you call 

Conrad Dobler’s name, and I guess he’s not here? 

Senator DORGAN. He’s here. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  Oh,  hi,  Conrad.  I  used  to  represent  Conrad 
on  some  matters  as  a  lawyer  in  Kansas  City.  And  I  certainly  was 
a  big  fan  of  your  dad’s,  Mr.  Webster,  as  a  Chiefs  season  ticket-
holder for a number of years. 

I really am going to please you, Mr. Chairman, because my ques-
tions really are probably more appropriate for the second panel, be-
cause  what  I  want  to  talk  about  is  financial  transparency.  I  want 
to talk about the fact that the disability fund and pension fund has 
a  billion  dollars  in  assets,  and  the  fact  that  the  retired  players 
don’t  have  a  good  sense  of  exactly  how  that’s  earning  money,  ex-
actly how it’s being paid out, whether or not it is financially viable, 
in  terms  of  being  more  generous,  in  terms  of  disability  determina-
tions  and  taking  care  of  the  players  that  have  taken  care  of  fans 
for as long as the game has been in existence. And so, I will with-
hold  my  questions,  and  hopefully  I’ll  be  here  by  the  time  it’s  time 
to  do  that.  If  not,  I’ll  make  sure  they  get  answered  for  the  record. 
But thank you all for being here. And we will do our best to see 
if we can’t alleviate some of the pain and suffering that is ongoing 
with retired NFL players. 

Mr. BOYD. Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator McCaskill, thank you very much. 
Senator Kerry? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you.  I  apologize  for  being 

late. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

40 

Just  very  quickly,  because  we  do  want  to  hear  from  the  second 
panel—obviously,  America  loves  this  game.  It’s  important  to  our 
national  fabric.  And  it’s  a  great  game,  and  people  respect  those  of 
you who played it, and particularly those retired players who have 
built  what  we  have  today,  this  extraordinary  franchise,  something 
like 67,000 spectators per game across the country. It’s the highest- 
watched domestic sport—professional sport in the Nation. The rev-
enues  are  extraordinary,  $6  billion  annually.  And  you  have  this 
fund of $1.1 billion. And I think most Americans would look at this 
today and say, ‘‘Wow, what is the Congress doing getting into this, 
and why do they have to, and what’s going on in this relationship?’’ 
It seems to me that a league as wealthy and as successful as the 
National  Football  League,  built  on  the  contribution  of  a  bunch  of 
gifted  athletes,  who,  two-thirds  of  them  have  suffered  an  injury 
that  required  either  surgery  or  an  eight-game  absence,  50  percent 
of  whom  retire  because  of  an  injury,  60  percent  of  whom  had  had 
a  concussion,  a  quarter  of  whom  have  had  multiple  concussions— 
it  seems  to  me  the  League  itself  is  dropping  the  ball  here,  no  pun 
intended, in terms of, just, its relationship with these people. 

What  do  you  do  in  the  face  of  that  kind  of  wealth,  that  kind  of 
money  being  made  by  people  who  never  touch  the  field  except  to 
walk on it, congratulate the guys who played, and people are strug-
gling with the aftereffects in the way that they are? There isn’t any 
physician  in  the  country,  or  any  person  who’s  a  weekend  athlete, 
who  doesn’t  understand  what  happens  to  the  body  as  it  gets  older 
and what happens to you as a consequence of early injuries of any 
kind. 

So,  my  hope  is,  the  League  will  get  its  act  together  here.  That’s 
really what’s needed. Better communication, a standardized sort of 
understanding of the process. And, frankly, a presumption in favor 
of  those  who  went  out  on  the  field  and  put  themselves  at  risk  in 
the way that they do on a weekly basis. 

So,  I  hope  we  don’t  have  to  do  something.  And,  Mr.  Chairman, 
I’m  sure  you  are—I  am  prepared,  if  the  League  doesn’t  do  that,  to 
introduce—which I would hope we wouldn’t ever have to do—legis-
lation  to  create  some  kind  of  appropriate  accountability  and  over-
sight. I hope that it never comes to that. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Kerry, thank you very much. 
Senator  Thune,  we  have  just  finished  with  the  first  panel  and 
are about to call up the second panel. Would you want to be recog-
nized now, or would you like to wait til the—— 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Mr. Chairman, I’d be happy—I’ve got an opening 
statement  I’ll  include  for  the  record.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  hold-
ing  the  hearing,  and  appreciate  those  who  have  come  today  to 
share their stories and testify. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Thune follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 
I would like to thank Senator Dorgan for convening this hearing. I would also like 
to  thank  our  witnesses  for  taking  time  out  of  their  schedules  to  testify  before  our 
committee today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

41 

I  grew  up  watching  the  Green  Bay  Packers  and  it  pains  me  to  think,  as  it  does 
many  Americans,  that  some  of  our  former  football  heroes  are  struggling  to  make 
ends meet. Some of the stories we have heard today at the hearing as well as those 
recently  highlighted  in  news  and  magazine  articles  are  heart-wrenching.  It  is 
counter-intuitive  to  think  of  strong,  well-paid  NFL  players,  leaving  the  game,  and 
falling into lives of pain, disability, and even poverty. 

I hope today’s hearing helps shine the light on these issues and helps bring play-
ers, management and former players together to find a solution. If we step back and 
compare the pension and disability plans for NFL players to the plans most Ameri-
cans have access to, the NFL players are well ahead of the curve. Therefore I hope 
the opposing sides can work this out on their own. 

Senator DORGAN. Thank you very much. 
Let  me  just  say,  as  we  release  this  panel,  we  will  be  submitting 

some questions to you. 

Mr.  Bain,  Mr.  Boyd,  for  example,  your  testimony—I  understand 
the passion and the emotion. This is not a debate about some idea, 
this is about your lives. And so, I understand that, and I very much 
appreciate  your  willingness—and,  Mr.  Webster—your  willingness 
to  come—Mr.  Duerson,  thank  you  for  being  here,  and  Mr.  John-
ston,  as  well—to  come  and  be  a  part  of  this  discussion.  It’s  a  very 
important discussion. And so, we will be submitting some questions 
to you. But many of you have come great distance to present testi-
mony,  and  we  are  very  grateful  for  that.  Thank  you  very,  very 
much. 

Mr.  BOYD.  Ms.  McCaskill,  if  I  can  add  one  stat  that’ll  be  impor-
tant  before  you  get  to  the  second—and  it’s  only  5  seconds.  1994 
OSHA  study,  life  expectancy  for  NFL  players,  for  total  players,  is 
55 years; for the big linemen like us, is 52 years. And that’s—thus, 
our  slogan  is,  what  they’re  doing  ‘‘Delay,  deny,  hope  we  die.’’  They 
have  incentive  to  drag  their  feet  and  hope  that  nature  takes  its 
course and solves this problem. 

And  the  second  point  is,  they  say,  ‘‘Well,  you—if  you  work  for 
IBM,  you  know,  when  you’re  50,  they  don’t  take  care  of  you.  But 
if you walk in the room, a 50-, 60-year-old IBM veterans, you know, 
most  of  them  aren’t  crippled,  and  half  of  them  aren’t—don’t  have 
dementia.  So,  I  just  wanted  to  let  you  know  there  was  a—that 
OSHA study is very important for you to know. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  thank  this  panel.  We  will  excuse  the 
panel and ask for the second panel to please come forward. Thank 
you very much for your testimony and your appearance. 

The  second  panel  will  include  Mr.  Gene  Upshaw,  the  Executive 
Director  of  the  National  Football  League  Players  Association;  Mr. 
Roger  Goodell,  the  Commissioner  of  the  National  Football  League; 
Mr.  Mike  Ditka,  Member  of  the  National  Football  League  Hall  of 
Fame, former NFL Player and Coach; Mr. Gale Sayers, the—Mem-
ber  of  the  NFL  Hall  of  Fame,  former  NFL  Player  for  the  Chicago 
Bears. 

We  would  ask  that  those  witnesses  come  forward  and  take  their 

place at the witness table. 

[Pause.] 
Senator DORGAN. Let me thank the second panel for coming. And 
I  apologize  that  you  have  had  to  wait,  but  I  think  it  is  probably 
valuable  to  have  heard  the  first  panel.  I  know  many  of  you  have 
traveled long distances to be here, as well, and we appreciate that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

42 

We  will  hear  first  from  Mr.  Gene  Upshaw,  Executive  Director  of 

the National Football League Players Association. 

Mr. Upshaw, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF GENE UPSHAW, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 
NATIONAL FOOTBALL LEAGUE PLAYERS ASSOCIATION 

Mr. UPSHAW. I’m just waiting for a chart that has to get up, but 

I’ll start anyway. 

Senator DORGAN. All right. 
Mr.  UPSHAW.  I  first  want  to  thank  the  Chairman  and  the  panel 

for inviting us here and—to be part of this. 

Before I get started, I’d like to introduce a few players that came 
along  to  hear  the  testimony:  Troy  Vincent,  who  is  the  President  of 
the  NFL  Players  Association,  Eddie  Mason,  Ryan  Kuehl,  Brian 
Mitchell,  and  Brig  Owens.  They’re  all  here  because  they  are  very 
interested in this issue, as all active and retired players are. 

I would first like to say that I am Gene Upshaw. I am the Execu-
tive  Director  of  the  NFL  Players  Association.  And  I  appear  before 
this  committee  at  your  invitation  to  discuss  benefits  provided  for 
NFL players in the National Football League. 

Prior  to  becoming  Executive  Director,  I  played  16  years  in  the 
National  Football  League,  and  I  understand  the  rewards  and  the 
risks  of  playing  this  game.  I’m  also  distressed  when  I  hear  about 
former  players  who  are  hurting  and  are  in  need.  Remember,  I 
played  with  a  lot  of  these  guys,  I  know  a  lot  of  these  guys,  and  I 
played  against  a  lot  of  these  guys.  So,  I’ve  spent  my  entire  profes-
sional life fighting for the rights of players, both active and retired. 
I also recognize that these are emotional issues, that we play an 
emotional  game,  and  this  game  brings  out  some  emotions  that  it 
takes to play it, and it just follows you the rest of your life. 

I’ll ask permission from the Chairman to submit our White Paper 
as  part  of  the  record,  also  my  written  testimony  and  my  summary 
as part of the record. 

Senator DORGAN. Without objection. 
Mr. UPSHAW. Thank you. 
Our  benefits  in  the  National  Football  League  were  forged  in  col-
lective bargaining. In 1993, as part of my first collective bargaining 
agreement  as  Executive  Director,  we  dramatically  improved  both 
pension  and  disability  for  all  players.  I  just  want  to  make  three 
simple points in my presentation. 

First, the NFLPA is proud of the job that we have done for NFL 
players, both active and retired. Players are well compensated and 
enjoy  an  outstanding  benefit  package.  Unlike  many  businesses, 
where  benefits  have  been  reduced,  benefits  for  NFL  players  have 
been  maintained  and  repeatedly  improved.  We  represent  the  best 
practices of labor relations. 

Second, we’re not finished. I think the active players respect and 
empathize  with  the  emotions  and  concerns  expressed  by  retired 
players. That is why we established, in 1984, a Retired Players Di-
vision at the NFL Players Association’s office. And, in 1990, we es-
tablished a Players Assistance Trust, which is funded by the active 
players to help former players in need. In the past 18 months, this 
fund  has  distributed  over  $1.5  million  to  former  players  in  need 
and in financial—that need financial assistance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

43 

When  I  became  Executive  Director,  in  1983,  about  30  percent  of 
the  NFL  revenues  went  to  the  players.  That  has  now  doubled  to 
60  percent  and—of  all  of  the  revenues.  Our  union  had  to  go 
through  some  dark  times  to  achieve  this.  We  had  to  renounce  our 
status as a union, we had to decertify, and we had to bring a legal 
challenge  that  ultimately  led  to  our  present  success.  I  don’t  think 
any  union  has  ever  done  that.  And  many  thought  we  were  crazy, 
but we made it work. We shifted the battle from the picket line to 
the  courtroom  and  forged  a  partnership  with  the  owners  we  are 
proud of today. With labor peace, the game has grown and has ben-
efited both the players, the owners, and the fans. This success has 
allowed  us  to  win  against  prevailing  trends  of  reducing  workers’ 
benefits. 

I  have  some  charts  that  I  brought  me  to,  sort  of,  illustrate  the 

point that we have. 

Chart  1,  that’s  to  my  right  and  your  left,  shows  that,  in  1993, 
we  reached  back,  for  the  first  time,  to  include  all  players  that  had 
no pension, the pre-59ers, and brought them into the pension plan 
in  1993.  This  mean  that  we  brought  in  an  additional  900  players 
and their beneficiaries. 

Each  succeeding  extension—1998,  2002,  and  2006—we  have  im-
proved  the  pension  benefit  credits  for  all  former  players,  and 
they’ve been increased. 

Let’s  turn  to  disability.  I  want  to  begin  by  emphasizing  that  the 
Players  Association—the  members,  the  staff,  and  me  personally— 
are sensitive to the medical, financial, and emotional needs of pro-
fessional  players,  both  active  and  retired.  We  are  distressed  when 
we hear about a player in need, and we’re committed to responding 
to  the  needs  of  all  players.  But  we  reject  the  charges  that  the 
present disability system treats veteran players harshly and denies 
them  access  to  the  benefits.  The  factual  record  disproves  those 
charges. Of course the system can be improved. And Commissioner 
Goodell  and  I  are  determined  to  simplify,  expedite  the  process  of 
these claims. 

Chart  2,  it  summarized  the  disability  decisions  from  1993,  when 
the present categories were put in place and established. We’ve had 
1,052  applicants.  We  have  48  cases  that  are  pending.  We’ve  ap-
proved 428 cases, and we have 776—576 that were denied. 

Of the cases that are denied, there are several reasons why they 
were denied. Some were already drawing pension, some didn’t have 
enough vested years. Just recently, we just added a new disability, 
that’s  been  mentioned  earlier—in  earlier  testimony,  Plan  88.  Plan 
88  was  established  in  honor  of  John  Mackey,  the  great  tight  end 
Hall of Famer who wore number 88 and is suffering from this ter-
rible,  terrible  disease.  It  was  negotiated  between  Paul  Tagliabue 
and myself in the 2006 CBA extension. This benefit was extremely 
important  to  all  of  us  connected  to  the  National  Football  League. 
John  was  the  first  president  of  the  combined  union  in  1970,  and 
we  all  have  tried  to  remain  as  close  to  John  as  we  possibly  can  as 
he deal with this terrible, terrible disease. 

Chart 3 shows in—as of February, when we instituted this plan, 
that  130  applications  were  mailed  out  to  players.  We  received  79 
back,  and,  of  that  79,  60  have  been  approved,  4  have  been  denied, 
and 15 are pending. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

44 

Commissioner  Goodell  and  I  do  not  decide  disability  claims. 
You’ve heard a lot about the Disability Board that sits, and the Re-
tirement  Board  that  sits,  on  behalf  of  the  NFL  players  and  the 
NFL owners. These claims must first go through a two-person Dis-
ability Committee, then it must—if a player is not happy, he can— 
if a player is not happy and there is a deadlock, he can then appeal 
it to the full board, where there are three members, three player— 
former  players—Tom  Condon,  who  is  a  President  of  the  NFLPA— 
former  president;  Jeff  Van  Note,  another  former  President  of  the 
NFLPA,  played  18  years  for  the  Falcons;  and  Dave  Duerson,  who 
testified  earlier.  The  NFL  appoints  team  owners,  and  have  ap-
pointed team owners—Bill Bidwell, of Arizona, Clark Hunt, of Kan-
sas  City,  and  Dick  Cass,  who  is  the  President  of  the  Baltimore 
Ravens. 

If  a  player  is  dissatisfied  with  this  board,  they  have  a  right, 
which  you  have  heard  from  Brent  Boyd,  to  appeal  to  the  Federal 
courts. And we have had several appeals to the Federal courts. 

Most  recently,  the  NFL  and  the  NFLPA  formed  an  alliance, 
bringing  together  over  $7  million,  initially,  to  fund  joint  replace-
ments and to address financial needs and hardships of retired play-
ers.  The  joint  replacement  surgery  will  be  available  at  no  cost  to 
players,  without  insurance,  and  designated—at  designated  hos-
pitals  across  the  country.  All  of  these  benefits  are  paid  for  by  the 
active players. 

Chart  4  shows  that  the  current  players  give  up—what  the  cur-
rent  players  give  up  to  fund  these  benefits.  Our  CBA  allocates  a 
fixed percentage for salaries and benefits. This past year, the active 
players  voluntarily  gave  up  $147.5  million  to  fund  the  benefits  for 
the  retired  players.  That’s  $95  million—I  mean  $96.5  million  to 
fund  pensions,  20  million  to  fund  disability  benefits,  31  million  to 
fund  medical  benefits,  just  for  the  former  players.  And  these  num-
bers  are  growing.  We’ve  had  124-  percent  increase  from  2005  to 
2006 in just pension increase alone. 

The  process  has  cost  active  players  $82,000  per  player  to  fund 
these benefits, which brings me to my third point. I have three sug-
gestions for Congressional consideration to help us in this. 

First, we need standards for workers’ compensation. The current 
state-by-state system causes the vast majority of hurt workers, not 
just  NFL  players,  to  settle  for  a  lump-sum  payment  and  give  up 
their  rights  to  lifetime  medical  for  their  injuries  on  the  job.  Con-
gress  could  impose  Federal  standards  to  allow  workers  to  get  im-
mediate medical care, but still maintain lifetime coverage. 

Second,  the  Federal  law  does  not  allow  a  union  to  manage  the 
plans  alone.  It’s  negotiated  with  an—employees,  and  they  give  a 
fixed  amount.  And,  since  we  are  getting  blamed  for  not  granting 
disabilities,  we  believe  that  we  should  have  the  only  voice  when  it 
comes  to  granting  of  disabilities.  We’re  not  saying  that  the  six 
trustees  have  done  anything  wrong,  or  have—or  we’re  not  criti-
cizing the trustees for the job that they’ve done. 

And,  third,  the  Department  of  Labor,  in  2006,  imposed  a  stand-
ard,  a  different—a  layer  on  disability  decisions.  It’s  an  Initial 
Claims  Committee.  It’s  a—we  think  that  Congress  could  eliminate 
this  requirement,  which  is  another  bottleneck  that  will  help  speed 
up the process. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

45 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Upshaw,  I’m  going  to  have  to  ask  you  to 

summarize, please. 

Mr. UPSHAW. I’m at the end. 
Senator DORGAN. All right. 
Mr.  UPSHAW.  So,  after  16  years  as  an  NFL  player,  and  another 
24 as Executive Director, be assured that no one cares more for the 
players  in  the  National  Football  League,  both  past  and  present, 
than I do. And I’ve spent an awful lot of my lifetime fighting those 
battles  to  protect  those  rights  and  to  give  us  what  we  have  today. 
But our job is not over. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Upshaw follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GENE UPSHAW, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, NATIONAL 

FOOTBALL LEAGUE PLAYERS ASSOCIATION 

Chairman Dorgan and Members of the Committee, I am Gene Upshaw, Executive 
Director of the NFL Players Association (‘‘NFLPA’’). I appear today at the Commit-
tee’s  invitation  to  discuss  the  benefits  provided  to  players  in  the  National  Football 
League (‘‘NFL’’). Prior to becoming Executive Director in 1983, I played 16 years in 
the National Football League. I know the risks and rewards of the game. 

I am distressed when I hear about any former player who is hurting and in need. 
Remember  I  played  with  a  lot  of  these  guys.  I  have  spent  my  entire  professional 
career  fighting  for  the  rights  of  players.  I  also  recognize  these  are  very  emotional 
issues  but  we  cannot  overlook  the  facts.  The  facts  are  the  facts.  I  ask  permission 
to submit for the record our detailed ‘‘White Paper,’’ which describes the retirement, 
disability, health care, and other benefits currently available to NFL players. 

Our benefits were forged in collective bargaining. In 1993, as part of my first col-
lective bargaining agreement as Executive Director, we dramatically improved both 
pension and disability benefits for all players. 

I want to make three simple points. 
First,  the  NFLPA  is  proud  of  the  job  we  have  done  for  NFL  Players  both  active 
and  retired.  NFL  Players  are  well  compensated  and  enjoy  an  outstanding  benefits 
package.  Unlike  many  businesses,  where  benefits  have  been  reduced,  benefits  for 
NFL players have been maintained and repeatedly improved. We represent the best 
practices of labor relations. 

Second,  we  are  not  finished.  I  think  all  of  the  active  players  respect  and 
empathize with the emotions and concerns expressed by retired players. This is why 
we  established  a  Retired  Players  organization  as  a  division  of  the  NFLPA  in  1984. 
And, in 1990, we established the Players Assistance Trust (PAT), funded by the ac-
tive  players  to  help  former  players  in  need.  In  the  past  18  months,  this  fund  has 
disbursed over $1.5 million to former players in need of financial assistance. 

When  I  became  Executive  Director  in  1983,  about  30  percent  of  NFL  revenues 
went to the players. That has now doubled, to 60 percent of all revenues. Our union 
went through some dark times. We had to renounce our union status—‘‘decertify’’— 
to bring the legal challenge that ultimately led to our present success. I don’t think 
any  other  union  had  ever  done  that;  everyone  said  we  were  crazy.  But  we  made  it 
work.  We  shifted  the  battle  from  the  picket  line  to  the  courtroom,  and  forged  the 
partnership  with  the  owners  we  are  proud  to  have  today.  With  labor  peace,  the 
game has grown enormously, and all have benefited—players, owners, and fans. 

This success has allowed us to win against the prevailing trend of reducing bene-
fits to workers. Before we get into the hype, let’s look at the facts. The NFLPA has 
fought  hard  to  increase  benefits—especially  pensions,  disability,  and  health  care. 
The charts behind me, and our more detailed White Paper, speak the truth. 

Chart I shows in 1993, we reached back and included the ‘‘pre-59ers’’ for the first 
time  in  the  Pension  plan  and  reduced  the  vesting  period.  These  changes  extended 
coverage  to  over  900  former  players  and  their  beneficiaries.  In  each  succeeding  ex-
tension of the CBA in 1998, 2002 and 2006, the benefit credits for pension purposes 
of former players were increased. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

46 

Let’s turn to disability. I want to begin by emphasizing that the Players Associa-
tion,  its  members,  staff  and  me  personally,  are  sensitive  to  the  medical,  financial 
and  emotional  needs  of  professional  football  players—both  retired  and  active.  We 
are distressed when a former player is in need, and we are committed to responding 
to the needs of all players. 

But  we  reject  charges  that  the  present  NFL  Disability  Benefit  system  treats  vet-
eran players harshly or denies them access to benefits. The factual record disproves 
those  charges.  Of  course,  the  system  can  be  improved,  and  Commissioner  Goodell 
and I are determined to simplify and expedite the processing of claims. 

Chart  II  summarizes  disability  decisions  from  1993,  when  the  present  disability 

categories were established, through June 2007. 

Of the 1,052 applicants for disability benefits since 1993, many were ineligible be-
cause  they  were  not  vested  or  were  already  receiving  a  pension.  Since  1993,  428 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

2
s
p
u
8
1
9

s
p
e

.
1
s
p
u
8
1
9

47 

players, or 42.6 percent of those who applied, have received disability benefits. Forty 
eight  cases  are  still  pending,  and  there  will  be  more  approvals.  This  compares  to 
a 47 percent approval rate for Social Security disability. 

Another  recent  disability  benefit  added  by  agreement  between  the  NFLPA  and 
NFL  is  the  establishment  this  year  of  the  ‘‘88  Plan’’.  ‘‘88’’  was  Hall  of  Fame  John 
Mackey’s number and the plan is named in his honor. It was negotiated and agreed 
to  between  Paul  Tagliabue  and  myself  during  our  2006  CBA  extension  talks.  This 
benefit  was  extremely  important  to  me  and  our  union  because  of  how  much  John 
Mackey  meant  to  us.  He  was  the  first  President  of  the  NFLPA  after  the  merger  of 
the  old  NFL  Players  Association  with  the  American  Football  League  Players  Asso-
ciation  in  1970.  John  put  his  name  on  the  line  in  a  major  antitrust  suit  which  we 
won in the mid-1970s, and he has long been an inspiration to the officers and staff 
of  the  NFLPA.  I  know  John  well  and  he  is  always  in  our  thoughts  as  we  continue 
to make improvements. 

Chart III shows that since February of this year we have distributed 130 applica-
tions  to  players.  Of  those  applicants,  we  have  received  79  back  from  players  and 
60  of  the  applications  have  been  approved.  Of  the  remaining  19,  only  4  have  been 
denied and 15 are pending. 

Commissioner  Goodell  and  I  do  not  decide  disability  claims.  Disability  claims 
must  first  go  to  a  two-person  Disability  Initial  Claims  Committee  (required  by  De-
partment  of  Labor  regulations  since  January  2002).  If  the  Committee  deadlocks  or 
a  player  is  not  satisfied  with  its  decision,  the  player  may  appeal  to  the  full  Retire-
ment Board. The Board has six voting members; three appointed by the League and 
three appointed by the NFLPA. The 3 members appointed by the NFLPA are retired 
players: Tom Condon, former President of the NFLPA, played 11 years in the NFL; 
Jeff Van Note, former President of the NFLPA, played 18 years for the Atlanta Fal-
cons; and Dave Duerson, who played 11 years, and was an All-Pro safety. The NFL 
appointees are team owners William (Bill) Bidwell (Arizona Cardinals), Clark Hunt 
(Kansas City Chiefs) and Dick Cass (President, Baltimore Ravens). If a player is dis-
satisfied with the Board’s decision, a player may seek review in Federal court. 

More  recently  the  NFLPA/NFL  formed  an  ‘‘Alliance’’  bringing  together  an  initial 
$7  million  fund  to  pay  for  joint  replacement  surgery  and  address  other  financial 
hardships of retired players. The joint replacement surgeries will be available at no 
cost to retired players without insurance at designated hospitals across the country. 

All of these benefits and improvements are paid for by the active players. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
4
s
p
u
8
1
9

48 

Chart  IV  shows  what  the  current  players  give  up  to  help  those  who  came  before 
them.  Our  CBA  allocates  a  fixed  percentage  of  total  NFL  revenues  for  player  sala-
ries  and  benefits.  As  you  can  see,  last  year  alone  the  current  players  voluntarily 
gave  up  $147.5  million  to  help  former  players.  None  of  this  $147.5  million  went  to 
current players. 

That’s  $96.5  million  to  fund  pensions,  $20  million  to  fund  disability  benefits,  and 
$31  million  to  fund  medical  benefits.  Just  for  former  players.  And  these  numbers 
are growing. Because of the pension increases in the 2006 CBA, the cost of funding 
pensions alone for former players more than doubled—from $39 million to $96.5 mil-
lion—a 147 percent increase in 1 year. 

In the process each active player essentially reduced his salary by $82,000. 
My  third  point  is  that  Congress  can  help.  I  have  three  suggestions  for  legislative 

action. 

First, we need Federal standards for workers compensation. The current state-by- 
state  system  often  causes  the  vast  majority  of  hurt  workers,  not  just  NFL  players, 
to  settle  for  a  lump  sum,  and  give  up  their  rights  to  lifetime  medical  care  for  their 
injuries  on  the  job.  Congress  should  impose  Federal  standards  that  allow  injured 
workers to get immediate medical help and keep lifetime coverage. 

Second, Federal law does not allow unions to manage their own plans, even when, 
as  here,  the  negotiated  contribution  by  employers  is  fixed  and  plan  actions  cannot 
impose extra liability. By proposing this I do not suggest that any of the six trustees 
have  not  acted  in  good  faith  and  in  accordance  with  their  fiduciary  duty.  But  since 
the NFLPA has been criticized when applications are denied (even though a major-
ity  vote  of  the  six  trustees  is  necessary  for  a  decision),  and  since  current  players 
are  funding  the  system,  it  makes  sense  for  the  players  to  be  the  ones  making  the 
disability decisions. 

Third,  in  2002,  the  Department  of  Labor  imposed  an  extra  level  of  decision-mak-
ing in disability decisions—a new Initial Claims Committee—before our six trustees 
can hear the evidence about a particular player’s disability. I ask Congress to elimi-
nate this requirement. I opposed the creation of this extra committee when the De-
partment of Labor proposed it. 
Conclusion 

After 16 years as a player in the NFL and another 24 years as NFLPA Executive 
Director,  be  assured  that  no  one  cares  more  than  I  do  about  the  disability  issues 
and  others  facing  my  fellow  players.  We  have  made  great  progress  and  we  are  not 
finished. Congress can help. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
3
s
p
u
8
1
9

49 

I  welcome  any  questions  the  Committee  may  wish  to  ask  and  will  do  my  best  to 

answer them. 

NFLPA WHITE PAPER 

TABLE OF CONTENTS AND EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 

I.  NFL/NFLPA  Benefits  Overview:  All  Benefits  to  Retired  Players  Paid  by 

Current Players Under Salary Cap—60 percent of NFL Revenues 

• Active Players Pay For All Benefits. 
• The  NFLPA  Has  Obtained  Repeated  and  Significant  Increases  in  Benefits  for 

Retired Players. 

II. Disability System 
A. Disability Benefits Overview 

• Most Generous and Flexible Disability in Professional Sports 
• The NFLPA Is Always Working to Improve Benefits and Procedures 

B. Disability Eligibility and Award Statistics 
C. Disability Categories, Application and Award Process 
1. Categories of Disability 

• Plan Pays Both Total and Permanent and Partial Disability Benefits 
• Four Categories of Total and Permanent Disability Benefits 

» Active Football: Football-related, within 6 months 
» Active Non-Football: Non-football related, within 6 months 
» Football Degenerative: Football-related, within fifteen years 
» Inactive: Non-football related, no time limit 

• Line of Duty Benefits (‘‘LOD’’): Partial Disability, Player may be working 

2. Disability Application and Award Procedure 

• Decisions Are Made By Plan Fiduciaries, Including 3 Former Players 
• Disability Claims are Processed as Required by Federal Law 
• Application 
• Initial Medical Examination 
• Initial Decision by Disability Initial Claims Committee 
• Appeal Rights 
• Retirement Board 
• Second Medical Exam 
• The Retirement Board decides all appeals based on the entire record 
• Players Can Appeal to Federal Court 
• Since  1993,  the  courts  have  upheld  96  percent  of  the  Retirement  Board’s  deci-

sions in lawsuits filed by retired players (in 24 of 25 decided cases) 

D. Facts About Former Players With Public Controversies Over Disability Issues 

• Brent Boyd 
• Brian DeMarco 
• Conrad Dobler 
• Daryl Johnston 
• Eugene ‘‘Mercury’’ Morris 
• Mike Mosley 
• Dave Pear 
• Mike Webster 
• Delvin Williams 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

50 

III. Workman’s Compensation 

• NFLPA  Bargained  for  and  obtained  Workman’s  compensation  benefits  for  all 

players and provides legal counsel to help players apply 

IV. Lifetime Retirement Income Security Plans 
A. Lifetime Pensions Paid by Current Players 

fourth categories of T&P disability benefits 

• A  player  needs  to  be  vested  to  be  eligible  for  retirement  and  for  the  third  and 
• Benefit Credits 
• Past pensions have been increased four times since 1993 
• In  1993,  pre-1959  players  ‘‘Pre-59ers’’  began  to  receive  pensions  for  the  first 
• Some players receive a smaller than usual pension because they elected to take 
• Some players receive a small pension because they elected to take a ‘‘Social Se-
• Other  reasons  why  some  retired  players  are  receiving  smaller  than  usual  pen-

their pensions many years before retirement age 

time 

sions 

curity Adjustment’’ 

B. Second Career Savings Plan: 401(k) 
• 2 for 1 401(k) benefits for players 

C. NFL Player Annuity Program 
V. Health Care Benefits 
A. Five Free Years of Post-Career Medical Coverage 
B.  Pre-Tax  Deposits  Into  Health  Reimbursement  Accounts  ($25,000  per  year/ 

$300,000 max) 

C. 88 Plan 
VI. Other Charitable Retired Player Programs 

• Widows and Surviving Children Benefits 
• Players Assistance Fund 
• Retired Players Medical and Assistance Fund 

I. NFL/NFLPA Benefits Overview 

Active  Players  Pay  For  All  Benefits:  The  NFL  Players  Association  and  the  NFL 
agree  in  collective  bargaining  on  the  benefits  to  be  provided.  Benefit  costs  reduce 
the revenue available for active players under the Collective Bargaining Agreement 
(‘‘CBA’’): 

• The  CBA  between  the  Players  Association  and  the  NFL  provides  retirement, 
medical, and disability benefits to former players. The CBA allocates a percent-
age  of  the  League’s  revenues  for  player  salaries  and  player  benefits  (currently 
60 percent). 
• The costs of benefits to former players come from the active players’ side of the 
table.  In  other  words,  all  of  the  CBA  benefits,  including  the  cost  of  benefits  for 
players  no  longer  active,  reduce  the  amount  available  for  salaries  and  benefits 
of active players. 
• In 2006 alone, active players gave up $147.5 million for benefits to retired play-
ers.  This  means  that  each  active  player  gave  up  approximately  $82,000  of  his 
salary for medical, disability, and retirement benefits for former players. 
From April 2006 to March 2007—the active players gave up approximately: 
• $96.5 million to fund retirement benefits for retired players; 
• $31 million to fund medical benefits for retired players; 

» $18 million in contributions to health reimbursement accounts. 
» $2 million to 88 Plan for Dementia. 
» $11 million for 5 years post-retirement fully paid health care. 

• $20 million to fund disability benefits for former players. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

51 

for former players. 

In 2005–2006, current players contributed $39 million to fund retirement benefits 
• The current $96.5 million is a 147 percent increase in 1 year thanks to the 2006 

CBA. 

The  NFLPA  Has  Obtained  Repeated  and  Significant  Increases  in  Benefits  for  Re-

tired Players. 

Beginning  in  1993,  the  NFLPA  obtained  significantly  increased  pensions  for  re-
tired  players  four  times.  Pre–59ers  were  included  in  the  Retirement  Plan  for  the 
first time in 1993, and their benefits have since been more than tripled. 

Significantly increased Total and Permanent Disability benefits. 
Tripled widow and surviving children benefits. 
Created Plan 88 (see below). 

II. Disability System 
A. Disability Benefits Overview 

Most Generous and Flexible Disability in Professional Sports: The Plan offers total 
and  partial  disability  benefits—T&P  and  Line  of  Duty—explained  in  further  detail 
below. 

(2) what caused the player’s disability; and (3) when the disability began. 

• The  disability  award  process  investigates  (1)  whether  a  player  is  able  to  work; 
• Vested former NFL players who become unable to work—for whatever reason— 
decades  after  they  leave  the  game  may  still  receive  a  disability  benefit  that 
serves as income replacement. 
• This  is  highly  unusual.  An  employee  of  a  corporation  like  IBM  or  General  Mo-
tors  does  not  expect  to  get—and  does  not  get—disability  benefits  if  he  or  she 
becomes unable to work decades after leaving the job. 
• The Plan also offers partial disability called ‘‘Line of Duty,’’ which players may 
• Since  1993—when  the  current  structure  was  put  in  place—about  $140  million 
• Once  a  disabled  retired  player  reaches  retirement  age,  he  will  begin  to  receive 
the  higher  of  either  his  disability  or  his  pension  for  the  remainder  of  his  life. 
The NFLPA Is Always Working to Improve Benefits and Procedures: Even outside 
of  the  formal  collective  bargaining  process,  the  NFLPA  continues  to  seek  improve-
ments in benefits and in the process. 

receive even when they are still able to work. 

has been paid to disabled players. 

• The  NFL/NFLPA  recently  announced  an  agreement  that  automatically  grants 
disability  benefits  to  eligible  former  players  who  receive  social  security  dis-
ability benefits. 
• Because of this change, additional players will now receive NFL disability bene-
fits,  and  players  already  receiving  social  security  benefits  will  not  have  to  be 
examined by a Plan doctor. 
• The  NFLPA  has  suggested  other  major  changes  that  could  eliminate  difficult 
decisions on effective dates and causation for many players, and allow the Plan 
to process applications faster. 

B. Disability Eligibility and Award Statistics 

Eligibility  and  Award  Statistics:  This  has  been  considerable  misinformation  re-
ported  about  the  disability  award  and  eligibility  statistics,  which  we  would  like  to 
clarify below: 

• From  1993  to  June  2007,  42.6  percent  of  individuals  who  have  applied  for 
NFLPA/NFL  disability  benefits  were  awarded  disability  benefits  of  some  kind. 
Social security is awarded at roughly 47 percent. 
• As  the  table  below  demonstrates,  428  applicants  have  received  disability  bene-
fits—of the 1004 who have received a final decisions—which brings the approval 
rate to 42.6 percent. 
» There  are  currently  317  former  players  who  are  receiving  some  kind  of  dis-
ability  benefit  under  the  Plan.  Since  1993,  41  former  players  who  were 
awarded  disability  began  receiving  their  pension  when  they  reached  retire-
ment age, and therefore no longer receive disability payments. The remaining 
players who no longer receive disability have either passed away, or no longer 
qualify  for  disability  since  their  initial  award  because  the  benefit  expired,  or 
because the Plan has determined that they are no longer disabled. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

52 

• Of  the  1,052  people  who  applied  in  this  period,  many  were  already  receiving  a 
pension  or  were  not  vested  (had  not  played  3  or  more  seasons),  and  therefore 
were ineligible when they applied for disability benefits. 
• Currently,  there  are  4,900  vested  (3  seasons  or  more)  former  players  who  are 
eligible to apply for disability benefits under the NFL/NFLPA plan, not 10,000, 
as has been reported in some media outlets. 
• In  addition  to  the  4,900  vested  former  players  who  are  eligible,  there  are  cur-
rently  2,100  active  players  who  are  not  eligible  to  apply  for  disability  because 
they are actively playing football, and are therefore not disabled. 
• There are additionally close to 3,000 former players who are currently receiving 
a pension from the NFL/NFLPA Retirement Plan, and are also therefore not eli-
gible to receive disability. Since pension and disability are both ‘‘income replace-
ment’’  benefits,  once  a  player  begins  to  receive  his  pension  he  can  no  longer 
apply  for  disability  benefits.  (This  is  standard,  if  not  universal,  among  all  em-
ployers.) 

Table  1  summarizes  the  disability  decisions  of  the  Retirement  Plan  from  July 

1993, when the present disability categories were created to June 26, 2007. 

Table 1 

Total disability applicants 
Approved at initial stage 1 
Denied at initial stage 
Awaiting initial decision 
Applicants denied at initial stage who appealed 
Approved on appeal 
Denied on appeal 
Appeal Pending 
Applicants who have sued 
Retirement Board upheld 
Retirement Board reversed 
Lawsuit pending 
Overall disability applicants 
Cases pending 
Benefit approved 
Benefit denied 

1,052 
358 
675 
19 
223 
69 
132 
22 
32 
24 
1 
7 
1,052 
48 
428 
576 

Prior to January 1, 2002, initial decisions were made by the Retirement Board. After January 1, 2002, initial 
decisions are made by the Disability Initial Claims Committee, as required by a change in Federal law. The Dis-
ability Initial Claims Committee has deadlocked on whether to grant a benefit 37 times. 
C. Disability Categories, Application and Award Process 
1. Disability Categories 

Plan Pays Both Total and Permanent and Partial Disability Benefits: The Retire-
ment Plan awards both ‘‘total and permanent,’’ (‘‘T&P’’) disability benefits (meaning 
the retired player is unable to work) and partial disability benefits. 

Total  and  Permanent  Disability—T&P:  Total  and  Permanent  disability  benefits 
are  paid  when  an  eligible  player  is  unable  to  work,  and  are  designed  to  replace  in-
come. 

• Eligible players may receive T&P benefits even when their inability to work oc-
curs many years after a football career has ended, and even when NFL football 
did not cause the inability to work. 
• Once  a  retired  player  reaches  retirement  age  (55),  he  will  begin  receiving  the 
higher  of  either  his  disability  payment  or  his  pension  for  the  remainder  of  his 
life. 
• Players who begin receiving their pension can not apply for disability. Both are 
income-replacement  benefits;  this  is  standard,  if  not  universal,  among  all  em-
ployers. 

Four Categories of Total and Permanent Disability Benefits: 
• Active Football: Football-related, within 6 months. 

» A  former  player  receives  $224,000  per  year  if  he  becomes  totally  and  perma-
nently  disabled  due  to  NFL  football  within  6  months  after  his  NFL  career 
ends. 

» No vesting required—available to a player who plays in as little as one game. 

• Active Non-Football: Non-football related, within 6 months. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

53 

» A  former  player  receives  $134,000  per  year  if  he  becomes  totally  and  perma-
nently  disabled  from  any  other  cause  within  6  months  after  his  NFL  career 
ends. 

» Based on a player’s benefit credits, this amount could be higher. 
» No vesting required—available to a player who plays in as little as one game. 

• Football Degenerative: Football-related, within fifteen years. 

» A  former  player  receives  $110,000  a  year  if  he  becomes  totally  and  perma-
nently  disabled  due  to  NFL  football  within  15  years  after  his  NFL  career 
ends. 

• Inactive: Non-football related, no time limit. 

» A  former  player  receives  a  minimum  of  $18,000  a  year  ($21,000  for  applica-
tions  on  and  after  April  1,  2007)  if  he  becomes  totally  and  permanently  dis-
abled and does not qualify for one of the other categories. 

» Based on a player’s benefit credits, this amount could be higher. 

NOTE: Vesting Required for Football Degenerative and Inactive T&P benefits: 
• These  two  categories  of  disability  are  only  available  to  former  players  who 
played  in  the  NFL  during  at  least  three  seasons  and  are  therefore  ‘‘vested.’’ 
Generally, a player earns a season if he is paid for three or more games during 
that season. 

Line of Duty Benefits (‘‘LOD’’): Partial Disability, Player may be working. 
Partial  disability  benefits  are  paid  to  players  who  suffer  a  ‘‘substantial  disable-
ment.’’  Whether  a  player  has  a  substantial  disablement  is  generally  determined 
using the rating system created by the American Medical Association for measuring 
impairments. 

LOD benefits are available to players who play in as little as one NFL game. 
To receive ‘‘LOD’’ disability a player must apply within 48 months (4 years) after 
his  NFL  career  ends.  Partial  disability  benefits  are  paid  for  up  to  90  months  (7.5 
years). 

A player’s LOD benefit equals the sum of his Benefit Credits. Therefore, a player 
who  leaves  the  game  today  with  five  seasons  would  have  a  monthly  LOD  benefit 
of $2,350 (5 seasons times $470). 

Regardless of the number of a player’s seasons, he will receive at least $1,000 per 

month. 

Most  injuries  to  NFL  players  are  orthopedic.  The  collective  bargaining  parties 
have  adopted  guidelines  created  by  the  American  Medical  Association  to  measure 
impairments resulting from orthopedic injuries. 

the player meets any one of the following thresholds: 

For  orthopedic  impairments,  using  the  AMA  guidelines,  LOD  benefits  are  paid  if 
• A 38 percent or greater loss of use of the entire lower extremity; 
• A 23 percent or greater loss of use of the entire upper extremity; 
• An  impairment  to  the  cervical  or  thoracic  spine  that  results  in  a  25  percent  or 
• An  impairment  to  the  lumbar  spine  that  results  in  a  20  percent  or  greater 
• Any  combination  of  lower  extremity,  upper  extremity,  and  spine  impairments 

greater whole body impairment; 

whole body impairment; or 

that results in a 25 percent or greater whole body impairment. 

Up  to  3  percentage  points  may  be  added  to  the  impairment  ratings  of  a  player 

if he experiences excess pain. 
2. Disability Application and Award Procedure 

Decisions Are Made By Plan Fiduciaries, Including 3 Former Players: The Players 
Association and the NFL do not award or deny disability claims. Final decisions on 
disability  benefits  are  made  by  6  voting  members  of  the  Retirement  Board—three 
of whom are former players—and all medical decisions are based on the medical re-
ports of one or more neutral doctors chosen by all voting members, and all medical 
information submitted by the player. 

Disability  Claims  are  Processed  as  Required  by  Federal  Law:  In  compliance  with 
Federal  law,  the  Retirement  Plan  gives  former  players  every  opportunity  to  qualify 
for disability benefits. The process that a player goes through is outlined as follows: 
Application:  A  player  seeking  disability  benefits  begins  by  completing  a  written 
application  and  sending  it  to  the  Plan  Office  in  Baltimore.  The  Plan  Office  has  a 
toll-free  number  that  former  players  can  call  to  ask  questions  and  get  forms,  and 
also has a website for downloading forms. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

54 

Initial Medical Examination: The player is then sent to a neutral, qualified physi-
cian  approved  by  the  Retirement  Board  for  an  examination.  These  physicians  are 
called  neutral  physicians  because  they  are  appointed  jointly  by  the  Retirement 
Board  members  appointed  by  the  Players  Association  and  the  NFL.  Based  on  his 
examination, the physician provides a written report that describes the player’s con-
dition, measures impairments for purposes of LOD benefits, and addresses the play-
er’s ability to work. 

• Initial Decision: The Disability Initial Claims Committee (the ‘‘DICC’’ or ‘‘Com-
mittee’’)  makes  initial  decisions  on  disability  benefit  claims.  It  is  comprised  of 
two  individuals—one  appointed  by  the  NFL  and  the  other  by  the  NFLPA.  The 
Labor  Department  required  this  layer  of  decisionmaking  by  Federal  law  in 
2002. 

• The Committee reviews the player’s entire file, including all medical reports by 
the  Plan  neutral  physicians  and  by  other  physicians  submitted  by  the  Player. 
If  the  Committee  approves  the  application,  disability  payments  begin  imme-
diately. 

• If  the  Committee  denies  the  player’s  claim,  or  if  the  Committee  is  deadlocked 
(in which case the application is deemed denied), the player may appeal, as de-
scribed below. 

Appeal  Rights:  If  the  Committee  denies  a  claim,  is  deadlocked,  or  the  player  is 
dissatisfied with the Committee’s decision in any way, the player may appeal to the 
full Retirement Board for a complete review of the claim. On appeal, the Retirement 
Board  will  review  all  available  materials,  whether  or  not  presented  to  the  Com-
mittee, and will give no deference to the decision of the Committee. The Retirement 
Board conducts a full and fair and totally independent review of all appeals. 

Retirement  Board:  The  Retirement  Board  has  six  voting  members—three  ap-

pointed by the NFLPA, and three appointed by the NFL. 

NFLPA-appointed voting members: All distinguished retired players: 
• Tom  Condon  played  for  the  NFL  for  11  years,  and  served  as  President  of  the 
NFLPA while he was an active player. Today, he is an attorney and a top foot-
ball agent with Creative Artists Agency. 

• Jeff Van Note played for the Atlanta Falcons for 18 years, and served as Presi-

dent of the NFLPA while he was an active player. 

• David  Duerson  played  in  the  NFL  for  8  seasons,  was  all-Pro  in  4  years,  and 
won  two  Super  Bowl  rings.  Mr.  Duerson  attended  Harvard  Business  School 
after retiring from the NFL and currently works in business. 

NFL-appointed voting members: 
• William Bidwill, Owner of the Arizona Cardinals. 
• Clark Hunt, Owner of the Kansas City Chiefs. 
• Dick Cass, President of the Baltimore Ravens. 
Second Medical Exam: On appeal, the player is sent, as required by Federal law, 
to  one  or  more  new  neutral  physicians  for  additional  medical  examination.  These 
physicians provide written reports on the Player’s condition. 

The Retirement Board decides all appeals based on the entire record. 
Resolving Deadlocks: 3 to 3 votes—of the Retirement Board are resolved by either: 
• Medical Advisory Physician (‘‘MAP’’): If the dispute is over a medical issue, such 
as  whether  a  player  medically  is  substantially  unable  to  work,  either  side  (the 
player-appointed  trustees  or  the  management-appointed  trustees)  can  send  the 
player  to  one  of  the  Plan’s  top,  pre-approved,  neutral  three  doctors.  These  doc-
tors  are  called  ‘‘Medical  Advisory  Physicians  (‘‘MAPs’’),  and  their  medical  deci-
sions are binding on the Retirement Board. This final review will almost always 
resolve any deadlock between voting trustees. 
• Arbitration:  In  rare  cases—and  this  has  happened  only  once  in  the  last  14 
years—the  deadlock  is  resolved  by  arbitration  between  the  members  of  the  Re-
tirement Board. 

Players  Can  Appeal  to  Federal  Court:  If  a  player  is  dissatisfied  in  any  way  with 
the  decision  of  the  Retirement  Board,  he  has  the  right  to  file  a  lawsuit  in  Federal 
court for benefits. 

Since  1993,  the  courts  have  upheld  96  percent  of  the  Retirement  Board’s  decisions 

in lawsuits filed by retired players (in 24 of 25 decided cases). 

This record demonstrates the care with which the Committee and the Retirement 

Board decide pension and disability claims. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

55 

D. Facts About Former Players With Public Controversies Over Disability Issues 

Brent Boyd 

Mr. Boyd played professional football in the NFL from 1980–1986. 
Mr.  Boyd  is  receiving  total  and  permanent  disability  (‘‘T&P’’)  benefits  under  the 

Plan’s ‘‘Inactive’’ category, which provides a minimum of $18,000 per year. 

• Mr.  Boyd  is  receiving  Inactive  T&P  benefits  rather  than  Football  Degenerative 
T&P  benefits  because  the  only  doctor  who  was  certain  about  the  cause  of  his 
psychological  and  psychiatric  problems—a  neutral  and  renowned  expert  from 
Johns  Hopkins  University  Medical  Center—determined,  to  a  reasonable  degree 
of  medical  certainty,  that  Mr.  Boyd’s  problems  could  not  have  been  caused  by 
Mr. Boyd’s concussion in 1980. 

• Accordingly, he did not meet the standard for the highest level of payment, the 

football-related ‘‘Football Degenerative’’ T&P benefits. 

Mr.  Boyd  first  applied  for  T&P  benefits  in  1997;  he  claimed  that  he  was  unable 
to work due to orthopedic impairments, never mentioning a football-related head in-
jury in his application. 

• After a Plan neural orthopedist opined that Mr. Boyd was capable of sales and 

other work, the Retirement Board denied Boyd’s application. 

• Mr.  Boyd  did  not  challenge  that  decision  by  pursuing  a  Federal  court  appeal. 
Mr. Boyd reapplied in 2000; he now claimed, for the first time, that he was unable 
to  work  due  to  a  psychological  disorder  caused  by  a  head  injury  that  occurred  in 
1980. 

The  Retirement  Board  referred  Mr.  Boyd  for  examination  by  a  neurologist  and  a 

psychiatrist. 

• Both  doctors  indicated  that  Mr.  Boyd  was  then  totally  and  permanently  dis-
abled (i.e., substantially couldn’t work) due to cognitive and psychiatric impair-
ments. But, both physicians also indicated in their written reports that they were 
uncertain what caused Mr. Boyd’s disability. 

• The  player  trustees  wanted  to  award  Mr.  Boyd  the  higher  Football  Degenera-
tive  T&P  benefit,  but  the  management  trustees  would  not  agree,  in  large  part 
because Mr. Boyd had not claimed head injuries in his 1997 application. 

• The Retirement Board awarded Mr. Boyd the Inactive T&P benefits (i.e., a min-
imum of $18,000 per year where a player does not qualify for a higher category) 
on  the  basis  of  these  reports,  and  agreed  to  further  study  the  causation  of  Mr. 
Boyd’s impairments for possible reclassification. 

To resolve the deadlock on causation, the Retirement Board referred Mr. Boyd to 
a  pre-eminent  neurologist  at  Johns  Hopkins,  Dr.  Barry  Gordon,  who  has  particular 
expertise in memory, cognitive impairments, and head injuries. 

After  an  extensive  examination  by  Dr.  Gordon,  which  lasted  well  over  an  hour, 
Dr. Gordon concluded, ‘‘to a reasonable degree of medical certainty,’’ that Mr. Boyd’s 
impairments  were  not  caused  by  NFL  Football.  Mr.  Boyd  and  his  attorneys  were 
given  repeated  opportunities  to  provide  a  medical  rebuttal,  but  never  did.  Contrary 
to  Mr.  Boyd’s  public  statements,  Dr.  Gordon’s  assistant,  who  performed  tests,  had 
completed  the  course  work  for  a  Masters  in  Developmental  Psychology  at  Hopkins 
(which she received 2 months later), was well-trained in testing and had performed 
that  test  on  other  patients  at  least  a  dozen  times  before  Mr.  Boyd,  and  still  works 
as a consultant to John Hopkins. 

Based on this information, the Retirement Board concluded that Mr. Boyd did not 
meet  the  requirements  for  a  football-related  disability,  and  awarded  him  Inactive 
total  and  permanent  disability  benefits  (the  fourth  T&P  category,  at  a  minimum  of 
$18,000 per year). 

Mr. Boyd sued the Retirement Plan in Federal District Court in San Diego. That 
court  upheld  the  Board’s  decision  and  reasoning  that  Mr.  Boyd’s  psychological  im-
pairments  were  not  caused  by  a  football-related  injury,  and  rejected  Mr.  Boyd’s  ar-
guments. 

Mr.  Boyd  then  appealed  to  the  Ninth  Circuit  Court  of  Appeals.  A  three  judge 
panel unanimously affirmed the District Court’s decision and upheld the findings of 
the Retirement Board. The Ninth Circuit rejected Mr. Boyd’s claim that his psycho-
logical condition was football-related. 
Brian DeMarco 

Mr. DeMarco played professional football in the NFL from 1995–1999. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

56 

Mr. DeMarco has never filed a claim for disability benefits, even after the Retire-

ment Plan sent him five applications via certified mail over the past 5 years. 

The plan sent Mr. DeMarco disability applications in March 2002, December 2002, 

September 2005, August 2006, and July 2007. 

The  Plan  Office  has  never  received  a  single  disability  application  from  Mr. 
DeMarco. The Plan still has three of the written, signed proofs that the application 
was received. 

Because Mr. DeMarco has declined to even begin the process, the Plan cannot be 

blamed for failing to pay disability benefits to him. 

Mr.  DeMarco  has  claimed  that  he  sent  in  the  application,  which  was  misplaced 
by  the  Plan  office.  This  is  false.  As  of  September  2007,  Mr.  DeMarco  has  still  not 
sent in an application for disability. 
Conrad Dobler 

Mr. Dobler played professional football in the NFL from 1972–1981. 
First, the Board denied Mr. Dobler’s 1993 claim for T&P benefits because he was 
able  to  work  at  that  time,  despite  his  knee  and  elbow  impairments.  As  described 
above,  T&P  benefits  are  reserved  for  former  players  whose  impairments  prevent 
them from being able to work. 

• Mr. Dobler applied for Total and Permanent Disability in 1993. 
• After  evaluating  the  report  of  the  Plan  neutral  physician  who  examined  Mr. 
Dobler,  the  player  trustees  wanted  to  award  him  T&P  disability  benefits,  but 
again  the  management  trustees  refused  to  do  so,  which  left  the  Board  dead-
locked at 3 to 3. 
• As a result of this deadlock, the Board sent Mr. Dobler for an additional exam-
ination  by  a  Medical  Advisory  Physician  (‘‘MAP’’),  whose  medical  determina-
tions are final and binding on the Board. 
• The MAP determined that Mr. Dobler did not qualify for T&P benefits because 
he  was  able  to  work,  and  was  in  fact  working.  Therefore,  the  Board  denied  his 
application for T&P benefits. 

Second,  the  Board  denied  Mr.  Dobler’s  2006  claim  for  LOD  benefits  (partial  dis-
ability,  player  may  still  be  able  to  work)  because  his  claim  for  those  benefits  was 
more  than  2  decades  late.  The  Plan  requires  that  a  player  apply  for  LOD  benefits 
within 4 years of leaving the game. 
• In  2006,  thirteen  years  after  his  initial  application  and  25  years  after  playing 
football, Mr. Dobler applied for LOD benefits. 
• His application was more than 20 years late. 
• A  player  must  apply  for  Line  of  Duty  disability  within  4  years  of  retiring  from 

the NFL, and Mr. Dobler’s last season was 1981. 

Daryl Johnston 

Mr. Johnston played professional football in the NFL from 1989–1999. 
Mr. Johnston’s neck impairment did not meet the Plan’s standards for a ‘‘substan-
tial  disablement’’  for  line-of-duty  disability  (‘‘LOD’’)  benefits  when  he  applied,  and 
he therefore did not qualify to receive them. 

• Mr. Johnston applied for LOD benefits in 2001. 
• The  player  members  of  the  Retirement  Board  wanted  to  award  LOD  benefits, 
and  the  management  members  refused,  which  left  the  Board  deadlocked  at  3 
to 3. 
• As a result of this deadlock, Mr. Johnston was sent to a Medical Advisory Phy-
• This physician determined that Mr. Johnston did not meet the Plan’s standards 

sician, whose medical opinion is final and binding on the Retirement Board. 

for LOD benefits. 

Eugene ‘‘Mercury’’ Morris 

Mr. Morris played professional football in the NFL from 1969–1975. 
In 1992, Mr. Morris accepted a lump sum payment of $295,000 in return for giv-

ing up all rights to any future disability benefits. 

Mr. Morris made this decision while represented by his attorney. 
In spite of the settlement, Mr. Morris has repeatedly tried to set aside the settle-
ment  by  filing  multiple  lawsuits  and  conducting  a  harassment  campaign  against 
Plan attorneys. 

Three Federal courts have told Mr. Morris he is bound by the agreement and that 
the agreement clearly does not allow him to obtain additional benefits for disability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

The courts have told him that another lawsuit will result in sanctions. 

Mike Mosley 

57 

Mr. Mosley played professional football in the NFL from 1981–1984. 
After  receiving  Football  Degenerative  total  and  permanent  disability  benefits  for 
6 years (third category of T&P benefits, which pays $110,000 per year), Mr. Mosley 
no  longer  qualified  for  these  benefits  because  he  became  able  to  work.  It  would  be 
unfair  to  disabled  players  to  pay  benefits  to  former  players  who  are  not  disabled. 
• Mr.  Mosley  applied  for  total  and  permanent  disability  benefits  in  September 

1998. 

• His application was approved in October 1998, and Mr. Mosley began to receive 

the disability benefits awarded to him. 

• In  2004,  Mr.  Mosley  was  reexamined  by  a  Plan  doctor  who  found  that  Mr. 

Mosley was able to work. 

• A second, neutral Plan doctor confirmed this assessment. 
• The Plan therefore terminated Mr. Mosley’s benefits in October 2004. 

Dave Pear 

Mr. Pear played professional football in the NFL from 1975–1980. 
The  Retirement  Board  denied  Mr.  Pear’s  1983  claim  for  LOD  benefits  based  on 
an  arbitration  decision  finding  that  Mr.  Pear  did  not  meet  the  requirements  for 
those benefits in effect when he applied. 

• Mr. Pear applied for LOD benefits in 1983. 
• At that time, the Retirement Board was required to determine that the player’s 

injury caused him to leave football before it could grant LOD benefits. 

• After  evaluating  the  report  of  the  neutral  physician  who  examined  Mr.  Pear, 
the  three  player  trustees  wanted  to  award  Mr.  Pear  the  LOD  benefits,  but  the 
three management trustees refused to do so. 

• As a result of this deadlock, the Board sent the issue to an arbitrator, who ulti-

mately ruled that the injury did not cause Mr. Pear to leave football. 

• As  a  result  of  the  NFLPA’s  successful  negotiations  in  bargaining,  this  require-
ment  for  LOD  benefits—that  the  injury  must  have  made  the  player  leave  the 
game—was dropped from the Plan after the 1993 CBA. 

The Retirement Board denied Mr. Pear’s 1995 claim for T&P benefits because the 
Board  determined  that  he  could  work  after  evaluating  the  medical  evidence  in  his 
file. 

• Mr. Pear applied for T&P benefits in 1995. 
• The Plan doctor who examined Mr. Pear determined that he could work. 
• The Board therefore concluded that Mr. Pear did not qualify for T&P disability 

benefits. 

Mike Webster 

Mr. Webster played professional football in the NFL from 1974–1990. 
Mr. Webster applied for Football Degenerative T&P disability benefits (third T&P 
category that pays $110,000 per year) due to head injuries in June 1999. The Board 
promptly  and  unanimously  determined  that  Mr.  Webster  could  not  work,  and  that 
football had caused his disability. 

Mr. Webster began to receive over $9,000 per month, and he collected those bene-
fits for the rest of his life. The Plan also paid an additional $300,000 in retroactive 
benefits after the Board unanimously determined that he became totally and perma-
nently disabled in 1996. 

The  only  issue  in  dispute  in  Mr.  Webster’s  case  was  when  Mr.  Webster  became 
unable  to  work.  The  Retirement  Board  unanimously  decided  to  pay  Mr.  Webster 
retroactively  back  to  1996,  when  the  evidence  showed  he  was  first  unable  to  work, 
and the Board unanimously found that football caused his inability to work. 

• Mr.  Webster  had  worked  very  hard  to  set  up  businesses  and  real  estate  deals 

after he left the NFL in 1991. 

• The  Retirement  Plan  undertook  a  thorough  investigation  into  the  time  of  Mr. 
Webster’s  impairment,  carefully  reconstructing  the  details  of  Mr.  Webster’s  life 
almost a decade earlier. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

58 

• The Plan learned that in the years immediately following football, Mr. Webster 
set  up  businesses,  bought  property,  promoted  products,  traveled  extensively, 
and filed lawsuits. 

• In  1995  Mr.  Webster’s  own  attorney  told  him  that  he  would  not  qualify  for  So-

cial Security disability benefits because he was working. 

• Although  his  businesses  ultimately  failed,  there  was  no  indication  that  Mr. 
Webster  had  a  serious  medical  impairment  until  he  was  hospitalized  in  Sep-
tember 1996. 

• The  Retirement  Board  unanimously  decided  to  pay  benefits  retroactively  to  Sep-
tember  1996—an  award  of  over  $300,000  in  retroactive  benefits,  in  addition  to 
his disability payment of over $9,000 per month for the rest of his life. 

The Retirement Board never improperly delayed payment to Mr. Webster. 
• When Mr. Webster applied for T&P benefits in June 1999, the Retirement Plan 
awarded Football Degenerative T&P benefits within 3 months (at the first meet-
ing  it  could  do  so)  of  his  application  because  of  the  head  injuries  he  had  sus-
tained,  and  Mr.  Webster  promptly  began  to  receive  disability  payments  of  over 
$9,000 per month. 

• It did take time to reconstruct Mr. Webster’s activities in prior years—Mr. Web-
ster’s  attorney  requested  and  received  additional  time  to  make  a  case  that  Mr. 
Webster  was  totally  and  permanently  disabled  upon  his  retirement  from  NFL 
football in 1991. 

• The  IRS  then  presented  a  tax  levy  based  on  unpaid  taxes  for  income  Mr.  Web-
ster received during 1992 and 1993, during which time Mr. Webster was claim-
ing total and permanent disability. 

• Mr. Webster’s then-attorney took many months to explain Mr. Webster’s income 

during those years. 

Ultimately, the Estate of Mike Webster exercised its right to judicial review of the 
matter,  and  sued  the  Retirement  Plan  in  the  Baltimore,  Maryland  Federal  district 
court. 

Through  his  attorney,  Mr.  Webster  argued  that  he  was  so  mentally  impaired 

when he left football in 1991 that he could not even file an application. 

The  court  determined  that  Mr.  Webster  was  totally  and  permanently  disabled  as 
of  1991,  5  years  earlier  than  the  date  awarded  by  the  Retirement  Board,  and  thus 
awarded his Estate additional $2 million in retroactive disability benefits for 5 years 
and attorneys fees. 

The  Fourth  Circuit  Court  of  Appeals  upheld  the  district  court’s  decision  on  when 
Mr. Webster became unable to work, and the Retirement Board paid the additional 
disability benefits awarded by the court to the Estate of Mike Webster. 
Delvin Williams 

Mr. Williams played in the NFL from 1974 to 1981. 
Mr. Williams applied for LOD benefits in 1983. The player members of the Retire-
ment Board believed he qualified for that benefit, but the management members did 
not. The matter was sent to arbitration. The arbitrator said that he did not qualify. 
Mr.  Williams  applied  for  T&P  benefits  in  June  1995.  Based  on  the  medical  evi-
dence,  at  its  July  20,  1995  meeting,  the  Retirement  Board  unanimously  awarded 
Mr. Williams Football Degenerative T&P benefits starting August 1, 1995. 

Because Mr. Williams desired an effective date of July 1, 1993 for his T&P bene-
fits, the Plan requested evidence of Mr. Williams’ employment during the period be-
tween July 1, 1993 and August 1, 1995. The Plan learned the following facts: 

• According  to  his  Social  Security  Administration  earnings  records  and  tax 
records,  Mr.  Williams  had  substantial  employment  earnings  in  most  of  the 
years  after  his  retirement  from  the  NFL  in  1981  and  up  to  1995.  In  1992,  Mr. 
Williams earned $51,583; in 1993, his income was $52,491; in 1994, his income 
was $55,839; and in 7 months of working in 1995, he earned $31,574. 
• From  December  1,  1991  to  December  1,  1992,  Mr.  Williams  worked  for  Solem 
&  Associates,  a  San  Francisco  public  relations  firm.  From  January  1,  1993  to 
April  1,  1995,  Mr.  Williams  worked  for  the  San  Francisco  Chamber  of  Com-
merce.  Mr.  Williams  worked  for  a  company  called  Sports  Lab  from  April  17, 
1995  to  July  15,  1995.  During  these  years,  Mr.  Williams  listed  his  occupation 
as ‘‘Executive’’ or ‘‘Community Relations’’ on his Federal income tax returns. 

Based on Mr. Williams’ substantial employment during the period prior to August 
1,  1995,  the  Retirement  Board  denied  his  claim  for  retroactive  disability  benefits. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

59 

Mr. Williams appealed, and submitted a new medical report from the doctor that 
examined him in 1983, in connection with Mr. Williams’ unsuccessful claim for LOD 
benefits.  This  doctor  stated  both  that  Mr.  Williams  had  been  totally  and  perma-
nently disabled in 1983 and that his medical condition had not changed since 1983. 
This  doctor  made  these  statements  in  1997  even  though  he  did  not  find  Mr.  Wil-
liams totally and permanently disabled in 1983. 

The  Retirement  Board  found  this  report  unconvincing,  because  it  contradicted 
both that same doctor’s report in 1983 and the undisputed evidence of Mr. Williams’ 
substantial  employment  through  1995.  The  Retirement  Board  unanimously  denied 
his appeal for disability benefits for periods prior to August 1995. 

In October 1998, Mr. Williams filed a class action lawsuit for retroactive disability 
benefits  for  the  period  from  July  1993  to  August  1995.  He  also  asked  the  court  for 
various  other  remedies  arising  out  of  alleged  fiduciary  breaches  and  unlawful 
amendments  of  the  Retirement  Plan  and  Disability  Plan.  His  complaint  was  over 
100 pages long. 

The  district  court  dismissed  all  of  the  fiduciary  breach  and  illegal  plan  amend-
ment  claims  advanced  by  Mr.  Williams.  The  court  also  rejected  Mr.  Williams’  at-
tempt  to  convert  the  case  into  a  class  action.  The  court,  however,  did  award  Mr. 
Williams an earlier effective date for his T&P benefits. 

On appeal, a three judge panel of the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals unanimously 
overturned  the  effective  date  decision  of  the  district  court.  The  Retirement  Board 
was completely vindicated. 

Following  the  Ninth  Circuit’s  decision,  the  district  court  awarded  the  Retirement 
Plan  a  modest  amount  of  attorneys’  fees  and  costs,  to  be  paid  gradually  out  of  the 
$110,000 each year that Mr. Williams continues to receive in disability benefits. 
III. Workers’ Compensation 

NFLPA bargained for and obtained Workman’s compensation benefits for all play-

ers and provides legal counsel to help players apply. 

The  NFLPA  has  negotiated  for  Workers  Compensation  benefits  to  be  provided  to 
all  players.  Over  the  past  25  years  the  NFLPA  has  established  a  panel  of  qualified 
lawyers to help players file and pursue their claims. 

• Workman’s Compensation Benefits are in addition to disability benefits. 
• Workman’s Compensation Benefits are paid for by current players. 
• The  NFLPA  strongly  advises  each  player  to  preserve  his  rights  under  Workers 
• The NFLPA and NFL have agreed that there is no reduction in other disability 
• The  cost  of  Workers  Compensation  comes  out  of  the  players’  share  of  League 

Compensation for life-time medical care for his football injuries. 

benefits when a player also receives Workers Compensation. 

revenues, like other health and disability benefits. 

IV. Lifetime Retirement Income Security Plans 
A. Lifetime Pension Payments 

Vesting: A player needs to be vested to be eligible for retirement and for the third 
and  fourth  categories  of  T&P  disability  benefits—Football  Degenerative  and  Inac-
tive. Currently, a player is vested if he is plays for three or more seasons. A player 
receives  a  credited  season  if  he  is  paid  for  three  or  more  regular  or  post-season 
games in that season. 

Under  the  1993  collective  bargaining  agreement—the  first  collective  bargaining 
agreement  negotiated  by  Gene  Upshaw—the  vesting  standard  was  reduced  from 
four seasons to three seasons for all players with a season after 1992. 

Under the 1998 collective bargaining agreement, the vesting standard for all older 
players  was  reduced  from  five  seasons  to  four.  The  effect  of  these  changes  was  to 
provide  many  more  players  with  a  vested  pension  benefit  under  the  Retirement 
Plan. 

Benefit  Credit:  Every  vested  player  qualifies  for  a  pension  based  on  the  sum  of 
his  ‘‘Benefit  Credits,’’  which  are  amounts  determined  by  collective  bargaining  for 
each NFL season. 

The current schedule of Benefit Credits for seasons is: 

Before 1982 
1982 through 1992 
1993 and 1994 
1995 and 1996 
1997 
1998 and later seasons 

$250 
255 
265 
315 
365 
470 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

60 

For  example,  a  player  who  plays  NFL  football  for  10  seasons  beginning  in  1998 
is  guaranteed  a  pension  at  age  55  of  $4,700  per  month  ($470  x  10  seasons),  which 
is $56,400 per year, for the rest of his life. 

If  he  takes  his  pension  at  age  65—normal  retirement  age  for  many  under  Social 

Security—the benefit rises to $147,711 each year for the remainder of his life. 

Past pensions have been increased four times since 1993. 
For  the  oldest  players,  Benefit  Credits  went  from  $60  prior  to  the  1993  CBA  to 

the current level of $250 due to the NFLPA’s efforts in collective bargaining. 

For  current  players,  Benefit  Credit  levels  went  from  $150  prior  to  the  1993  CBA 

to the current level of $470 in collective bargaining. 

In 1993, ‘‘Pre-59ers’’ began to receive pensions for the first time. 
The  Retirement  Plan  was  created  in  the  early  1960s.  In  the  1993  CBA,  the 
NFLPA,  under  Mr.  Upshaw,  fought  for  these  forgotten  former  Players  who  played 
before 1959, and won them the right for the first time to a vested pension. In CBAs 
after 1993, their benefit has more than tripled. 

Before  the  1993  CBA,  these  players  were  receiving  a  ‘‘stipend’’  of  $60  per  season 
that was not guaranteed. They were bumped up to a guaranteed pension of $80 per 
season in 1993. That $80 has since increased to $250. 

The  1993  CBA  added  854  former  players  and  65  beneficiaries  to  the  Retirement 

Plan. 

Some  players  receive  a  smaller  than  usual  pension  because  they  elected  to  take 

their pensions many years before retirement age. 

Because a player who starts payments at age 45 (instead of 55) will receive bene-
fits for more years, his age-55 benefit is actuarially reduced by more than 50 percent 
in this situation, since they will receive their pension for ten more years. 

The option of taking Retirement Plan benefits early (prior to age 55) is no longer 
available  to  current  players.  The  bargaining  parties  eliminated  it  1993  because  it 
was detrimental to retired players. 

• Because  of  legal  requirements,  the  option  continues  to  be  available  to  all  play-
• Players continue to take their pensions early, even though they are warned that 

ers who played a season prior to 1993. 

doing so will result in a reduction. 

Some players receive a small pension because they elected to take a ‘‘Social Secu-

rity Adjustment’’. 

Many  former  players  voluntarily  chose  to  front-load  their  retirement  benefits  by 
electing  a  ‘‘Social  Security  Adjustment’’  form  of  benefit,  in  which  the  majority  of 
their  retirement  benefit  is  paid  prior  to  age  62,  with  only  a  token  benefit  starting 
age 62. 

The  idea  behind  this  concept  is  that  Social  Security  benefits  would  make  up  all 
or  part  of  the  difference.  In  the  1970s,  the  players  at  that  time  asked  for  and  ob-
tained this option. 

Electing this option dramatically reduces the retirement benefits of players when 

they reach 62. 

Other reasons why some players are receiving smaller than usual pensions. 
Some players are divorced, and must share all or a substantial part of their retire-

ment benefit with an ex-wife. 

Many players who complain about the size of their monthly pension benefits have 
at  least  one,  and  often  a  combination,  of  the  factors  described  above  reducing  their 
monthly benefits. 
B. Second Career Savings Plan: First 401(k) Plan in Pro Sports. 
2 for 1 Match 

Beginning  in  a  player’s  second  year,  all  pre-tax  contributions  are  matched  at  a 

rate of $2 for every $1 a player puts in, up to $20,000. 

Players can make pre-tax contributions up to the IRS limit ($15,500 for 2007). 
Players who do not contribute any of their own money receive a more modest Club 

Prior  to  the  1993  CBA,  no  professional  sport  had  a  pension  plan  of  this  type. 

Gene’s efforts in the 1993 CBA established this Plan. 

The assets of the Savings Plan have grown from $0 in 1993 to over $800 million. 

contribution. 

C. NFL Player Annuity Program 

In  collective  bargaining  in  1998,  Mr.  Upshaw  fought  for  and  won  a  new  defined 
contribution plan, the NFL Player Annuity Program. This Program also provides de-
ferred compensation to players, as early as age 35. 

Players receive contributions based on the following schedule: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

61 
• in their second and third years, $5,000; 
• in their fourth year, $55,000; and 
• in subsequent years, $65,000. 
After  the  law  was  changed  in  2006,  Mr.  Upshaw  persuaded  the  NFL  in  the  2006 

CBA to contribute most of this money in a tax-favored form. 

The  total  assets  of  the  Annuity  Program  have  grown  from  $0  in  1998  to  about 

$340 million. 
V. Health Care Benefits 

A.  Five  Free  Years  of  Post-Career  Medical  Coverage:  After  the  recent  2006  CBA 
extension, all vested players now receive 5 years of free post-career medical coverage 
for themselves and their families. 

• In  a  recent  12  month  period,  Active  Players  paid  $11.5  million  to  provide  this 
coverage  to  former  Players.  This  coverage  has  been  improved  repeatedly  since 
the 1993 CBA. 

B.  Pre-Tax  Deposits  Into  Health  Reimbursement  Accounts  ($25,000  per  year/ 
$300,000 max): The 2006 CBA created a new plan that can be used by former play-
ers  to  pay  for  medical  benefits  or  medical  coverage  after  their  5  years  of  free  cov-
erage ends. 

Eligible  players  (playing  in  2004  and  after)  are  credited  (i.e.,  as  if  deposited  pre- 
tax  into  their  own  accounts)  with  accounts  valued  at  up  to  $300,000  ($25,000  per 
season  up  to  the  maximum  of  $300,000)  that  can  be  used  exclusively  to  pay  their 
medical expenses (including insurance premiums) and the medical expenses of their 
family members. 

The  player  can  use  account  to  pay  medical  expenses—without  paying  taxes, 
throughout his life, and if any amounts are left over at his death, the account passes 
to his eligible beneficiaries. 

C. 88 Plan: The 2006 CBA also created a new and innovative medical benefit ex-
clusively  for  former  Players  with  dementia.  This  plan  is  called  the  ‘‘88  Plan,’’  in 
honor  of  former  Baltimore  Colts  player  and  Hall  of  Fame  member  John  Mackey, 
whose jersey number was 88. 

As far as we know, this is the first plan in the country that provides special bene-
fits for employees who are afflicted with dementia, even when that dementia occurs 
decades after their employment has ceased. 

In  May  of  this  year,  NFLPA  Executive  Director  Gene  Upshaw  and  Harold  Hen-
derson  of  the  NFL  Management  Council  were  honored  by  the  Alzheimer’s  Associa-
tion in New York for this achievement. 

Although this Plan began in February 2007, it has already paid out over $500,000 
in  benefits.  Like  all  other  benefits  for  active  and  former  players,  this  cost  is  paid 
for by the active players. 

As of mid-September 2007, the 88 Plan had received 79 applications. 15 are pend-
ing.  Out  of  the  remaining  64,  60  have  been  approved,  an  approval  rate  of  94  per-
cent. 
VI. Other Charitable Retired Player Programs 

Widows  and  Surviving  Children  Benefits:  Under  the  2006  CBA,  the  NFLPA  was 
able  to  triple  the  benefits  paid  to  widows  and  surviving  children  of  former  NFL 
Players. 

Players Assistance Fund: In addition to all of the above benefits, the Players Asso-
ciation has long had a fund, called the ‘‘Players Assistance Fund,’’ that provides up 
to $20,000 to players in need. Last year alone the Players Assistance Fund paid over 
$1  million  to  146  players  in  need,  and  provided  almost  $500,000  for  scholarships 
and grants to charities. 

Retired  Players  Medical  and  Assistance  Fund:  The  NFLPA/NFL  recently-formed 
‘‘Alliance’’  to  coordinate  medical  support  services  for  retired  players  in  need  of 
care—comprised of the NFLPA Players Assistance Trust (PAT), the NFL Alumni As-
sociation’s  Dire  Need  Fund,  and  the  Hall  of  Fame  Enshrinee  Assistance  Fund.  In 
July 2007 these groups established an initial $7 million unified fund to pay for joint 
replacement  surgeries  and  to  address  other  financial  hardships  of  retired  players. 
Additional  funding  will  be  provided  by  current  and  retired  players,  and  NFL  clubs. 
The joint replacement surgeries will be available at no cost to retired players with-
out  insurance  or  with  financial  need.  The  NFLPA/NFL  are  in  the  process  of  identi-
fying 10–15 medical centers across the country to provide these surgeries. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Upshaw,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 

here and for your testimony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

62 

Commissioner Goodell, welcome. You may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF ROGER GOODELL, COMMISSIONER, 

NATIONAL FOOTBALL LEAGUE 

Mr.  GOODELL.  Chairman  Dorgan,  thank  you.  I  know—members 
of  the  Committee,  I  know  that  we’re  pressed  for  time,  so  I’ll  move 
as quickly as I can. 

Good  morning,  and  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  appear  today 
and  testify  on  this  very  important  subject.  We,  in  the  NFL,  strive 
to  do  everything  in  a  responsible  and  comprehensive  fashion,  and 
we  can  only  benefit  from  objective,  thoughtful  reviews  of  our  poli-
cies and our programs. 

I am joined here today by Harold Henderson and Dennis Curran, 
both  who  have  been  deeply  involved  in  the  development  adminis-
tration  of  player  benefit  programs  for  the  past  two  decades.  If  you 
have  any  questions  regarding  individual  cases,  I’m  certain  that 
they, or one of Mr. Upshaw’s colleagues, could respond better than 
I can today. 

I’m  also  joined  by  Jim  Irsay,  the  owner  of  the  defending  Super 
Bowl Champion, Indianapolis Colts, who, like all NFL owners, has 
a  keen  interest  in  the  welfare  of  our  NFL  alumni  and  has  grown 
up in the NFL, just like I. 

I recently completed my first year as Commissioner. I have spent 
a considerable amount of time with retired players and listening to 
their  views.  And,  while  I  would  candidly  acknowledge  that  we 
would have more work to do, I want to outline both the steps taken 
thus  far  and  the  framework  within  which  we  are  approaching  this 
issue, going forward. 

I  begin  from  a  premise  which  I  think  no  one  seriously  disputes: 
the  men  who  played  professional  football  decades  ago  deserve  our 
respect  and  recognition,  and  their  contributions  to  our  game  must 
never  be  overlooked.  I  honor  them,  and  neither  I,  nor  the  NFL 
clubs, will turn our backs on them. And this is not Gene Upshaw’s 
problem  alone,  nor  is  it  the  NFL’s.  The  responsibility  for  helping 
retired  players  belongs  to  all  of  us—NFL  owners,  the  union,  cur-
rent and retired players, and me, as Commissioner. I must be com-
passionate, creative, and responsible. 

We  are  proud  of  the  fact  that  player  benefits  steadily  improved 
over  time.  While  many  businesses  have  terminated  their  pension 
plans, or turned them over to the Federal Pension Guaranty Board, 
we  have  both  negotiated  steady  increases  in  our  benefits  and 
agreed  to  apply  those  increases  on  a  retroactive  basis.  In  the  last 
10  years,  owners  have  increased  their  obligations  by  roughly  $400 
million,  virtually  all  of  which  has  been  for  the  benefit  of  retired 
players. Our disability plan offers a range of benefits, including ac-
tive  football,  inactive,  and  football  degenerative,  total  and  perma-
nent  disability  benefits  and  line-of-duty  partial  disability  benefits. 
We  recently  added  another  benefit,  which  Gene  spoke  about, 
known  as  the  88  Plan,  which  provides  up  to  $88,000  per  year  for 
former  players  suffering  from  dementia,  without  requiring  proof 
that the dementia is football-related. 

Benefits available under our disability plan have also grown sub-
stantially over the past 15 years. The football-related total and per-
manent disability benefit is now $224,000 per year. An active play-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

63 

er  whose  total  and  permanent  disability  is  not  related  to  football, 
but,  rather,  to  an  automobile  accident  or  some  other  off-the-  field 
incident,  receives  $134,000  per  year.  Former  players  with  football- 
related  degenerative  disabilities  receive  $110,000  per  year.  These 
payments continue as long as he remains disabled. 

Players  with  at  least  3  years  of  experience  are  eligible  for  bene-
fits,  even  if  the  disability  is  not  football-related.  Eligible  players 
can  still  apply  for  football  degenerative  benefits  for  up  to  15  years 
after they retire from the NFL. The NFL plan provides for payment 
of disability benefits on a retroactive basis, so players are not prej-
udiced  if  there  are  delays  in  the  application  and  administration 
process.  And  NFL  disability  benefits  are  not  offset  by  medical  or 
workers’  compensation  payments.  We  believe  these  features,  far 
from being exclusionary, demonstrate our commitment to providing 
fair  and  generous  benefits  to  players  and  their  families.  And  the 
record  bears  them  out.  Since  2000,  we  have  paid  more  than  $110 
million  to  players  from  the  1960s  to  the  present  who  qualified  for 
disability benefits. 

Like  you,  I  have  heard  concerns  expressed  about  red  tape  and 
the  complexity  of  the  application  process.  We  have  taken  recent 
steps  to  address  that  problem,  and  I  think  there  is  more  we  can 
do. We have tried to ensure that the standards by which disability 
claims  are  evaluated  are  clear  and  understandable,  and,  therefore, 
more  easily  and  evenly  applied.  Decisions  regarding  line-of-duty 
disability are based on standards developed by the American Med-
ical  Association.  We  also  recently  agreed  to  expand  the  standards 
for  determining  total  and  permanent  disability.  If  a  player  has 
been determined to be eligible for disability benefits by Social Secu-
rity, that will also apply for NFL disability payments. 

Our retirees have my personal commitment to continue the effort 
to  identify  and  implement  any  reasonable  procedural  changes  that 
would allow disability determinations to be made more quickly and 
reliably.  And  Gene  and  I  have  agreed  to  work  hard  on  this  issue. 
This does not mean that every person who seeks disability bene-
fits will, or should, receive them. And it does not mean that mean, 
even  if  approved,  every  applicant  will  receive  the  amount  he  re-
quests. But we will continue to strive to help those who need bene-
fits or other support. 

Apart  from  addressing  the  workings  of  the  disability  plan,  we 
have recently taken some additional steps to address specific needs 
of former players. Earlier this year, we joined the NFL Players As-
sociation,  the  NFL  Alumni  Association,  and  the  Pro  Football  Hall 
of  Fame  to  establish  an  Alliance  to  bring  together  different  groups 
seeking  to  help  retired  players  in  need.  As  a  first  step,  we  agreed 
to  create  a  fund,  set  initially  at  $7  million,  to  fund  two  specific 
medical  initiatives.  First,  to  provide  full  or  partial  funding  of  hip, 
knee,  or  shoulder  replacement  surgery  and  related  rehabilitation 
for former players at a network of leading hospitals throughout the 
country  that  can  guarantee  quality  care.  Second,  to  provide  an  ex-
panded national program of cardiovascular risk screening and edu-
cation  for  former  players.  Apart  from  these  two  programs,  we  are 
also  exploring  ways  of  providing  support  for  older  players  in  need 
of assisted-living arrangements and other specific medical needs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

64 

Finally,  we  are  expanding  our  outreach  efforts  to  better  identify 
former  players  with  special  needs  so  that  our  alliance  can  provide 
financial  assistance  to  those  proud  former  players  and  their  fami-
lies,  who  are  sometimes  hesitant  to  ask  for  assistance.  As  needed, 
our alliance will provide additional funding for these initiatives. 

Some  of  the  leaders  addressing  this  issue—former  players  like 
Jerry  Kramer  or  Hall  of  Famers  Coach  Ditka,  Willie  Lanier,  and 
Merlin  Olsen—have  met  with  us,  and  continue  to  do  so.  Today, 
there  are  approximately  4,900  NFL  retired  players  eligible  to  re-
ceive  disability  benefits.  Like  many  groups  of  that  size,  the  cir-
cumstances  vary  widely.  Fortunately,  the  vast  majority  remain  ac-
tive and productive, and do not need to be involved in the disability 
system. But we remain proud of the comprehensive and improving 
package of benefits provided to players, and we will continue work-
ing to do as much as possible to help those in need. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  your  committee 

today. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Goodell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROGER GOODELL, COMMISSIONER, 

NATIONAL FOOTBALL LEAGUE 

Chairman  Dorgan,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice-Chairman  Stevens,  and  Members  of 

the Committee: 

Good  morning  and  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  appear  today  and  testify  on  this 
important  subject.  I  do  not  believe  that  this  subject  is,  or  should  be,  immune  from 
Congressional  scrutiny.  To  the  contrary,  the  National  Football  League  has  always 
strived  to  conduct  itself  in  the  public  interest,  and  to  do  everything  in  a  first-class 
way. We can only benefit from objective, thoughtful reviews of our policies and pro-
grams. And so I welcome the opportunity to be with you today. 

I  am  joined  here  today  by  Harold  Henderson,  our  Executive  Vice  President  of 
Player Programs, and Dennis Curran, our Senior Vice President and labor relations 
counsel. Both Mr. Henderson and Mr. Curran have been deeply involved for the past 
two decades in collective bargaining, including on player benefits, and in the admin-
istration of these benefit programs by the joint NFL/NFL Players Association Retire-
ment Board. 

I recently completed my first year as Commissioner of the NFL. During that year, 
I have spent a considerable amount of time with retired players and on the concerns 
raised by a number of them. And while I would candidly acknowledge that we have 
more work to do, I want to outline both the steps taken thus far, and the framework 
within which we are approaching this issue going forward. 

In  that  context  I  should  add  that  I  cannot  comment  on  the  specifics  of  any  indi-
vidual case. In my role as Commissioner, I have not read the disability claims files, 
and  I  am  not  qualified  to  speak  to  the  medical  and  legal  issues  raised  in  any  indi-
vidual  case.  Although  I  appoint  one  half  of  the  Trustees  on  the  Retirement  Board, 
those  Trustees  act  in  a  fiduciary  capacity  and  I  never  discuss  pending  cases  with 
them.  Insofar  as  you  may  have  questions  regarding  individual  cases,  I  am  certain 
that  Mr.  Henderson  or  Mr.  Curran,  or  one  of  Mr.  Upshaw’s  colleagues,  could  re-
spond better than I can today. 

In  considering  the  subject  of  benefits  for  retired  players,  I  begin  from  a  premise 
which  I  think  no  one  seriously  disputes—the  men  who  played  professional  football 
decades  ago  deserve  our  respect  and  recognition,  and  their  contributions  to  our 
game  must  never  be  overlooked.  I  honor  them  and  their  achievements  and  neither 
I nor the NFL clubs will turn our backs on them. 

Second,  while  it  might  be  tempting  to  say—as  some  have—that  this  is  Gene 
Upshaw’s  problem  to  solve,  that  is  neither  fair  nor  accurate.  The  responsibility  for 
addressing the needs of retired players belongs to all of us. The retired players, the 
current players, the clubs, Gene as head of the Union, and I as the Commissioner— 
all  of  us  have  a  role  to  play.  We  will  continue  to  address  this  issue  in  a  way  that 
is compassionate, creative, and realistic. 

Third,  just  as  it  would  be  wrong  to  say  this  is  Gene  Upshaw’s  problem  to  solve, 
it  would  be  wrong  to  say  that  the  NFL  can  or  should  solve  the  problem  by  itself. 
While  some  may  not  believe  this,  the  fact  is  that  we  cannot  solve  every  problem  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

65 

every type that has been identified, and certainly not in a way that will satisfy ev-
eryone.  NFL  clubs  currently  spend  close  to  60  percent  of  their  gross  revenues  on 
player benefits and salaries. Our clubs contributed almost $150 million last year to 
finance  medical,  disability,  and  retirement  benefits  for  former  players,  and  during 
the  term  of  our  current  collective  bargaining  agreement,  we  project  that  our  clubs 
will spend more than $700 million to fund just this package of player benefits. Own-
ers are responsibly addressing these concerns, but they are simply not in a position 
to absorb significant incremental costs. 

In  meetings  with  Committee  and  personal  staff,  our  office  and  the  NFLPA  have 
provided  you  with  a  comprehensive  summary  of  the  benefits  provided  to  retired 
players.  Those  benefits  have  steadily  improved  over  time,  and  among  the  benefits 
available to a player who retires from the NFL today are all of the following: 

• A  defined  benefit  pension  plan  with  a  benefit  that  is  geared  only  to  years  of 
service, not to the player’s earnings. If a player with 10 years of service begins 
to receive his pension at age 55, he receives $56,000 per year; if he waits until 
age 65, he receives $147,000 per year. These amounts have grown steadily, and 
pension  benefits  have  been  increased  in  each  new  collective  bargaining  agree-
ment over the past 15 years. For example, a player who retired 25 years ago— 
in 1982—and who begins to receive his pension at age 55 has seen his pension 
benefit credit more than double since he retired as a result of increases agreed 
to in collective bargaining. 
• At  a  time  when  companies  all  over  America—many  of  which  are  considerably 
larger than the NFL—have terminated their pension plans or turned them over 
to  the  Federal  pension  guaranty  board,  we  have  both  negotiated  steady  in-
creases  in  our  benefits,  and  agreed  to  apply  those  increases  on  a  retroactive 
basis. In our most recent agreement in 2006, we agreed to increase pension obli-
gations  by  more  than  $200  million.  In  the  last  10  years,  we  have  increased 
those  obligations  by  roughly  $400  million—virtually  all  of  which  has  been  for 
the  benefit  of  retired  players.  I  think  everyone  would  agree  that  this  is  a  sub-
stantial  additional  commitment  by  our  member  clubs  to  former  and  current 
players. 
• We also offer a 401(k) plan, in which player contributions are matched on a 2:1 
basis  by  the  clubs  up  to  $20,000  per  year.  Players  have  access  to  these  funds 
as early as age 45. 
• A player annuity plan, under which eligible players receive an NFL contribution 
of  $65,000  per  year  to  provide  transition  income  to  players.  They  have  access 
to these funds as early as age 35. 
• Five  years  of  post-career  medical  care  and  a  health  reimbursement  account  of 
• A lump sum severance benefit paid upon retirement from the NFL based on the 

up to $300,000 for use later in life. 

number of seasons played. 

We  also,  as  the  Committee  knows,  have  a  disability  plan  which  offers  a  range  of 
benefits,  including  Total  &  Permanent,  Football  degenerative,  and  ‘‘Line  of  Duty’’ 
benefits. We recently added another benefit, known as the ‘‘88 Plan,’’ which provides 
up  to  $88,000  per  year  for  former  players  suffering  from  dementia,  without  requir-
ing proof that the dementia is football related. For other categories of disability, the 
benefits range from $18,000 per year to $224,000 per year, depending on the nature 
and  severity  of  the  disability.  These  benefits  are  in  addition  to  any  state  workers’ 
compensation. In addition, not all disability benefits are based on a complete inabil-
ity to work. 

Benefits  available  under  the  disability  plan  have  also  grown  substantially  over 
the past 15 years. An active player who qualifies for football-related Total & Perma-
nent  disability  has  seen  his  annual  benefit  increase  from  $48,000  in  1993  to 
$224,000 today. An active player whose Total & Permanent disability is not related 
to  football  has  seen  his  annual  benefit  grow  to  $134,000.  And  former  players  with 
football-related ‘‘degenerative’’ disabilities have seen their annual benefit grow from 
$75,000  in  1993  to  $110,000  today.  These  are  annual  amounts  paid  to  the  player 
as long as he remains disabled. 

Our  disability  plan  has  a  number  of  features  that  make  it  unique  and  superior 
to  many  other  plans.  I  am  told  that  most  American  workers  have  no  employer-pro-
vided  disability  benefits.  A  report  released  last  month  by  the  Labor  Department 
showed  that  barely  3  out  of  every  10  workers  in  the  private  sector  have  access  to 
long  term  disability  coverage.  In  certain  sectors  of  the  economy  that  might  be  per-
ceived as higher risk, the rate of coverage is ever lower. 

The  NFL  Plan  covers  all  players  with  at  least  three  seasons  of  experience  (four 
years for players retiring before 1993) and provides for benefits even if the disability 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

66 

is  not  football-related.  With  as  few  as  3  years  of  NFL  experience,  a  former  player 
can receive benefits from the NFL disability plan even if his disability results from 
a car accident, a fall at home, or some other everyday cause. Moreover, eligible play-
ers  can  still  apply  for  football  degenerative  benefits  for  up  to  15  years  after  they 
retire from the NFL. 

The  NFL  Plan  provides  for  payment  of  disability  benefits  on  a  retroactive  basis, 
so  players  are  not  prejudiced  by  delays  in  the  application  and  administration  proc-
ess. A player who is approved will receive benefits retroactive to his date of applica-
tion.  If  the  disability  precedes  the  application,  the  player  can  receive  up  to  42 
months  of  benefits  on  a  retroactive  basis.  And,  finally,  NFL  disability  benefits  are 
not  offset  by  medical  or  workers’  compensation  payments,  or  any  other  NFL  bene-
fits, such as injury protection or severance pay. As the Committee knows, the work-
ers’  compensation  system  provides  lifetime  medical  and  other  benefits  to  players. 
NFL  disability  benefits  are  in  addition  to  any  payments  received  from  those  sys-
tems. 

We  believe  these  features,  far  from  being  exclusionary,  demonstrate  our  commit-
ment  to  providing  fair  and  generous  benefits  to  players  and  their  families.  And  the 
record  bears  that  out—since  2000,  we  have  paid  more  than  $110  million  to  players 
from the 1960s to the present who qualified for disability benefits. 

Like  you,  I  have  heard  concerns  expressed  about  ‘‘red  tape’’  and  the  complexity 
of the application process. We have taken recent steps to address that problem, and 
I think there is more we can do. One area of frustration is the Plan’s ‘‘Initial Claims 
Committee.’’  This  arises  out  of  new  regulations  adopted  by  the  Labor  Department 
in  2002.  At  the  time  these  regulations  were  being  considered,  we  filed  comments 
with  the  Department  noting  that  these  regulations  would  likely  have  the  effect  of 
slowing down decisions on disability claims, and urged that they not be adopted. As 
we said at the time, because of the sometimes complex nature of disability decisions, 
including  the  need  to  have  medical  examinations  completed  by  neutral  physicians, 
and the reports analyzed within 45 days, the new rules ‘‘will only force faster deni-
als.’’ The requirements imposed by the Labor Department have had the unintended 
consequence of making the application process longer and more complex, as our peo-
ple feared at the time they were proposed. 

In  the  future,  we  can  look  more  closely  at  how  we  decide  which  cases  need  to  be 
reconsidered. The statistics show that an overwhelming number of recipients are ap-
proved  to  continue  their  benefits,  which  rather  strongly  suggests  that  we  may  not 
need to review and reconsider cases as often as we have in the past. We have begun 
that  process  by  reducing  the  frequency  of  medical  re-evaluations  from  annually  to 
once every 3 years for players receiving Total & Permanent disability payments. 

When decisions need to be reconsidered at the Board level, we will begin making 
decisions outside of the Retirement Board’s quarterly meetings. Thus once an appli-
cation  is  complete,  or  additional  medical  evaluations  have  been  received,  the  Board 
can  consider  and  vote  on  the  application  by  fax  or  e-mail.  This  simple  change  will 
allow more expedited processing of applications. 

Finally, we have tried to ensure that the standards by which disability claims are 
evaluated  are  clear  and  understandable,  and  therefore  more  easily  applied.  As  one 
example,  decisions  regarding  ‘‘Line  of  Duty’’  disability,  which  is  a  partial  disability 
arising  from  football,  are  based  on  standards  developed  by  the  American  Medical 
Association. We also recently agreed to expand the standards for determining Total 
& Permanent disability by incorporating the medical findings of the Social Security 
Administration. If a player has been determined to be eligible for disability benefits 
by Social Security, no separate medical assessments will be needed. Instead, the de-
termination  of  the  Social  Security  Administration  will  govern  the  former  player’s 
medical  eligibility  for  NFL  disability  benefits.  Our  retirees  have  my  personal  com-
mitment to continue the effort to identify and implement any reasonable procedural 
changes that would allow disability determinations to be made more quickly and re-
liably. To that end, we have enlisted the assistance of independent counsel and ben-
efit  consultants  to  advise  us  on  best  practices  with  respect  to  disability  plans  and 
to recommend steps we can take to improve the administration of the Plan. 

This does not mean that every person who seeks disability benefits will, or should, 
receive  them.  That  needs  to  be  understood  by  all  parties.  Disability  benefits  are 
meant  to  assist  people  who  cannot  work,  not  simply  that  they  can  no  longer  play 
professional football. No disability plan, whether sponsored by a private insurer, by 
an  employer,  or  by  the  Federal  Government,  provides  benefits  to  anyone  who  ap-
plies.  And  it  does  not  mean  that,  even  if  approved,  every  applicant  will  receive  the 
amount  he  requests.  But  we  will  continue  to  strive  to  do  better,  and  to  be  seen  as 
doing better. 

I  now  want  to  address  certain  allegations  about  the  manner  in  which  decisions 
are made on disability applications. The administration of the disability plan is gov-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

67 

erned by Federal law and by regulations established by Federal agencies. The Plan 
operates as required under those regulations, including the use of an Initial Claims 
Committee,  neutral  physicians,  and  the  associated  time  limits.  The  people  who 
make decisions act as fiduciaries, who are obligated to follow the law and the terms 
of the Plan. 

There  are  those  who  claim  that  disability  applications  are  nonetheless  denied  as 
a  result  of  some  sort  of  grand  labor-management  conspiracy.  This  claim  assumes 
that an extraordinary number of people—myself, my predecessor, Gene Upshaw, the 
Trustees,  the  Plan  Administrator,  the  neutral  doctors,  Plan  counsel,  and  their  var-
ious staffs—have all agreed to deny benefits without regard to whether an applicant 
actually qualifies. 

Those  who  adhere  to  this  theory  also  dismiss  that  Federal  courts  throughout  the 
country  have  upheld  the  Retirement  Board’s  decisions  in  24  of  the  25  cases  that 
have  been  litigated.  The  critics  explain  that  away  by  saying  that  the  standard  of 
review  is  too  deferential,  ignoring  that  the  standard  is  set  by  Federal  law,  not  by 
the NFL, and is consistently applied in reviewing decisions by benefit plan adminis-
trators and fiduciaries in all sectors of the American life. 

But  no  matter  how  deferential  the  standard  of  review  may  be,  no  court  would 
defer  to  a  decision  tainted  by  collusion  or  conspiracy.  The  simple  reality  is  that  no 
such claim has ever been proved and no court has ever made such a finding. These 
charges are as cynical as they are unfounded, and the Committee should not dignify 
them here. 

There  is  one  other  myth  about  decision-making  that  should  be  dispelled—that 
being  that  many  players  are  either  denied  benefits  altogether,  or  forced  to  endure 
extraordinary  delay,  because  the  Union  and  management  trustees  routinely  divide 
3–3  on  applications.  There  is  no  basis  whatsoever  for  this  suggestion.  In  fact,  since 
the Initial Claims Committee was put into place in 2002, it has deadlocked on only 
six  claims  in  a  line-of-duty  disability  and  only  32  cases  of  Total  &  Permanent  Dis-
ability.  Every  other  claim  filed—almost  600  claims—was  decided  unanimously,  one 
way or another. 

Where claims are appealed to the Retirement Board, the same is true. The Board 
seldom  splits  in  its  votes.  And  even  if  there  is  a  split  in  the  Retirement  Board,  the 
case is referred to a neutral physician, called the Medical Advisory Physician. That 
doctor’s  report  is  final  and  binding.  That  report  decides  the  case—not  the  Union 
trustees or the Management Trustees. 

Apart from addressing the workings of the disability plan, we have recently taken 

some additional steps to address specific needs of former players. 

Earlier  this  year,  we  joined  with  the  NFL  Players’  Association,  the  NFL  Alumni 
Association,  and  the  Pro  Football  Hall  of  Fame  to  establish  an  ‘‘Alliance’’  to  bring 
together the different groups seeking to help retired players. As a first step, we have 
agreed  to  create  a  fund,  set  initially  at  $7  million,  to  fund  two  specific  medical  ini-
tiatives. 

First,  to  provide  full  or  partial  funding  of  hip,  knee  or  shoulder  replacement  sur-
gery  and  related  rehabilitation  for  former  players  at  a  network  of  leading  hospitals 
throughout the country. 

Second, to provide an expanded national program of cardiovascular risk screening, 

and education for former players. 

Apart  from  these  two  programs,  we  are  also  exploring  ways  of  providing  support 
for  players  in  need  of  assisted  living  arrangements,  and  other  specific  medical 
needs. 

Finally,  we  are  expanding  our  outreach  efforts  to  better  identify  former  players 
with  special  needs,  so  that  our  Alliance  can  provide  financial  assistance  to  those 
proud  former  players  and  their  families  who  are  sometimes  hesitant  to  ask  for  as-
sistance. 

We  recognize  that  this  is  not  a  short-term  problem.  Some  of  the  leaders  address-
ing  this  issue—former  players  like  Jerry  Kramer  or  Hall  of  Famers  Willie  Lanier 
and Merlin Olsen—have met with us and continue to do so. I am sure that together 
we have the resources, creativity and determination to make a real difference in the 
lives of our former players. 

There  are  today  approximately  8,000  active  and  retired  NFL  Players.  Like  many 
groups  of  8,000  people,  their  circumstances  vary  widely.  We  are  proud  of  the  com-
prehensive and improving package of benefits provided to players, and we will con-
tinue working to do as much as possible to help those in need. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify before your Committee today. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Commissioner  Goodell,  thank  you  very  much 

for being here, and for your statement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

68 

Mr. Mike Ditka, from—player, coach, Chicago Bears. 
Mr. Ditka—— 

STATEMENT  OF  MIKE  DITKA,  MEMBER,  NFL  HALL  OF  FAME; 
FORMER  NFL  PLAYER,  CHICAGO  BEARS,  PHILADELPHIA 
EAGLES,  DALLAS  COWBOYS;  AND  FORMER  HEAD  COACH, 
CHICAGO BEARS, NEW ORLEANS SAINTS 
Mr. Ditka: Whatever. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  DITKA.  Mr.  Chairman  and  distinguished  members  of  the 
Committee,  I’m—I  appreciate  you  being  here,  but  I’m  not  sure  I 
really  understand  it.  The  Congress  of  the  United  States  of  this 
great country has a lot more important things to do than this. And 
it’s a shame that it’s come to this. But it has come to this. 

I  want  to  clarify  one  thing.  We’ve  had  one  of  my  former  players 
take  some  pretty  good  potshots,  and  that  seems  to  be  his  nature. 
I’m not mad at anybody, especially this man or that man. The sys-
tem’s broken. Fix it. 

Football—and  listen  to  me—football  owes  me  nothing.  Not  a 
thing. But I owe everything I have in life to this great game. From 
high  school  to  college  to  professional,  I’ve  been  able  to  participate 
as  a  player,  an  assistant  coach,  a  head  coach,  for  almost  50  years 
in this League, and now I’m an expert, I get to talk about it. That’s 
pretty interesting. 

The  system  is  broke,  fix  it.  They  know  what’s  broke,  they  know 
how to fix it. We’re not talking about the money. Everybody knows 
the  money’s  there.  Fix  the  system.  Don’t  make  proud  men  beg. 
Don’t make ’em jump through hoops. They have dignity. Let people 
live out their lives with some respect, that’s all I’m asking. I’m not 
asking  for  an  increase  in  my  pension,  as  has  been  mentioned.  No-
body  cares  about  that  stuff.  And  it  was  thrown  up,  what  I  get  in 
my pension. I also waited to age 65 to get it. That—I’m entitled to 
that.  I  played  in  this  game.  But  the  guys  who—these  players, 
today, say, ‘‘Well, they’re doing—they’re making all these contribu-
tions  to  the  former  players.’’  They  should.  The  former  players  are 
the  reason  this  League  is  what  it  is,  not  the  total  reason,  they’re 
not  the  whole  of  it,  they’re  part  of  it.  The  players  today  are  only 
the  keepers  of  a  great  game.  The  makers  of  a  great  game  came  a 
long time ago, and will continue to come, long after these guys are 
gone.  Just  let  them  live  out  their  life  with  a  little  bit  of  respect. 
We  started  a  Hall  of  Fame  Assistance  Dire  Need  Fund  about  8 
years ago from a golf tournament I have. We’ve been giving money 
to former Hall of Famers—or Hall of Famers, and, actually, former 
players who aren’t Hall of Famers. And we’ve been helping ’em out. 
It’s  a  little,  here.  It’s  $10,000,  it’s  $5,000,  it’s  $2,500—it’s  no  big 
deal,  but  it  helps  out.  They  need  the  help.  And  they’re  not—they 
don’t even know where to go to get other help. 

Now, maybe this is being—they’re being made more aware of the 
situation  and  how  to  get  help.  But  all  we’re  saying  is,  hey,  you 
know,  nobody’s  mad  at  anybody.  I’m  grateful.  I  just  think—this 
shouldn’t  be  happening.  I  really  mean  that  from  the  bottom  of  my 
heart.  You  people  have  more  important  things  to  do  than  what 
we’re doing. And I hope it doesn’t come down to—any decisions you 
have to make, I want you to hear the story. The League—this man 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

69 

is  a  good  man,  he’s  got  a  good  heart.  Gene  Upshaw,  I’m  sure,  is 
a good man with a good heart. Do the right thing. Fix the system. 
Quit  arguing  about  it.  Everybody’ll  go  away.  And—especially  me, 
because  I  didn’t  ‘‘chose’’  this,  it  chose  me,  believe  me.  This  is  not 
what I’m looking to be doing, believe me. 

So, I just want to tell you, I have no charts to show you, if—you’ll 

be grateful of that. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  DITKA.  Thank  you  for  your  time,  and  I  do  apologize.  I  mean 

it. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ditka follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MIKE DITKA, MEMBER, NFL HALL OF FAME; FORMER NFL 
PLAYER,  CHICAGO BEARS,  PHILADELPHIA EAGLES,  DALLAS COWBOYS;  AND FORMER 
HEAD COACH, CHICAGO BEARS, NEW ORLEANS SAINTS 
Chairman  Inouye,  Subcommittee  Chairman  Dorgan,  Ranking  Member  Stevens, 
Subcommittee  Ranking  Member  DeMint,  Members  of  the  Committee  and  distin-
guished guests, my name is Mike Ditka. I played for the Chicago Bears and the Dal-
las  Cowboys  from  1961  to  1972.  I  also  was  an  assistant  coach  for  the  Cowboys  and 
the  head  coach  of  the  Bears  1985  Super  Bowl  championship  team.  Since  1992,  I 
have been involved in broadcasting of NFL games as a color commentator and ana-
lyst,  as  well  as  other  business  ventures.  I  have  been  fairly  successful  and,  at  the 
outset, I’d like to clarify that nothing could interest me less than the size of my own 
NFL  pension.  I  am  here  today  on  behalf  of  many  other  retired  NFL  players  who 
have not been as fortunate as I in the years since their retirements because the in-
juries they received playing the game of football prevented them from making a liv-
ing. 

For some time, now, I have been involved in charitable efforts to aid disabled and 
economically  challenged  NFL  retirees  through  nonprofit  organizations  such  as  the 
Gridiron Greats and the Mike Ditka Hall of Fame Trust. For some time, these and 
other  organizations  have  picked  up  the  slack  left  by  an  NFLPA  that  does  not  do 
enough for disabled retired players and an ownership that seeks to avoid doing any-
thing  at  all,  both  of  which  seem  to  have  handed  the  operations  of  the  Plan  to  an 
aggressive  litigation  firm  charged  with  delaying  or  denying  every  legitimate  claim 
that  players  bring  forth.  What  these  charities  do,  all  they  can  do,  is  place  a  band- 
aid  upon  the  huge  wound  these  other  groups  are,  at  best,  ignoring  by  minimizing 
it’s  gravity  and  keeping  it’s  true  extent  secret.  We  will  continue  to  do  this  work  as 
long as the problem exists. But we will also continue to point out the responsibility 
the other parties I’ve mentioned have for perpetuating and worsening this problem, 
and  their  corresponding  duty  to  shoulder  the  burden  of  fixing  it  before  those  who 
suffer  under  the  current  system  conveniently  die  and  reduce  the  excess  financial 
burden upon the Plan’s funds. 

I’d  like  to  address  the  question  of  disability  pensions  under  the  Bert  Bell  Retire-
ment  Plan.  It  is  hard  to  say  what  is  more  disturbing:  what  we  know,  or  what  we 
don’t know. What we know is bad enough. To start with, the Plan provides disability 
benefits to too few players (no more than 200 or so, although this statistic often goes 
up  or  down  in  statements  by  the  Plan’s  lawyers).  According  to  the  Plan,  there  are 
more than 7,000 retired players who are entitled to receive some kind of retirement 
benefit.  (The  actual  number  is  probably  significantly  higher,  but  I’ll  use  7,000  here 
to  describe  the  Plan  as  generously  as  I  can.)  This  means  that,  at  most,  3  or  4  per-
cent  of  retired  players  are  receiving  any  kind  of  disability  benefit.  And  this  is  in 
a  game  that  pushes  most  players  out  of  the  league  within  a  few  years—often  due 
to injury (the average playing career is around 3.5 years). It is a collision sport, not 
merely a contact sport, which is probably the most violent public spectacle since the 
gladiatorial games. So the idea that only three or four out of every 100 retired play-
ers  are  entitled  to  ANY  kind  of  disability  benefit  (not  just  the  top  level,  but  any 
kind at all) just clashes with common sense. 

On top of that, look at the number of retired players who have received disability 
benefits for brain injuries caused by multiple concussions. Again, according to state-
ments  by  the  Plan’s  lawyer  in  Sunday’s  Charlotte  Observer,  there  have  only  been 
four—ever,  in  history!  One  of  them  was  Mike  Webster.  And  the  Plan’s  representa-
tives  claim  not  to  know  the  number  of  players  who  have  applied  for  disability  due 
to  such  injuries.  Anyone  who  has  played  the  game,  especially  in  the  recent  past 
when it was often played on a concrete parking lot covered with a quarter-inch layer 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

70 

of  indoor-outdoor  carpeting  called  ‘‘Astroturf’’,  will  tell  you  that  NFL  football  often 
results in concussions and that players commonly receive multiple concussions over 
the course of their careers. Again, the idea that only four men who have ever played 
pro football have had disabling brain injuries just doesn’t make a lot of sense. 

Why  don’t  more  players  receive  the  disability  benefits  they  need?  There  are  lots 
of  answers,  starting  with  the  bargaining  process  between  the  union  and  the  NFL. 
Gene  Upshaw  described  his  attitude  toward  the  retired  players  last  year,  when  he 
told  a  newspaper  that  retired  players  ‘‘don’t  hire  me  and  they  can’t  fire  me.  They 
can complain about me all day long.’’ It’s possible that the union leadership doesn’t 
push  harder  for  fair  disability  benefits  because  they  think  it  might  mean  less  for 
current players. But part of the job of union leadership is to explain to current play-
ers  that  they  could  be  ex-players  next  week  or  next  month,  as  a  result  of  injuries 
or salary cap decisions. It’s actually in the interests of current players to push hard 
for  fair,  generous  disability  benefits—and  to  get  that  money  from  both  the  team 
owners and from current players. 

Look  at  it  this  way:  the  Plan  says  that  retired  players  receive  only  $20  million 
per year in disability benefits today. The players’ share of revenues under the salary 
cap  system  is  about  $4  billion  a  year.  Tripling  the  disability  payments  to  $60  mil-
lion—an increase of $40 million—would be only 1 percent of the players’ total share. 
If  the  players  and  the  owners  each  gave  an  extra  .5  percent  of  the  player’s  current 
share for disability pensions, they could easily cover this amount. 

Another big barrier to fair disability benefits is the way the Bert Bell Plan is run. 
We’ve heard the same stories from too many retired players to chalk this up to com-
plainers,  the  way  the  Plan  would  like  to  have  it.  All  claims  are  reviewed  by  two 
office  staff  who  possess  no  relevant  skills  for  reviewing  disability  claims.  If  they 
deadlock,  the  claim  is  denied.  None  of  the  members  of  the  Retirement  Board  have 
any  medical  training,  and  several  of  them  have  close  ties  to  the  union  president— 
including the agent who negotiated Mr. Upshaw’s $7 million contract. The Plan will 
delay  decisions  over  and  over  again—Mike  Webster’s  case  took  4  years  before  he 
had  a  final  decision.  Often  these  delays  are  so  that  the  Plan  can  request  multiple 
reports from doctors in the same specialty or closely related ones—‘‘doctor shopping’’ 
is  the  right  word  for  it.  We  all  know  that  if  you  ask  for  enough  medical  opinions, 
someone will eventually find that there is no disability, or disability at a lower level. 
And  the  Plan  spends  extraordinary  amounts  on  its  attorneys—$3.15  million  last 
year.  In  fact,  that’s  almost  one-sixth  of  what  the  Plan  claims  it  spent  on  all  dis-
ability payments. Once again, those numbers just don’t add up. 

All of this suggests that, under the Bert Bell Plan, the main emphasis is on mini-
mizing  the  benefits  paid  out,  not  on  making  sure  it’s  done  fairly.  The  website  for 
the  Plan’s  lawyers  has  boasted  about  how  many  times  they  have  defeated  claims 
by  retired  players.  But  the  number  of  lawsuits  suggests  that  something  is  broken 
in  the  Board’s  procedures.  According  to  the  Plan’s  attorneys,  it  has  been  sued  by 
almost one-quarter of the retired players whose claims were denied. This is not the 
sign of a healthy process. 

If  you  want  to  get  an  idea  of  how  the  Plan  really  works,  take  a  look  at  the  Mike 
Webster  case.  Here  was  a  guy  who  started  almost  250  games  for  the  Steelers,  and 
played  every  offensive  down  for  six  straight  seasons.  He  wasn’t  called  ‘‘Iron  Mike’’ 
for  nothing.  He  played  when  the  head  slap  was  legal,  and  probably  had  thousands 
of  serious  hits  to  his  head  and  dozens  of  concussions.  He  couldn’t  work  after  he  re-
tired, and was hired by the Kansas City Chiefs as a favor. His friends told the pen-
sion plan’s investigator that he wasn’t right mentally and never held a job. But the 
Bert  Bell  Plan  told  Mike  that  his  brain  injuries  weren’t  the  direct  result  of  playing 
football,  and  told  him  that  he  wasn’t  disabled  until  years  after  he  retired.  They  ig-
nored  the  opinion  of  their  own  doctor,  and  refused  to  look  at  the  evidence  from 
Mike’s  doctors.  And  it  took  so  long  to  decide  his  claim  that  he  died  in  2002  before 
the Plan had made a final decision. 

After he filed suit, the first judge who looked at the case said that given the over-
whelming evidence, the Bert Bell Plan had probably acted in bad faith. Did the Plan 
pay  Mike’s  children  then?  No.  They  appealed.  And  this  time  it  was  three  judges  in 
a Court of Appeals that said the Plan had ignored the unanimous medical evidence. 
They said it would require a ‘‘leap of faith’’ to agree with the Plan. And so the Plan 
paid  hundreds  and  hundreds  of  thousands  of  dollars  in  attorneys’  fees  to  fight  the 
case, and also paid for the time that Mike’s attorneys spent pursuing it. That helps 
explain  why  the  Bert  Bell  Plan  ran  up  a  $3.5  million  bill  for  attorneys  last  year— 
money  that  could  have  gone  to  injured  players.  And  even  today,  just  a  week  ago, 
representatives  of  the  Players  Association  claimed  that  Mike  Webster  was  actually 
working after he retired from football. That’s not true, and they know it. 

I’ve  talked  about  some  of  the  things  we  know  about  the  Bert  Bell  Plan.  But  it’s 
just as important to point out what we don’t know, and what I hope this Committee 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

71 

can  help  find  out  through  the  hearing  and  oversight  process.  Right  now,  the  Plan 
gives  out  virtually  no  information  about  the  number  of  players  receiving  disability 
benefits,  how  many  people  get  each  type  of  benefit,  even  the  total  dollars  paid  out 
each year for disability. The information that gets handed out by the Plan—only in 
response to Congressional and media scrutiny—is fragmentary and unreliable. What 
we  really  need  is  full  disclosure  by  the  Bert  Bell  Plan  of  all  the  key  information 
behind  the  disability  benefits,  so  that  the  retired  players,  and  the  union,  can  nego-
tiate  for  better  procedures,  changes  in  the  way  the  Plan  is  administered,  and  more 
money  for  disabled  retirees.  I  hope  that  this  kind  of  necessary  disclosure  is  one  re-
sult  of  this  Committee’s  work,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  so  that  the 
great men who built this league can lead lives of dignity after their retirement. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Ditka, thank you very much. 
The baseball folks said no one has any business holding hearings 

on steroids, either. 
Mr. DITKA. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN. But the fact is, because there were hearings on 
steroids,  the  changes  were  made  in  baseball  in  a  very  significant 
and  a  very  positive  way.  Perhaps  public  pressure  is  important 
when  you’re  talking  about  people’s  lives,  people  who  can’t  get  up 
and walk in the morning, and so on. So, I understand, I don’t—my 
preference  is  that—although  there  is  an  antitrust  exemption  and 
various  things,  my  preference  is  that  Congress  do  nothing  more 
than  hold  hearings  and  applying  some  pressure,  and,  perhaps, 
through that approach, we’ll get to the right result. 

Mr. Gale Sayers, Chicago Bears, Hall of Fame. 

STATEMENT OF GALE EUGENE SAYERS, MEMBER, NFL HALL 

OF FAME; AND FORMER NFL PLAYER, CHICAGO BEARS 

Mr.  SAYERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the  Com-

mittee, distinguished guests. 

My  name  is  Gale  Sayers.  I  was  a  running  back  for  the  Chicago 
Bears from 1961—1965 to 1971, when my career ended as a result 
of a knee injury. I have since had rewarding careers in athletic ad-
ministration  and  sports  marketing.  I  started  a  computer  business, 
in 1983, which has grown into a major provider of technology prod-
ucts and services. In short, I’m a man truly blessed by God and life, 
like my friends, Mike Ditka and Gene Upshaw. 

I’m  not  a  typical  NFL  retiree  who  has  suffered  through  the  dis-
ability  process  we  discuss  today.  As  a  board  member  of  a  charity 
that  helps  retired  players,  however,  I  have  seen  many  horror  sto-
ries.  I  am  here  for  those  who  are  not  as  lucky  as  I  was.  I’m  also 
here  as  a  member  of  the  NFL  family  who  is  worried  about  the  ef-
fects of—our broken disability system is having on the entire game. 
At  its  best,  football  is  a  family,  but  extreme  success  has  strained 
its  relationships.  Today,  the  NFL  is  a  $7-plus  billion  industry,  yet 
it  still  struggles  to  do  right  by  the  retired  players  whose  sacrifices 
built this game. 

I believe this failure is at the core of a general crisis in the game. 
You’ve  been  hearing  about  the  symptoms  almost  every  day.  What 
family can remain healthy if its younger players are convinced that 
every dollar spent on the health of its elders is a dollar out of their 
pockets? Does that message promote the respect among generations 
that  support  rules  of  good  conduct?  Doesn’t  this  attitude  endorse 
the selfish behavior we observe in some young players? The current 
disability  system  routinely  bars  retired  players  from  fair  access  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

72 

disability payments that offer a minimum standard of care. This is 
not  the  way  a  family  works,  and  is  not  the  face  the  NFL  should 
be—to—should present to the world, to the other families that pay 
for the tickets, the TV subscriptions, the hotdogs and jerseys. 

I  do  not  blame  anyone  for  this  failed  system,  but  we  will  all 
share  the  blame  if  we  don’t  pull  together  and  fix  it  now,  while 
these players are still alive and in need. 

I  heard  Gene  speak  about  his  efforts  to  obtain  more  benefits  for 
retirees.  I  take  him  at  his  word.  But  whatever  has  been  done  to 
date  has  not  been  enough,  because  the  problem  is  still  there.  He, 
the  NFLPA,  and  today’s  players  must  do  more.  I’ve  also  heard  a 
statement attributed to Mr. Goodell that the owners see this 40:60 
revenue split with the active players as so generous that they can-
not do more for retired players. I’m glad to hear him say that, you 
know,  the  owners  take,  you  know,  a  stake  in  helping  the  retired 
players. 

This  problem  belongs  to  the  entire  NFL  family,  including  the 
owners.  As  for  the  charitable  efforts  that  retired  players  have  en-
gaged in for the disabled among us, they will continue. We will all 
know  when  we’ve  done  enough,  because  the  problem  will  simply 
not  exist  anymore.  Until  then,  there  is  responsibility  to  take  and 
work  to  do.  Some  legislative  action  might  help  this  situation,  but 
today  I  want  to  make  a  more  immediate  appeal  to  the  Committee. 
Please  help  us  try  to  fix  this  problem.  You  call  this  an  oversight 
hearing,  and  I  think  that’s  just  what  we  need.  At  its  best,  football 
is  a  family  with  no  need  for  an  overseer,  where  bargaining  power 
is not an issue. But, in this new rich NFL, bargaining power is cru-
cial,  and  the  retired  players  have  none  without  your  help.  I  don’t 
ask  you  to  play  for  our  side,  only  keep  the  game  fair  and  keep  it 
going  until  the  job  is  done.  I  ask  this  committee  to  take  oversight 
over  a  bargaining  process  among  all  of  the  parties  represented  at 
this  table  by  asking  for  periodic  reports  to  the  Committee  on  our 
progress,  perhaps  every  30  days  or  so.  If  you  do  this,  I  think  we 
can get the job done. 

For my part, if you will be the referee, I promise to give you my 

best game. 

Thank  you  for  your  consideration  and  for  your  oversight  on  this 

very important subject. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Sayers follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GALE EUGENE SAYERS, MEMBER, NFL HALL OF FAME; 

AND FORMER NFL PLAYER, CHICAGO BEARS 

Chairman  Inouye,  Subcommittee  Chairman  Dorgan,  Ranking  Member  Stevens, 
Subcommittee Ranking Member DeMint, Members of the Commerce Committee and 
distinguished guests, my name is Gale Sayers. I was a running back for the Chicago 
Bears from 1965 to 1971, when my career ended as a result of a knee injury. I have 
since  had  rewarding  careers  in  athletic  administration  and  sports  marketing,  until 
I launched a business in 1983, which has grown into a major provider of technology 
products  and  services.  In  short,  I  am  a  man  truly  blessed  by  God  and  life,  like  my 
friends Mike Ditka and Gene Upshaw. Like them, as well, I am not at all a typical 
NFL  retiree  who  suffered  a  career-ending  injury  and  then  suffered  again  through 
the  current  disability  process  that  is  the  subject  of  today’s  hearing.  But  my  own 
blessings  bring  responsibilities,  and  I  am  here  for  those  who  were  not  as  lucky  as 
I  was,  many  of  whom  have  gone  through  that  unfortunate  experience.  As  a  board 
member  of  a  charity  that  helps  retired  players,  I  have  heard  many  of  their  horror 
stories and I want that system reformed. Moreover, as Mike has often said, football 
owes  us  nothing  and  we  owe  football  everything.  I  agree.  So,  as  I  see  it,  I  am  here 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

73 

for  football,  too—a  game  I  love  and  a  family  I  love.  As  a  member  of  that  family, 
I  am  worried  about  the  effects  our  broken  disability  system  is  having  on  the  fabric 
of  the  entire  game.  I  call  football  a  family  because  that’s  what  it  has  always  been 
at  its  best.  Now,  families  don’t  always  get  along  perfectly.  Ask  my  old  friend  and 
teammate,  Dick  Butkus,  about  negotiating  a  contract  personally  with  our  old  coach 
and  owner,  George  Halas,  as  was  the  common  custom  in  my  day,  and  you  might 
hear a response that I would not dare put in writing before the eyes of the Senate. 
If,  however,  you  were  to  speak  harshly  of  Mr.  Halas  yourself,  Dick  would  jump  to 
the defense of ‘‘Papa Bear’’ the way any of you would respond if a stranger criticized 
a  member  of  your  own  family.  The  violent  nature  of  our  game  makes  us  pull  to-
gether like family members. When someone is playing hurt, we all know in the lock-
er  room.  We  protect  the  secret  so  he  won’t  be  vulnerable,  and  we  watch  his  back 
during  the  game  in  an  effort  to  protect  him  from  further  injury.  Like  a  family,  we 
watch out for one another. 

Extreme  financial  success  can  put  strain  on  any  family’s  relationships.  The  foot-
ball  family  is  no  exception.  Today,  the  NFL  is  a  $7-plus  billion  per  year  industry, 
yet  it  still  struggles  to  do  right  by  the  retired  players  whose  blood,  sweat  and  sac-
rifice  built  the  game.  Sometimes  it  seems  as  if  football  has  been  torn  apart  by  its 
own success. I believe that is what has happened with the NFL today. I also believe 
that the failure to address this disability issue is at the core of a more general crisis 
in  the  game.  You’ve  been  hearing  about  the  symptoms  of  that  crisis  almost  every 
day recently. But what family can remain healthy if its senior members are thought 
of as a useless burden on its budget? Or if its younger members accept the idea that 
every dollar spent on the health of their elders is a dollar out of their pockets? Will 
that family engender respect among its generations and a sense of authority to sup-
port rules of good conduct or common sense? If this disrespect for the history of the 
game, which is embodied in its retired players, is allowed to continue unchallenged, 
if  generations  of  older  players  continue  to  be  seen  as  expensive  and  irrelevant,  can 
anyone  be  surprised  if  the  recent  displays  of  selfishness,  irresponsibility,  even  of 
criminality,  continue  to  be  exhibited  by  growing  numbers  of  young  players?  When 
families break down in this way, such behavior is always the result. 

When  I  came  into  the  league,  older  players  and  retired  players  were,  generally, 
treated  with  respect  and  seen  as  sources  of  authority  and  wisdom.  Reverence  for 
them  inspired  reverence  for  the  game  itself,  its  history,  its  rules  and  the  need  to 
project  some  image  of  integrity  to  the  fans  who,  believe  it  or  not,  look  to  football 
as  more  than  just  a  game  on  the  field.  This  reverence  for  the  people  who  built  the 
game is no longer common and the results are on display everywhere. I’m not saying 
my generation of players was a bunch or angels or that the current one is the oppo-
site—far  from  it.  I  see  a  young  man  like  Ladanian  Tomlinson  or  Peyton  Manning 
and I know there is still a sense of stewardship and honor alive among the current 
generation.  But  that  ethic  is  coming  under  greater  attack  today  than  ever  before 
and  exclusive  worship  of  the  bottom  line  is  eroding  the  strength  the  game  derives 
from  the  extended  family  culture  it  was  founded  upon  generations  ago.  We  need  to 
turn that around and we must begin that effort today. 

We  at  this  table,  all  members  of  football’s  family,  must  pull  together  and  fix  this 
disability  problem.  If  we  fail  to  do  so,  I  believe  we  will  continue  to  see  more  and 
more signs of moral and social decay in our game. If we succeed, however, I believe 
many  good  things  will  follow.  I  truly  believe  we  can  pull  together  as  a  family  and 
save  our  game,  but  I  am  also  certain  that  we  will  need  the  help  of  this  Committee 
to do so, as I will explain. 

The  current  disability  system  routinely  bars  retired  players  from  fair  access  to 
disability  payments  that  offer  a  minimal  standard  of  care.  The  word  often  heard  is 
that the inconvenient ‘‘problem’’ of disability will eventually pass away—a nice way 
of  saying  that  the  retirees  themselves  will  conveniently  die.  This  is  not  the  way  a 
family  should  work  and  it  is  not  the  face  the  NFL  should  present  to  the  world— 
to the other families that pay for all the tickets, the TV subscriptions, the hot dogs 
and  the  jerseys.  A  game  worth  over  $7  billion  per  year  owes  the  fans  that  support 
it  something  more  than  just  a  mirror  held  up  to  all  of  society’s  problems.  Much  is 
given  to  this  game,  so  much  should  be  expected  of  it,  I  would  argue,  and  the  game 
and  its  players  should  be  held  up  to  a  higher  standard.  My  friend  Charles  Barkley 
once  famously  said,  ‘‘I  am  not  a  role  model.’’  He  meant  that  as  a  caution  to  society 
at  large  not  to  hold  up  athletes  up  as  heroes.  I  agree  with  that  warning  whole-
heartedly,  but  I  do  not  agree  that  athletes,  as  public  figures,  and  the  games  that 
benefit  from  presenting  their  images  to  the  world,  do  not  have  a  special  burden  of 
responsibility  to  the  public.  This  is  not  something  we  choose,  it  is  something  that 
is thrust upon us as and we must accept some sense of responsibility because, frank-
ly,  children  are  watching.  Their  parents  should  pay  heed  to  Charles’  warning  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

74 

teach  their  children  accordingly,  but  it  is  our  responsibility  and  the  game’s  to  act 
as if they cannot. 

The image this disability issue projects to the public is beneath the dignity of the 
NFL  and  it  must  come  to  an  end  before  it  damages  our  relationship  of  trust  with 
the  fans.  I  do  not  blame  any  single  person  for  this  failed  system,  whether  at  this 
table  or  elsewhere,  but  we  will  all  share  the  blame  if  we  don’t  pull  together  and 
fix  it  now,  while  these  players  are  still  alive  and  in  need.  If  we  do  not  do  so,  if  we 
simply allow this problem to ‘‘solve’’ itself by waiting for a generation of gravely in-
jured retirees to die before they can succeed in claiming disability support to which 
they  have  a  right,  then  the  stain  upon  the  game  and  it’s  history  will  never  be  re-
moved. 

I have heard Gene speak of his efforts to obtain more benefits for retirees. I take 
him at his word. But whatever has been done to date has not been enough because 
the  problem  is  still  with  us.  He,  the  NFLPA  and  today’s  players  must  do  more  to 
fund this system adequately. 

I have also heard a statement attributed to Mr. Goodell that the owners consider 
their 40–60 revenue split with the active players to be so generous that they cannot 
do more regarding disability for retirees. I want to believe that this was a misunder-
standing  or  misquote  and  I  hope  he  will  correct  it  here  today.  But  if  it  is  a  true 
reflection  of  the  owners’  sentiments,  then  it  is  an  absolutely  inadequate  response 
and  an  evasion  of  responsibility  to  the  game  and  the  people  who  built  it  into  the 
financial success the owners enjoy today. As Gene has often pointed out, neither the 
ownership  nor  the  NFLPA  directly  represented  the  interests  of  retired  players  in 
collective  bargaining,  so  the  revenue  split  produced  by  that  bargaining  offers  the 
owners no shield whatsoever from their responsibilities to disabled retirees. 

No, this problem belongs to the entire NFL family and the owners are not exempt 
from  their  proportionate  share.  I’m  glad  the  NFL  has  hired  a  ‘‘crisis  manager,’’  but 
I  disagree  with  their  definition  of  this  ‘‘crisis’’  if  it  simply  means  that  they  might 
have  to  spend  some  more  money  on  healthcare  for  the  men  who  helped  build  their 
fortunes.  The  crisis,  to  me,  is  this  broken  system  that  dishonors  our  game  by 
compounding  the  injuries  suffered  in  honest  competition  by  its  retired  players,  and 
‘‘managing’’  this  crisis  must  not  mean  finding  ways  for  the  NFL  owners  to  evade 
their responsibilities. This is not just another stadium that will be built with public 
money  if  the  owners  threaten  to  leave  town.  This  is  a  system  that  demoralizes, 
shames, bankrupts, injures and, at the extreme of it’s cruelty, even kills people. Ev-
eryone is responsible for a share of curing this misery. 

I  thank  the  NFL  and  the  Players  Association  fo  proposing  their  new  ‘‘Alliance’’ 
plan. It is an important step in that it is a public recognition that this serious prob-
lem  exists.  As  a  substantive  response  to  the  problem,  however,  it  falls  far  short. 
That was predictable since, unfortunately, virtually none of the people on the retir-
ees’  side  of  the  ball  who  have  worked  on  this  issue  for  years  were  invited  to  con-
tribute  to  that  proposal.  Perhaps  because  the  collective  bargaining  process  has 
habituated them to think this way, the NFL and the NFLPA are, unfortunately, ac-
customed  to  keeping  the  retirees  locked  out  of  actual  discussions  concerning  their 
fate.  As  such,  as  was  done  with  this  plan,  they  simply  hand  us  a  plate  that  we 
didn’t  order  and  tell  us  to  eat  it  with  full  enjoyment.  This  is  not  an  adequate  way 
to  construct  a  plan  for  the  retirees  care  and,  therefore,  this  plan  is  not  as  good  as 
the  one  we  could  have  hammered  out  together.  We  must  do  better.  We  can.  To  do 
so, we must come together and negotiate. For that, as I said, we will need the help 
of the Senate. 

As for the charitable efforts in which we retired players have engaged for the sake 
of our NFL family members, as Mike has said, they will continue. We must do more, 
too,  and  we  will.  But  such  private  charity  is  a  mere  band-aid  upon  this  enormous 
systemic  problem.  It  cannot  ever  substitute  fully  for  responsible  engagement  with 
the  problem  on  behalf  of  the  rest  of  the  NFL  family,  the  owners  and  the  NFLPA, 
which  are  obviously  not  doing  enough.  We  will  all  know  when  we’ve  done  enough 
because the problem will simply not exist anymore. Till then, there is responsibility 
to take and work to do. 

But  funding  this  system  adequately  is  not  the  only  problem  that  must  be  ad-
dressed.  The  unfairness  of  the  system’s  procedures  must  be  reformed  immediately, 
before  they  do  further  harm  to  retirees  and  their  families.  Inconsistent  and  arbi-
trary administration of retirement benefits is common under the Plan and the tragic 
consequences  are  everywhere.  Because  of  weaknesses  in  the  Employee  Retirement 
Income  Security  Act,  which  is  the  Federal  employee  benefits  law  regulating  em-
ployee  benefit  plans,  including  the  Plan,  and  the  Federal  Labor  Management  Rela-
tions  Act,  which  regulates  collective  bargaining,  those  practices  have  been  allowed 
to continue. I would direct the Committee’s attention to the letter provided it by my 
fellow  Kansas  Jayhawk  alumus  and  running  back  for  the  San  Francisco  49ers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

75 

Miami  Dolphins  and  Green  Bay  Packers,  Delvin  Williams,  for  a  fuller  discussion  of 
these  issues  and  an  example  of  the  punitive  lengths  to  which  the  representatives 
of  the  disability  plan  have  gone  in  litigation  against  a  disabled  player  who  dared 
to pursue his rights in court. Because that letter treats these issues in detail, I have 
attached  it  to  this  testimony  as  an  ‘‘addendum’’  and  ask  the  Committee  to  accept 
it into the record as an extension of my own remarks. 

Here  are  but  some  of  the  problems  I  see  in  the  Plan,  as  it  exists  today,  which 
I  hope  can  be  addressed  in  negotiation  or,  failing  that,  through  legislative  action: 
1. There is no one on the Retirement Board of anyone with a sufficient incentive 
either  adequately  to  represent  the  interests  of  the  disabled  retired  players  or 
to ensure that benefits are provided uniformly and objectively. Indeed, there are 
inherent  conflicts  of  interest  among  members  of  Retirement  Board  in  favor  of 
the owners of the NFL teams and the active players. 
2. Many severely disabled retired players have had their valid disability benefit 
claims denied because there is no objective oversight over the actions of the Re-
tirement  Board  and  its  staff  and  the  members  of  the  Retirement  Board  have 
inherent conflict of interests in their service to the participants in the Plan. 

a. Representatives on the Retirement Board who are appointed by the own-
ers of the NFL teams recognize that denying benefits to the disabled retired 
players  will  minimize  future  contributions  to  the  Plan  by  the  NFL  teams. 
b.  Representatives  on  the  Retirement  Board  appointed  by  the  Union  have 
included among them agents of active players who do not represent retired 
players.  If  the  executives  of  the  union  are  inherently  more  concerned  with 
the  active  players  who  re-elect  them  as  executives,  they  lack  sufficient  in-
centive  to  look  out  for  the  best  interests  of  the  disabled  retired  players, 
which  is  their  charge  under  ERISA.  If  those  Union  representatives  are 
more concerned with the pay for the active players, they will also recognize 
that  denying  benefits  to  the  disabled  retired  players  will  minimize  current 
and future payments for their clients. 
c.  Gene  has  often  said  that  the  Union  has  negotiated  new  benefits  for  re-
tired  players,  even  though  he  does  not  represent  them,  and  that  the  active 
union employees have ‘‘subsidized’’ those benefits. He has not, however, suf-
ficiently  emphasized  that  these  benefits  are,  in  fact,  also  for  the  current 
players and that, once those benefits are established, the Union has a moral 
and  legal  obligation  to  ensure  that  they  are  administered  objectively  and 
uniformly among both current players and retirees. That has not happened. 
If  the  Committee  would  request  and  obtain  data  concerning  the  actual  rel-
ative  distribution  of  these  funds,  the  full  picture  would  become  clear  and 
public, as it should be. 

3. The Retirement Board and its staff have not been required to prescribe, pub-
lish  or  adhere  to  objective  standards  for  determining  the  eligibility  for  benefits 
under the Plan or to publish Plan changes in a timely manner. 
4. There is no adequate administrative help for applicants, many of which have 
brain  injuries  and  corresponding  short-term  memory  loss  due  to  multiple  con-
cussions,  to  fill  out  applications  and  proceed  through  the  process.  Simply  post-
ing  application  information  on  a  website,  without  the  availability  of  objective, 
real-time human help, is a particularly egregious shortcoming in the context of 
such  injuries,  which  are  common  among  ex-NFL  players.  Moreover,  since  the 
NFL  has  frequently  argued  that  players  have  not  sent  in  their  paperwork  (a 
claim  which  stretches  credulity  when  referring  to  totally  disabled  people  who 
have little else to depend upon but a successful application, but which is never-
theless  conveniently  impossible  to  disprove  in  the  absence  of  better  record-
keeping  safeguards),  these  interactions  should  be  recorded  and  an  evidentiary 
chain firmly established to keep the process honest. 
5.  The  time  for  processing  of  claims  is  inordinately  long.  Plan  representatives 
have often quoted an ‘‘average’’ processing time of 18 months, which is intermi-
nable  in  itself  if  one  is  disabled,  but  if  the  Committee  could  look  behind  this 
‘‘average’’ time to a true distribution of processing times (considering that many 
claims  are  disallowed  almost  instantaneously),  I  believe  it  would  find  that  the 
processing  of  claims  actually  meriting  the  largest  levels  of  compensation  takes 
a much longer period. Those that cannot be denied immediately are, thus, often 
delayed  inordinately.  This,  again,  is  particularly  egregious  because,  by  the 
NFL’s own computations, the average ex-player lives to an age of only 55, with 
linemen  averaging  only  52.  [It  should  be  noted  that  these  figures  have  been 
used historically by the Plan’s representatives to urge ex-players to take retire-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

76 

ment at an earlier age, which results in dramatically lower levels of compensa-
tion].  This  convergence  of  facts  has  given  rise  to  a  popular  characterization  of 
the Plan’s tacit strategy as ‘‘Delay, Deny and Hope They Die.’’ 
6. There is no adequate deference given to medical opinion in the entire process. 
As  noted  above,  Plan  medical  experts  are  routinely  undermined  and  cir-
cumvented after they have made a disability finding in favor of a retired player. 
Moreover, as in the case of Brent Boyd, non-Plan experts have been specifically 
enlisted  to  overturn  the  decision  of  Plan  doctors  who  made  disability  findings. 
Medical  expertise  functions  as  sword  to  deny  disability,  but  it  is  no  shield 
against the aggressive strategies of administrative denial and, if necessary, liti-
gation by the Plan staff and the Groom Law Group. 
7.  All  numerical  data  associated  with  the  Plan  is  non-public  and  inaccessible, 
making  misrepresentations  by  the  Plan’s  representatives  common  and  not  im-
mediately  arguable.  How  many  retirees  are  there?  The  Plan’s  own  representa-
tives  have  given  numbers  ranging  from  8,000  to  13,500,  seemingly  dependant 
upon  which  number  was  more  advantageous  under  the  circumstances.  How 
many receive disability payments? At a hearing earlier this year before the Ad-
ministrative  Law  Subcommittee  of  the  House  Judiciary  Committee,  Plan  rep-
resentatives said 317. Later, they amended this to 428. On information and be-
lief,  which  is  as  good  as  we  can  get  with  respect  to  such  unpublished  data,  the 
number  is  actually  less  than  200.  Crucially,  at  what  levels  have  people  been 
compensated? (Again, like the ‘‘average’’ claim processing time, what is the dis-
tribution?).  This  has  never  been  answered.  How  many  have  applied  for  dis-
ability  predicated  upon  brain  injuries  resulting  from  concussions?  As  recently 
as  this  Friday,  Plan  representatives  told  Senate  staff  that  they  did  not  know 
this  number—this  even  though  the  NFL  is  supposedly  seeking  to  implement  a 
new,  progressive  policy  to  protect  players  from  the  effects  of  concussions.  How 
many have been successful in obtaining disability based on concussions? Accord-
ing  to  a  statement  by  Attorney  Douglas  Ell  of  the  Groom  Law  Group  to  a  re-
porter,  that  number  is  four  (4)—for  the  most  violent  game  since  the  Roman 
Arena,  often  played  on  a  surface  consisting  of  concrete  covered  with  a  quarter- 
inch  layer  of  indoor-outdoor  carpeting  called  ‘‘Astroturf’’,  which  was  incor-
porated  in  stadium  construction  to  save  on  grounds-keeping  bills,  without  re-
gard  to  the  havoc  it  visited  on  men’s  bodies.  If  that  number  is  accurate,  the 
Committee can draw it’s own conclusions about the adequacy of the Plan’s pro-
tections.  I  implore  the  Commerce  Committee,  consistent  with  its  oversight  func-
tion,  which  is  the  reason  for  this  hearing,  to  seek  extensive  and  complete  data 
on  all  aspects  of  the  Plan,  its  procedures  and  its  funding.  The  truth,  which  has 
been  artfully  and  thoroughly  hidden  to  date,  is  in  these  numbers.  Without  the 
thorough  examination  and  publication  of  these  data  by  the  Committee,  any  pri-
vate negotiations held in an attempt to solve this problem cannot bear fruit. 
8.  The  NFL  Retirees  have  no  bargaining  power  to  negotiate  an  end  to  this  in-
equitable  situation  without  the  continuing  oversight  of  the  Senate.  The  collec-
tive bargaining entities, the NFL and the NFLPA, do not and cannot represent 
the  retired  players.  Indeed,  as  noted  above,  the  Plan  representatives  have  not 
even  fulfilled  their  fiduciary  and  representative  duties  to  the  retired  players 
with respect to the distribution of pension and disability distributions. The light 
of  common  day  and,  with  it,  the  power  of  public  and  governmental  scrutiny  of 
this  process  is  the  only  bargaining  power  available  to  the  NFL  Retirees.  Never-
theless,  if  the  Committee  would  continue  its  oversight  of  this  issue  and  demand 
regular reports of negotiating progress by the parties represented at this hearing, 
the NFL Retirees would like to engage the collective bargaining entities in a true 
negotiation  in  an  effort  to  settle  this  matter  privately,  without  the  need  for  spe-
cific legislative relief. I therefore ask the Committee to exhort the parties to come 
together in such a negotiation immediately after this hearing and to subject that 
process  to  your  regular  oversight  in  the  form  of  such  periodic  reports,  which  we 
propose  be  produced  to  the  Committee  every  30  days  from  the  date  of  this  hear-
ing. 

Some  legislative  actions  might  help  this  situation  but  today  I  want  to  make  a 
more  immediate  appeal  to  the  Members  of  the  Commerce  Committee:  please  help 
us pull together as a family and try to fix this problem ourselves. 

You’ve called this an ‘‘oversight’’ hearing. I like that word. I think that’s just what 
we need. As I’ve said, at its best, football is a family, with no need for an overseer, 
where  ‘‘bargaining  power’  is  not  an  issue.  But  in  this  new  rich  NFL  bargaining 
power  is  crucial  and  the  retired  players  have  none  without  your  help.  I  don’t  ask 
you  to  play  for  our  side,  only  to  keep  the  game  fair  and  keep  it  going  until  the  job 
is  done.  We  need  a  referee.  I  think  that  if  this  Committee  would  ask  the  parties 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

77 

to  come  together,  starting  tomorrow,  and  negotiate  a  true  solution  to  this  problem, 
and  if  it  would  take  oversight  of  a  bargaining  process  among  the  owners,  the  Play-
ers  Association  and  representatives  of  the  retired  players,  with  each  party  making 
periodic  reports  to  the  Committee  about  the  progress  of  those  negotiations  every 
thirty  days  or  so,  we  should  be  able  to  get  this  job  done  ourselves.  I  ask  this  Com-
mittee to take such oversight and to request and publish all numbers and data nec-
essary to a fair negotiation, so that one can go forward. I am told the most effective 
mechanism  to  obtain  such  data  is  a  study  and  report  by  the  Government 
Accountablity Office. I respectfully request that such a study be performed and such 
a  report  be  written.  If  you  do  these  things,  I  think  we  in  the  NFL  family  can  get 
this job done and clean an ugly stain upon our great game before it becomes perma-
nent. For my part, if you will be referees, I promise you my best game. 

Thank you for your consideration and for your oversight of this important subject. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Sayers, thank you very much. 
I  wish  all  of  you  could  have  heard  testimony  previously  before 
this  committee  at  other  times  and  other  occasions,  when  pediatri-
cians would come forward and tell us that these young kids, taking 
a  look  at  baseball  and  football  players,  idolizing  these  players,  are 
finding  ways  and  searching  for  ways  to  become  a  300-pound  line-
man while in high school. So, when people say to me—or the issue 
of steroids in baseball—when people say to me, ‘‘Well, Congress has 
no  business  in  any  of  these  areas.’’  My  preference  is  that  be  the 
case, but if Congress can play a role, in my judgment, for applying 
some pressure and shining some light on what’s wrong and how to 
fix it, perhaps Congress will do something very important, not just 
for  players  and  former  players,  perhaps  for  young  kids,  who  are 
going to come through this system to be the future of baseball and 
football and other professional sports. 

So, let me make a comment. As a result of oversight hearing, I’m 
not particularly anxious or interested in legislating. It seems to me 
that  professional  football  players  and  owners  control  a  big  pot  of 
money, very substantial pot of money. The profits and salaries and 
ticket prices are very substantial, frankly. And it seems to me that 
they  ought  to  find  a  way—when  I  say  ‘‘they,’’  I’m  talking  about 
owners  and  players  and  all  those  involved  in  this  professional 
sport—ought to find a way to use the substantial amount of money 
that exists in this industry to respond to these issues. 

Now, let me ask one opening question, then I’m—in deference to 
my  colleagues,  I  want  them  to  be  able  to  ask  questions  before  we 
have a time problem. 

The  one  question  I  would  ask,  of  Mr.  Goodell  and  Mr.  Upshaw, 
is  this.  I  come  to  this  knowing  very  little  about  it.  I’ve  done  a  lot 
of  reading  about  it  in  preparation  for  this  hearing.  But  if  I  were 
in  your  two  seats,  and  I  heard  the  testimony  in  the  first  panel,  I 
would say, ‘‘Gotta be something wrong here.’’ There’s a former foot-
ball player that goes to a third doctor, after the first two have said, 
‘‘Look, you’ve got a problem here, a very serious medical problem,’’ 
and  the  third  doctor  doesn’t  look  at  the  brain  scan  and  says,  ‘‘No, 
you’re  OK.’’  I  would  look  at  that,  and  I  would  say,  ‘‘Boy,  there  is 
something broken, and we ought fix it.’’ 

Give  me  your  assessment  of  what  we  hear  today  at  this  panel. 
Mr.  GOODELL.  Well,  Senator,  let  me  respond  to  that  first,  and 

then Gene can respond. 

I  agree  with  you—and  Gene  and  I  have  talked  about  this—that 
there  has  got  to  be  a  better  system,  there  has  got  to  be  a  way  to 
improve our system to be more responsive to players that have in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

78 

juries.  We  have  made  some  changes  in  the  short  term.  I  have 
changed  out  two  of  the  trustees,  not  because  they  were 
fiduciarilyy—irresponsible—but  because  I  felt  it  was  time  to  get 
fresh  thinking.  In  addition,  we  have  tried  to  address  this  issue  on 
a  more  regular  basis;  rather  than  quarterly  meetings,  we’re  meet-
ing  on  a  much  more  regular  basis,  and  our  staffs  are  working  on 
this in between the quarterly meetings. 

In addition, we have looked to outside counsel, independent coun-
sel, that we are—that are experts in this area—I am not—but what 
we  could  do  to  try  to  make  the  system  more  intelligent,  more  re-
sponsive and fair. 

So, I think we are looking at what to do. I would agree with you 
that,  when  you  hear  these  stories,  it  is  difficult,  and  you  want  to 
be responsive. 

Senator DORGAN. And, while you answer, Mr. Upshaw—and, Mr. 
Goodell, you may want to comment—Charlotte Observer, this week-
end, reported that there are only four retired players who have re-
ceived  total  and  permanent  disability.  That’s  just  counterintuitive 
to  everything  you  would  expect  would  be  the  case  with  respect  to 
professional  football.  Is  that  a  right—is  that  an  accurate  number? 
And, if so, do you find it as counterintuitive as I do? 

Mr.  UPSHAW.  To  receive  active  T&P—total  and  permanent—it 
would  have  to  be  like  the  player  that  just  experienced  that  this 
weekend,  or  this  past  weekend,  in  Buffalo,  a  player  that  is  totally 
and  permanent,  on  the  field—or  applies  for  total  and  permanent 
within  6  months  after  the  injury.  There  are  four,  and  there  are 
other players that are receiving total and permanent, that have be-
come age 55, that are now getting a retirement benefit, not a total- 
and-permanent benefit. Our system provides that, once a player be-
comes 55 years old, he then switches from disability to retirement, 
but he still continues to get the higher of the two benefits. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Senator Dorgan. 
And  thank  you—I  was  listening  to  Mr.  Ditka  and  thinking  back 
to  those  old  days  when  my  dad  was  a  reporter.  He  was  actually 
friends of these players when Norm Van Brocklin was in our living 
room, getting into a fistfight with my father, and when the players 
used  to  practice  on  a  field  formerly  owned  by  the  Animal  Rescue 
League. 

Mr. DITKA. I got in a fistfight with Norm Van Brocklin. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. That’s what I figured. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But  what  I  remember  most  is  that  it  was 
a  different  time  in  the  game,  and  there  was  less  money,  and  now 
a lot of those players are old and they’re injured. 

And  I  guess  my  question  of  you,  Mr.  Goodell,  is  just—I’ve  heard 
about  the  differences  between  National  Football  League  and  the 
other leagues, and, when considered as a percentage of league rev-
enue,  how  does  the  amount  that  football  spends  on  disability  pay-
ments,  retired  players,  compared  to  the  amount  spent  by  other 
sports leagues? 

Mr. GOODELL. It’s a very good question. We have looked at that. 
And  when  we  look  at  our  entire  retirement  benefits,  versus  base-
ball,  we  think  they  are  comparable.  We  have  more  players  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

79 

NFL,  we  have  less,  obviously,  than  Major  League  Baseball.  We 
have more revenues, we have a different cost structure. But we do 
look  at  that,  and  we  want  to  make  sure  that  we  are  treating  our 
players  in  the  same  fashion,  or  better—hopefully  better—than 
other leagues. 

When you look at it in isolated cases with respect to, potentially, 
just  a  disability  case  or  a  pension  case,  there  will  be  differences. 
But  when  you  look  at  the  entire  scope  of  benefits  for  players,  we 
think they’re comparable. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But  I’m  curious  about  why,  just  until  re-
cently, you didn’t accept the determination, for Social Security pur-
poses,  of  disabled,  that  you  didn’t  use  that  as  your  standard.  And 
you  said  you  recently  agreed—in  your  testimony  today—to  accept 
as  totally  and  permanently  disabled  any  player  determined  to  be 
disabled  for  purposes  of  Social  Security,  why  wasn’t  that  done  be-
fore? And what difference has that made now? 

Mr. GOODELL. Well, I’ve only been in this position for 1 year, but 
it’s something Gene and I talked about 6 months ago, and, frankly, 
agreed  to  6  months  ago.  If  a  individual  is  already  qualified  under 
the  Social  Security  standard,  we  should  move  the  process  forward 
quickly  and  allow  them  to  qualify  under  our  disability  program, 
and we have done that. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Ditka, did you want to respond? 
Mr. DITKA. Yes, I only want to say one thing. You know, I—deliv-
ering mail, working as a mechanic, being a newscaster, what—foot-
ball is completely different. I mean, I don’t want to bring it up. You 
know,  we  have  a  12-year  window  to  file  for  disability.  You  know, 
the average career of a football player is less than 4 years, or right 
under  5  years  or  something.  You  have  to  be  4  years  to  be  vested. 
OK, supposing a guy comes into—21, 22—he’s out at 28, 29. Noth-
ing  shows  up  before  he’s  41.  Very  normal.  And  then  things  start 
showing up. I’m not sure I understand it. You know, it’s fine to sit 
here  and  say,  ‘‘Oh,  we  have  ERISA  law,  we  have  Social  Security, 
we’re  tying  it  in.  This  is  all’’—this  is  an  exception.  Football  is  an 
exception. It is not a contact sport, it’s a collision sport. 

This  young  man,  the  other  day,  did  nothing  but  make  a  tackle, 
and he almost lost his life. Those things happen. The first week of 
the  NFL  season  this  year,  you’ve  got  five  guys,  I  think,  that  are 
out  for  the  year.  It’s  tough.  It—you’ve  got  200-,  300-pound  bodies 
flying around at great speeds. It’s different than delivering mail or 
working  in  a  factory  or  building  cars.  You  can’t  tie  it  into  Social 
Security the way everybody wants to do. It’s a different thing. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Ditka.  And  I  just  want  to 
end,  so  I  can  let  Senator  McCaskill  go,  by  saying—we  talked  a  lit-
tle bit about, why should Congress be looking at this? And Mr. Say-
ers was talking about how football is a family. Well, it’s a very pub-
lic  family.  And  I  think  the  way  that  we  treat  people  with  disabil-
ities—people are watching this—the way we treat people that have 
built,  basically,  an  empire  for  others  to  profit  from,  people  are 
watching this. 

So, thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. I mentioned the Charlotte Observer article, the 
four  retired  players,  total  and  permanent  disability,  that  was  for 
brain  injuries  caused  by  multiple  concussions.  So,  I  wanted  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

80 

make  that  point,  because  there  has  been  testimony  today,  and  it 
relates to what Mr. Ditka suggested, that this may show up 10, 15, 
or 20 years later. 

Senator McCaskill? 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  also  want  to  mention—he’s  not  here,  but  I  want  to  mention 
Fred Arbanas. Fred and I served together on the county legislature 
for  a  number  of  years.  I’ve  watched  his  body  fall  apart.  I’ve 
watched him going from a very proud man who’s recognized every-
where  in  Kansas  City  for  all  the  right  reasons  to  basically  not 
being  able  to  do  much  before  noon,  because  it  takes  him  that  long 
to get his body moving. 

I  want  to  ask  a  couple  of  questions.  It’s  my  understanding,  Mr. 
Upshaw, that the money that is given over to the pension and dis-
ability  fund  is,  in  fact,  negotiated  by  the  Players  Association,  and 
it is set aside at the negotiation, and it is, in fact, their money. 

Mr. UPSHAW. Yes. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Then, why is it three and three? Why do the 
owners  have  just  as  much  say  on  how  that  money  is  being  spent 
as  the  players?  If  that  money  has  already  been  negotiated  away 
from the owners, and that belongs to the players, then why do they 
get  to  veto,  by  a  3–3  vote,  a  disability  finding  that  the  players  de-
cide is valid? 

Mr.  UPSHAW.  Because  the  plan  operates  under  the  Taft-Hartley 
laws, and the Taft-Hartley laws give both the players and the own-
ers an equal vote. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  do  you  need  us  to  amend  the  Taft- 

Harley players—— 

Mr. UPSHAW. I think I suggested—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—to allow—— 
Mr. UPSHAW.—I suggested that as—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. OK. 
Mr. UPSHAW.—part of—one of the solutions. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  So,  it  seems  to  me  that  it—you  know,  it’s 
almost  like  you  negotiate  to  try  to  get  this  money,  and  this  comes 
off the top, I understand. 

Mr. UPSHAW. Yes. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  This  isn’t  a  line  item  on  people’s  paycheck. 
Mr. UPSHAW. No. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  This  is  off  the  top.  And  if  that’s  the  case, 
and  you  worked  hard  to  negotiate,  it  seems  to  me  you  ought  to  be 
here  asking  that—and  demanding  for  this  legislation  on  behalf  of 
the Players Association, that the players have the ability to decide 
what  former  players  are  entitled  to  disability,  under  what  cir-
cumstances. 

Mr.  UPSHAW.  Well,  that’s  why  we  end  up  with  a  3–3  vote.  We 
do have unanimous votes from time to time, but there is no dispute 
over  the  facts  in  a  unanimous  vote,  either  for  an  approval  or  for 
a denial. But, in a lot of cases there are 3–3 votes, which is no rea-
son whatsoever for a player—the former players to vote against an-
other  player  if  he  qualifies.  There  are  a  lot  of  players  that  file 
claims that do not qualify. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Mr.  Goodell,  would  you  have  any  problem 
with  that,  if  we  amended  the  Taft-Hartley,  to  allow,  under  these 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

81 

circumstances, since the money has been negotiated away from the 
owners  at  the  bargaining  table,  would  there  be  any  problem  with 
the  people  that  have  negotiated  for  that  making  the  decision  as  to 
how the money was going to be spent? 

Mr.  GOODELL.  Well,  I’d  make  a  couple  of  points,  Senator.  First 
off,  and  most  importantly,  anything  that  would  improve  the  sys-
tem,  that  is  responsible  to  do  for  the  parties,  we  would  consider. 
Most importantly. Second of all, it somewhat implies that we have 
been  a  negative  influence  in  this  circumstance,  and  I  don’t  believe 
we have. I think the facts don’t support that. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Well, I think it—— 
Mr. GOODELL. Second of all—— 
Senator  MCCASKILL.—I  think  that  3–3  votes  are  tough.  I  think 

3–3 votes are tough. 

Mr.  GOODELL.  But  the  facts  are,  there  haven’t  been  that  many 
3–3 votes, and what happens is, the process is set up through Fed-
eral regulations and through the law that it would go on to see an 
independent doctor. And, ultimately, it goes to an independent doc-
tor,  who  makes  the  final  decision.  And  we  have  had  some  cases 
that  have  been  taken  and  litigated.  We’ve  had  25.  Twenty-four 
have  returned  back  in  favor  of  the  retirement  board;  only  one  was 
reversed. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  know  what’s  involved  in  filing  a  Federal 
lawsuit,  and  I  don’t  think  we  want  to  make  these  guys  have  to  go 
to Federal court—— 

Mr. GOODELL. I agree with that. 
Senator MCCASKILL.—to do this. 
Mr. GOODELL. And—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. I—let me—because I don’t have much time. 
I  don’t  mean  to  cut  you  off.  But  the  other  area  I  really  wanted  to 
cover  here  was  the  LOD  disability,  the  line-of-duty  disability.  I 
mean,  you’re  going  to  have  a  whole  lot  of  these  players  that  are 
going to have a line-of-duty disability, particularly if you talk about 
orthopaedic needs. I mean, I got a new knee this year, and, I’ve got 
to  tell  you,  I  never  played  a  day  of  football,  and  it  hurts,  and  it’s 
a pain, and I’m limping around here today, and I—and, you know, 
I was just a cheerleader in high school, for gosh sakes. Nobody—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  Nobody  was—no  300-pound  linemen  were 

flying at me—well, I’ll take—well, no—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  I—in  all  seriousness,  the  idea  that  an  LOD 
disability has to be—you have to apply within 48 months—I mean, 
4  years—if  you’ve  got  a  guy  that’s  retiring  at  27  or  28  because  of 
a minor injury or for some other reason, or just doesn’t make it the 
next year, gets cut, I mean, you’re asking that orthopaedic, serious 
surgery,  to  show  up  within  4  years?  I  just  think  that  is  wildly  un-
reasonable.  And  are  you  in  favor  of  extending  the  LOB—LOD  dis-
ability  to  a  filing  period  that  would  be  much  longer  than  4  years? 
Is that something that you all would object to? Mr. Upshaw? 

Mr.  UPSHAW.  No,  we  wouldn’t  object  to  it  at  all.  Matter  of  fact, 
we’ve  actually  increased  that.  It  used  to  be  36  months,  and  it’s 
been  increased  to  where  it  is  today.  But  the  line-of-duty  disability 
is  not  the  last  place  that  you  can  go.  We  have  players  that  come 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

82 

in  on  a  line-of-duty,  and  then  move  up  the  chart  to  degenerative, 
which  will  now  let  you  into  the  door,  which  Mike  talked  about,  is 
15 years. So, 15 years after you leave the game, you can still apply 
for a—that disability. 

Before  1993,  we  had  none  of  these  disabilities.  All  of  these  im-
provements,  we’ve  made  since  1993.  So,  we’re  not  opposed  to  that, 
but we also have another total-and-permanent disability that Brent 
Boyd  is  getting,  that  someone  that  doesn’t  qualify  for  anything  in 
our  plan  can  still  get  a  disability,  even  though  it  was  not  caused 
by football. So, if you get hit by a bus, and you come back and file 
for  disability  under  this  plan,  you  can  receive  it.  That  is  what 
Brent Boyd is getting, because the doctor said—not Mr. Ell; Mr. Ell 
is  not  the  doctor,  he  is  the  attorney  that  represents  the  plan  that 
is—he’s  co-counsel  to  the  plan—the  doctor  said  Brent  Boyd  did 
not—you  couldn’t  connect  one  concussion  in  1980  to  his  present 
condition today. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Total-and-permanent  is  different  than  par-
tial. And you’re going to have a lot more partials than you’re going 
to  have  total-and-permanent.  And  4  years  is  not  enough.  I  think, 
as  a  show  of  good  faith,  you  ought  to  get  busy  and  get  that  fixed. 
What  Mr.  Ditka  said  is  correct,  this  is  common  sense.  Take  care 
of  these  guys.  They’re  taking  care  of  us,  they’re  taking  care  of  the 
Players  Association  officers  that  are  here,  their  colleagues  are 
going to be in the same position in 15 years as Conrad Dobler and 
Fred Arbanas and all the other great heroes that are here. 

And  thank  you  all  for  being  here,  and  I  appreciate  the  answers 

to my question. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator McCaskill, thank you very much. 
Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  can’t  help  but  come  to  the  table  to  note  the  difference  between 
the  NFL  and  Major  League  Baseball  on  the  question  of  handling 
some  of  the  former  players.  It  was  this  Senator  that  had  to  get 
right  in  the  middle  of  it  with  regard  to  the  compensation  for  the 
members  of  the  old  Negro  Leagues  in  Major  League  Baseball.  And 
it  has  been  slowgoing  with  Major  League  Baseball,  and  there  has 
been  a  recognition  of  that.  I’m  grateful  we  don’t  have  those  issues 
before us here today, and I thank you for that. 

Now, the question that occurs to me is, Why should there not be 

a medical doctor on either one of those boards? 

Mr. UPSHAW. Well, we don’t have a medical doctor on the board, 
but we rely on the medical evidence that’s presented by the player, 
both  the  board  doctors  and  any  evidence  that  the  player  might 
bring from his doctor. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Goodell? 
Mr.  GOODELL.  I  would  respond  to  that,  Senator,  by  saying  that 
the board is not making a medical decision, they are taking the in-
formation from medical doctors who examine the players, who take 
all  of  their  medical  records,  make  an  evaluation,  and  make  a  rec-
ommendation  to  the  board.  I’m  not  opposed  to  it.  We  would  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

83 

to  find  a  representative.  But  I  believe  that’s  the  best  explanation 
I can give you today. 

Senator  NELSON.  Does  anybody  else  want  to  comment  on  that? 
Mr.  DITKA.  Why  not  take  it  away  from  ’em  completely,  the  own-
ers and the Players Association—take it totally away from ’em and 
create  a  board,  completely  independent—completely  independent, 
made  up  of  medical  people.  And  then,  if  they  turn  it  down,  then 
there must be a reason to turn it down. But when these other peo-
ple turn it down, people think there is an ulterior motive for turn-
ing  it  down.  That’s  all  I  ask.  Make  it  completely  independent  and 
see what happens. 

Mr. GOODELL. Senator, if I might add, then if it moves down the 
process of being a 3–3 tie, it goes to an independent doctor, and it’s 
binding—whatever that doctor’s decision is, it is binding, so it is ul-
timately made by a doctor, if there is a dispute amongst the Retire-
ment Board. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Chairman, is that a vote? 
Senator DORGAN. Yes. 
Senator NELSON. Well, then I’ll just conclude by saying that, you 
know,  one  of  the  phoniest  problems  that  we  have,  over  and  over, 
is  the  question  of  disability  for  veterans.  And  they  go  through  all 
of  these  disability  claims  procedures  that  are  quite  extensive. 
Maybe  we  ought  to  take  a  lesson  from  the  experience  that  we  try 
to  determine  the  degree  of  disability  with  our  veterans  and  have 
that be a lesson to apply here. 

Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Nelson, thank you very much. 
A  vote  did  start  at  12,  noon,  and  I  would  normally  ask  if  we 
could  stand  in  recess,  but,  because  there  is  a  vote  following  this, 
it would require at least a half-hour recess, and I don’t want to in-
convenience  you.  All  of  you  who  have  testified  today  have  come 
here  and  provided,  I  think,  some  real  assistance  in  giving  us  your 
perspective of what’s happening. 

It  seems  to  me  there  is  something  that’s  not  connected  here.  I 
don’t  know  what  it  is,  exactly,  but  something’s  not  connected. 
Something  is  not  working  the  way  it  should  work.  And,  as  I  indi-
cated  earlier,  there  is  plenty  of  money  around.  I  watch  football 
from  a  living  room,  but  I  understand  what  ticket  prices  are,  I  un-
derstand what owners’ profits are, generally, from what I read, and 
I understand how much some of these contracts, some players, are. 
And so, there is plenty of money around. It seems to me that suffi-
cient  money  should  be  available  to  provide  the  kind  of  assistance 
that is necessary for those that helped build this professional sport, 
called football. I think it is, perhaps, the most widely watched pro-
fessional sport in our country. And my guess is, most of those who 
would hear stories, or read about them in the newspaper, as is fre-
quently  the  case,  or  hear  the  testimony  today,  would  be  flab-
bergasted that there are people who spent their lives in this profes-
sional sport and are now living in poverty, are now living in a cir-
cumstance  where  they  can’t  find  the  kind  of  healthcare  that  they 
need, or the kind of medical assistance they need. 

We  will  certainly  evaluate  the  testimony  and  try  to  consider 
what kinds of things might be available. And I think, Mr. Commis-
sioner  and  Mr.  Upshaw,  you,  I  hope,  will  take  a  look.  What  I’m 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

84 

going  to  do  is,  I’m  going  to  send  you  two  packets,  like  this,  indi-
vidual letters from former players. I would think that, in this busi-
ness,  in  this  industry—I  know  you  will  want  to  go  through  it  and 
understand it and then evaluate, what is it here that’s wrong? how 
do we fix it? 

So,  I  thank  all  of  you  very  much  for  your  willingness  to  come  to 

this hearing. 

This hearing’s adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:12 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY EUGENE ‘‘MERCURY’’ MORRIS, FORMER 

NFL PLAYER, MIAMI DOLPHINS AND SAN DIEGO CHARGERS 

The  Black  Paper:  A  Response  to  the  Claims  Set  Forth  in  the  NFLPA’s 

‘‘White Paper’’ 

I  have  been  asked  to  address  the  specific  content  of  the  document  produced  by 
the  joint  efforts  of  the  two  collective  bargaining  parties,  the  NFLMC  and  the 
NFLPA.  The  NFLPA  ‘‘White  Paper’’  was  prepared  for  the  September  18th  hearing 
on  Capitol  Hill  before  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transpor-
tation. The content, however, is virtually the same as the NFLPA written statement 
submitted  for  the  June  26,  2007  hearing  before  the  Subcommittee  on  Commercial 
and  Administrative  Law  of  the  House  Judiciary  Committee.  My  statement  in  re-
sponse  to  the  remarks  made  by  Douglas  Ell  at  the  House  hearing  addresses  most 
of the issues ‘‘repackaged’’ and reintroduced in the September 18, 2007 hearing and 
I  refer  the  reader  to  that  statement.  I  will  address  some  of  the  issues  that  require 
clarification  as  to  the  factual  content  of  the  declarations  made  in  the  White  Paper 
the  NFLPA  has  distributed  both  to  traditional  media  and  Internet-based  news  out-
lets.  The  NFLPA  has  also  initiated  a  ‘‘new’’  campaign  called:  ‘‘The  Truth  Squad: 
Fact vs. Fiction,’’ which I will show is neither substantively new nor factually accu-
rate in the following paragraphs. 

In  keeping  with  the  theme  ‘‘fact  vs.  fiction,’’  I  respond  on  behalf  of  the  NFL  Re-
tired  Players  whom  I  have  represented  involving  disability  and  retirement  issues. 
For  the  record  I  have,  on  three  (3)  different  occasions  since  2001,  been  successful 
in  recovering  disability  benefits  that  had  been  arbitrarily  taken  by  the  retirement 
board from Players who were qualified under the Plan’s Terms. 

I have over 21 years of experience in dealing with this group, who cast themselves 
as  caretakers  of  the  retired  Players’  future  welfare  as  fiduciaries,  in  the  role  of 
trustees to the Plan, governed by ERISA Law. 

I have watched the evolution of the language of the Plan, I can say with absolute 
explicit  facts  and  evidence  that  fiduciary  misconduct  has  occurred  and  it  is  docu-
mented by the very words of the author of the White Paper. 

For  the  record,  the  term  ‘‘White  Paper’’  is  defined  as  a  detailed  or  authoritative 
report.  The  following  is  a  quote  from  a  docketed  Bar  Complaint  filed  against  a 
former  Groom  Counsel,  John  McAllister,  for  lying  to  a  Plan  participant.  Mr. 
McAllister is no longer on the Case and has left the Groom Law Group. 

If  you  have  information  but  it’s  misinformation,  the  best  you  can  be  is  mis-
informed,  if  someone  is  allowed  to  perfect  a  concept  based  upon  that  misin-
formation, then what you have is a misconception. 

It  is  with  that  premise  in  mind  that  I  set  forth  my  response  to  the  White  Paper 
in this ‘‘Black Paper’’, the title of which describes the ironic distance between what 
the  NFLPA  asserts  to  be  true,  pure  and  ‘‘white’’  and  the  actual  practices  and  poli-
cies inherent in their administration of the Plan’s disability provisions. 

Page 4, paragraph one of the White Paper states: ‘‘Active Players pay for all bene-

That statement is categorically false according to the Plan’s own terms. The Bert 
Bell/Pete Rozelle Plan document at page 10, paragraph 3, Article 3.2 states the fol-
lowing: 

The  sources  of  revenue  to  be  used  to  satisfy  any  contribution  obligation  of  the 
employer will be exclusively within the control of the employers. 

Webster  defines  the  term  ‘‘exclusive’’  as  ‘‘limiting  or  limited  to  possession  control 

fits.’’ 

or use by a single individual or group.’’ 

It  is  clear  that  the  active  Players  in  fact  do  not  contribute  to  the  fund  under 
ERISA  that  is  governed  by  the  Plan’s  terms;  therefore  the  statement  made  in  the 
‘‘White Paper’’ regarding Player contributions to the Plan is fiction not fact. 

(85) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

for medical, disability and retirement benefits. 

That statement is misleading because it implies that currently active Players are 
paying  medical  and  disability  benefits  for  retired  Players,  which  is  false.  See  Sec. 
3.2 page 10, Plan Document. 

From the White Paper, page 5, paragraph one, Mr. Ell seems to imply that ‘‘pen-
sion for the Retired Players’’ significantly increased four (4) times, and their benefits 
‘‘have since been more than tripled.’’ 

Webster’s  defines  the  term  ‘‘significant’’  as:  Having  the  meaning  of  a  noticeably 

or measurably large amount. 

86 

Sec.  3.1of  the  Plan  states  that,  ‘‘a  contribution  to  the  trust  will  be  made  by  the 

employers.’’ Players do not contribute to the ERISA-governed fund. 

Another  statement  from  the  White  Paper,  made  in  paragraph  ‘‘three’’  page  4,  de-
clares  that,  ‘‘the  cost  of  benefits  to  former  Players  comes  from  the  active  Players 
side of the table″. That statement is also false and misleading. 

Under  ERISA  law  and  the  Plans  terms,  there  is  no  ‘‘active  Players  side  of  the 
table,’’  in  fact  there  is  no  ‘‘table,’’  there  are  only  fiduciary  responsibilities  to  do  two 
things: 

1. Pay benefits. 
2. Pay expenses. 

Under  ERISA  Law,  the  language  of  the  Plan,  at  one  time,  did  have  specific  in-
struction  as  to  the  course  of  conduct  of  the  trustees  of  the  Plan  regarding  specific 
language  under  Sec.  404;  that  defines  the  duties  of  those  trustees  who  accept  that 
fiduciary  responsibility  by  Law  and  operate  under  the  spirit  and  the  letter  of  the 
intention of the Plan’s terms. 

The White Paper states that the active Players each gave up $82,000.00 in salary 

Clearly  the  amount  involved  here  is  large  only  if  expressed  in  relative  terms.  If 
the  benefits  for  retired  Players  were  in  fact  increased  4  times  and  ‘‘triple’’  the 
amount they were originally, then the resulting $250 per month, per credited season 
only shows up as a ‘‘large amount’’ when compared with the paltry size of the origi-
nal pension benefit. 

In  2002,  in  a  collective  bargaining  negotiation,  a  new  retirement  benefit  increase 
of  a  $100-per-month  per  credited  season  was  initiated.  As  I  detail  in  my  response 
to Doug Ell’s House testimony, however, in 2004 the same collective bargaining par-
ties  devised  a  ‘‘new’’  benefit  paying  each  current  Player  $200  each  and  every  time 
he steps on the field. 

The collective bargaining parties in 1993 ‘‘segregated’’ themselves from the retired 
Players.  This  has  now  grown  into  a  full-fledged  ‘‘business  within  a  business.’’  The 
disability benefits, in fact, have dramatically improved, however, not for the retired 
Players. The statement involving ‘‘significant increase over the years’’ by the two (2) 
collective  bargaining  parties  is  false  and  misleading  because  it  omits  what  the 
NFLPA did for the current Players in the 2004 CBA extension. 

‘‘The most generous and flexible disability in professional sports.’’ 
However  ‘‘generous’’  the  collective  bargaining  parties  say  these  benefits  are,  the 
fact is these ‘‘benefits’’ are not accessible to the Players without their meeting com-
plicated requirements. Moreover, even if they are able to do so, the bottom line still 
rests  upon  the  judgment  of  the  Trustees  as  to  whether  or  not  a  person  with  a  dis-
ability is ‘‘able to work’’—a judgment that is entirely up to their discretion, rendered 
according to a criterion itself is so vague that it has no specific definition. How can 
a  doctor,  untrained  in  occupational  therapy,  make  a  determination  on  a  person’s 
ability  to  work  in  a  25-minute  office  visit?  Moreover,  if  the  theoretical  capacity  to 
work  any  job  is  the  de  facto  standard,  as  experience  would  suggest  it  is,  and  it  is 
subject to the unfettered discretion of the retirement board in application, does this 
standard  have  any  meaningful  function  other  than  to  exclude  virtually  every  appli-
cant? 

Since my personal involvement with this process began, I have seen the adminis-
trative  complexities  grow  steadily  to  the  point  where  the  average  Player  applying 
for  benefits  must  now  meet  technical  requirements  that  involve  a  mountain  of  red 
tape  designed  to  make  the  Player  seeking  benefits  either  give  up  or  sue  the  Plan. 
If he has the tenacity to sue, then The Groom Law Group reaps the true ‘‘benefits’’ 
of  this  system—litigation  to  the  tune  of  almost  $20  million  over  the  last  6  years 
against retired Players pursuing their rights. Yet, when questioned about the make 
up of the ‘‘legal team’’ in question, Mr. Ell says; ‘‘Oh we try to keep the lawyers down 
to an absolute minimum.’’ And those ‘‘few guys’’ make millions. 

Ironically,  the  suggestion  to  ‘‘give  up’’  often  comes  from  the  NFLPA  representa-
tives.  When  you  examine  the  actions  of  the  retirement  board  you  get  a  completely 
different perspective about what they are trying to accomplish, which in no way ac-
cords with the standard of what a ‘‘prudent person acting in a like capacity and fa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

87 

miliar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of like character 
with  like  aims,’’  which  is  their  charge  in  the  Plan  document  in  words  that  are  mir-
rored in the specific language of Sec. 404 of ERISA. 

The  Groom  Law  Group,  by  its  own  admission,  changed  the  terms  of  the  Plan  to 
exclude the specific language that would permit the ‘‘circumstance’’ in which a fidu-
ciary  could  make  a  decision  to  spend  an  amount  that  would  rectify  the  disparity  in 
value  between  the  benefits  of  the  current  Players  and  the  benefits  of  the  retired 
Players.  Under  ERISA,  the  fiduciaries  are  to  ‘‘minimize  the  risk  of  large  losses  un-
less under the circumstances, it is clearly prudent not to do so.’’ ERISA, Sec. 404(C). 
This  specific  language  appears  in  the  Bert  Bell  Plan  at  Sec.  8.20.  It  also  appears 
in  the  Bert  Bell/Pete  Rozelle  Plan.  Somewhere  between  1998  and  September  2005, 
however,  the  Groom  Law  Group  changed  the  language  of  the  Plan.  This  language 
now appears under Duty and Care, Sec. 8.2 of the Plan. The new plan states: 

Except  that  the  retirement  board  and  the  DICC  will  follow  the  terms  of  the 
Plan. 

This  changed  the  ERISA  language  from  Sec.  404  of  the  ERISA  code—a  change, 

in itself, which violates ERISA Law. 

By  law,  you  cannot  change  the  terms  of  a  Plan  that  contains  ERISA  guidelines. 
Yet that is exactly what the NFLPA did at Groom’s suggestion. Groom claims that, 
‘‘they (Groom), do not make decisions regarding benefits,’’ yet Doctor Alfred J. Tria, 
the  first  neutral  Medical  Advisory  Physician  (MAP),  states  in  the  Public  Record, 
that  Groom  chastised  him  for  qualifying  a  Player  under  Line  of  Duty.  In  1989,  I 
was the first Player qualified by Dr. Tria under Line of Duty Disability. I was sent 
to Dr. Tria due to a deadlock of the retirement board pursuant to the Plan’s terms. 
The Owner-Members rejected the qualification even though it was final and binding 
on the retirement board, which violated the Plan’s Terms. 

I will focus on several issues of material fact that are not in dispute in the appli-
cable language of the Plan’s Terms. These specific facts contradict what is presented 
in the NFLPA White Paper on behalf of both collective bargaining units. 

On page 5, under ‘‘Disability Benefits Overview,’’ the White Paper states: 

Point 1: The award process investigates whether a Player is able to work. (Em-
phasis added). 

The  question  would  be  why  the  ‘‘extent  of  the  disability’’  is  not  considered  first. 
ERISA states that the retirement board must carry out its duties in a manner that 
considers  the  Player’s  interest  first,  with  the  secondary  inquiry  being  ‘‘what  caused 
the Player’s disability?’’ 

But  this  clear  ERISA  requirement  again  is  construed  as  an  ‘‘opinion’’  and  the  re-
tirement  board  reserves  the  right  to  disregard  any  medical  finding  that  does  not 
support  the  agenda  of  the  retirement  board  trustees  who,  as  representatives  of  the 
collective bargaining unit, not surprisingly have established a record of disqualifying 
Players seeking any type of disability unless that Player is a ‘‘friend of the NFLPA.’’ 

The Doug Betters Case is illustrative of this point. 
Doug  Betters  was  paralyzed  in  an  accident  while  skiing  in  1998.  Doug,  retired 
from  the  NFL  in  1988  because  of  back  and  neck  injuries.  When  Doug  applied  for 
disability,  he  was  denied  because  the  retirement  board  trustees,  with  no  expertise 
in  the  medical  field  and  no  expertise  in  spinal  chord  injuries,  declared  that  Doug 
Betters  did  not  get  hurt  while  playing  football:  ‘‘he  got  hurt  skiing’’.  An  unlicensed 
opinion  thus  became  a  denial  of  disability  to  a  classified  quadriplegic  with  no  im-
provement and continued degeneration. 

Doug is paralyzed and has been in a wheelchair since 1998. He receives a pension 
equal  to  his  retirement.  Doug  is  entitled  to  the  active  non-football  disability.  Doug 
receives  something  called  an  ‘‘inactive’’  disability  benefit,  which  is  equal  to  his  re-
tirement  benefit.  They  call  it  a  disability  benefit,  but  his  check  comes  from  the  re-
tirement  fund.  Inactive  disability  is  a  fictional  term-of-convenience  used  to  cat-
egorize  Players  in  a  manner  so  that  they  cannot  obtain  a  class  of  benefits  that  pay 
more. (If you have an ‘‘inactive’’ driver’s license can you drive?) 

In  1989,  the  retirement  board  said,  ‘‘Traditionally,  we  use  Darryl  Stingley  as  a 

test case for the total and permanent disability.’’ 

Tom  Condon  assured  Doug  that  ‘‘there  was  nothing  to  worry  about!’’  The  retire-
ment board vote was 6 to 0, unanimous against a paralyzed Player. In a retirement 
board quarterly meeting, Bill Bidwell, the owner of the Arizona Cardinals, theorized 
that  paralyzed  players  in  wheel  chairs  could  ‘‘sell  pencils  on  the  street  corner’’—a 
form  of  gainful  employment  that  would  presumably  preclude  the  disbursement  of 
disability benefits. 

The third category of analysis is ‘‘When the disability began.’’ This issue is at the 
heart  of  the  Mike  Webster  case,  in  which  the  Court  declared  that  it  was  an  ‘‘abuse 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

88 

of discretion’’ by the retirement board to refuse to assign Webster the proper ‘‘effec-
tive date’’ on which the disability began. 

This,  too,  is  an  area  of  contention,  having  roots  as  far  back  as  1984,  documented 

in explicit detail revealed in the minutes of the Retirement Board meetings. 

Under the Bert Bell Plan, the language was clear that disability began according 
to the physician’s report, which asked the question of the MAP ‘‘Date of Disability?’’ 
(The answer was to be determined by the Doctor.) 

That  question  has  appeared  for  the  last  30  years  on  the  form  to  be  filled  out  by 
the  MAP.  As  stated  by  the  White  Paper,  the  MAP’s  decision  was  final  and  binding 
on the retirement board. 

This  became  a  problem  for  the  collective  bargaining  units  because  it  meant  that 
a Player could collect a payment that was retroactive back to the date of disability, 
which  meant  that  a  Player’s  accrued  disability  benefit  could  pay  as  much  as  15 
years in retroactive payments. 

The  Groom  Law  Group  removed  the  ‘‘date  of  disability’’  space  from  the  Doctor’s 
report  form.  This  gives  the  retirement  board  the  ‘‘contrived  discretion’’  to  construe 
the ‘‘effective date’’ to be any date they choose, as opposed to correctly using the Phy-
sician’s  date  of  disability  on  the  physician’s  form.  All  this  was  done  to  control  the 
amount  of  the  retroactive  portion  of  the  disability  benefit,  which  the  Trustees  were 
obligated to pay in full. 

I sent a letter to Commissioner Roger Goodell detailing the specific facts and evi-
dence that The Groom Law Group violated Sec. 302 of the ERISA code, as described 
in my complaint sent to the Commissioner on June 4th, 2007 titled ‘‘Fiduciary Mis-
conduct.’’ 

For the record, the Commissioner has stated the following: We will continue to do 

what we have always done, rely on the facts. 

However, in this particular case the Commissioner has ignored ‘‘the facts’’ and has 
refused to act under the Integrity Clause of the NFL Bylaws. This clause allows the 
Commissioner to rectify almost any situation concerning the NFL. 

To  date,  however,  he  has  refused  to  investigate  any  wrongdoing  by  the  Manage-

ment, the people who put him in that office as Commissioner of the NFL. 

The next issue is on page 10, titled: ‘‘Disability application and award procedure’’. 
I  have  addressed  this  issue  in  my  response  to  Doug  Ell’s  written  testimony  on 
June  26,  2007,  however,  I  will  make  an  additional  comment  concerning  the  ‘‘truth’’ 
and  regarding  the  ‘‘facts’’  surrounding  the  ‘‘neutral  physician’’.  In  the  White  Paper 
the author repeatedly declares the importance of the neutral physician, yet on page 
15,  bottom  paragraph,  Mr.  Ell  describes  to  a  Federal  investigator  ‘‘exactly’’  what  is 
the  real  role  of  the  neutral  physician,  Mr.  Ell  contradicted  his  own  words  in  the 
White  Paper  regarding  the  responsibilities  of  the  neutral  physician.  Mr.  Ell  states: 
Neutral  physicians  have  no  authority  and  are  simply  instructed  to  report  their 
best medical findings. 

Unless,  as  in  the  case  of  Don  Bessilieu,  the  retirement  board  uses  the  ‘‘opinion’’ 
and  medical  findings  of  the  neutral  physician  to  disqualify  the  Player,  then  the 
‘‘neutral  physician’s’’  opinion  is  used  by  the  disability  claims  committee  member 
(one  person)  to  disqualify  the  Player  who  was  already  receiving  disability  benefits 
for 5 years, as was the case with Don Bessilieu. 

I can say that the description of the responsibilities declared by the author of the 
White  Paper  regarding  the  neutral  physician  is  false.  Any  evidence  to  support  the 
contention  in  the  White  Paper  would  also  be  false.  Mr.  ElI  told  a  Department  of 
Labor  investigator  exactly  the  opposite  of  what  appears  in  the  White  Paper.  One 
of the two statements by Mr. Ell is a false statement made to a government investi-
gator, a criminal violation. 
Page 11, ‘‘Appeal Rights’’. 
This  section  is  a  perfect  example  of  the  ‘‘deception’’  described  in  the  White  Paper 

as ‘‘Appeal Rights’’. 

First  of  all,  appeal  rights  depend  on  various  situations  concerning  exactly  what 
is  being  appealed  and  who  is  appealing.  One  case  in  point  is  when  a  Player  is  de-
nied by the DICC and it is the Player’s initial disability claim, the retirement board 
must  follow  the  decisions  made  by  the  DICC,  which  amounts  to  a  circle,  with  no 
possible way of overcoming the denial, because Groom has changed the language of 
the Plan from Sec. 8.2 which says: 

Except that the retirement board will follow the decisions made by the Disability 
Initial Claims Committee. 

Prior  to  this  change,  for  over  45  years,  Sec.  8  of  the  Bert  Bell  Plan  and  the  Bert 

Bell/Pete Rozelle Plan both stated: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

89 

The retirement board will have the power to decide claims (except that the retire-
ment  board  will  follow  the  decision  made  by  the  Medical  Advisory  Physician. 
[whose decision will be final and binding on the retirement board]). 

The  retirement  board  now  uses  whatever  language  ‘‘fits’’  the  denial.  This  section 
of  the  Plan’s  Terms  was  changed  in  order  to  accommodate  the  retirement  board’s 
ability  to  have  what  would  appear  to  be  ‘‘absolute  discretion’’ 1 and  authority  over 
the outcome of disability determinations. 

In the White Paper under ‘‘appeal rights’’ the author declares that the retirement 
board  gives  no  deference  to  the  decisions  made  by  the  DICC,  a  patently  false  state-
ment.  The  evidence  points  to  the  Groom  Law  Group  as  the  principal  architect  and 
administrator  of  the  attempt  to  control  the  disability  process  on  behalf  of  the  two 
collective bargaining units. 

The  specific  language  in  the  Plan’s  Terms  under  Sec.  8.2  of  the  new  Plan  docu-
ment makes that declaration false and the premise declared in the White Paper fic-
tion.  In  fact,  the  majority  of  the  three  topics  I  have  reviewed  in  this  ‘‘Black  Paper’’ 
all contain ‘‘fiction’’ in their premises and falsehood in their factual content. 

I have, in the details contained in my 26-page response to Doug Ell’s written testi-
mony on June 26, and the White Paper written for the September 18, 2007 hearing 
provided  a  significant  amount  of  facts  and  evidence  to  support  the  contention  that 
misconduct has occurred at the hands of the authors of the White Paper. 

There are numerous misstatements of fact that I have not addressed, all of which 

point to the same conclusion . . . ‘‘Fraud’’ is defined by Webster as: 

A.  Deceit,  trickery,  intentional  perversion  of  the  truth  in  order  to  induce  an-
other to part with something of value or to surrender a legal right. 
B. An act of deceiving or misrepresenting: A trick. One who is not what he pre-
tends  to  be.  An  imposter.  One  who  defrauds.  Cheat.  One  that  is  not  what  it 
seems to be or is represented to be. 
C. Synonym . . . Deception. 

I  have  presented  some  of  the  ABCs  of  the  White  Paper,  which  may  well  be  mis-

Sooner  or  later  the  truth  about  the  ‘‘Truth  Squad’’  will  become  clear  in  the  form 

of facts vs. fictions, which will spell themselves out in black and white. 

Submitted to the Members of the Committee on Commerce, Science and Transpor-
tation  of  the  U.S.  Senate  to  aid  in  their  oversight  of  this  issue,  and  to  the  NFLPA 
for its analysis and response. 

P.S. I am waiting for your response. 

leading and fraudulent in its design. 

contained in the Black Paper. 

I welcome any effort by the NFLPA or the NFLMC to refute any of the statements 

JOINT RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY 

HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV TO THE NATIONAL FOOTBALL LEAGUE (NFL) AND 

THE NATIONAL FOOTBALL LEAGUE PLAYERS ASSOCIATION (NFLPA) 

Question 1. Identify each of the 6 members of the Retirement Board (the ‘‘Board’’), 
the person(s) who selected each member to serve on the Board, and the reason each 
member was chosen for such service. 

Answer. The Retirement Board is composed of seven members. Three voting mem-
bers  are  appointed  by  the  NFL  Players  Association  (‘‘NFLPA’’)  and  three  voting 
members are appointed by the NFL Management Council (‘‘NFLMC’’). The Commis-
sioner of the NFL is an ex-officio, non-voting member. The Commissioner’s designee, 
NFLMC Executive Vice President Harold Henderson, presides at all meetings of the 
Retirement Board. 

The Retirement Board members appointed by the NFLMC are: 

William Bidwill, Owner, Arizona Cardinals, appointed by Terry Bledsoe, former 
NFLMC executive. 
Clark Hunt, Owner, Kansas City Chiefs, appointed by Harold Henderson, Exec-
utive Vice President. 

1 This  specific  language  was  changed  under  the  Bert  Bell  Plan  at  Sec.  8.4:  ‘‘The  Retirement 
Board  will  have  the  broadest  discretion  permitted  by  the  Act.’’  This  is  the  protective  language 
of  ERISA.  This  means,  where  there  is  ‘‘no  permission  there  is  no  discretion.’’  In  1995  Groom 
changed the Plan’s Terms to exclude the specific language that restricted the retirement board’s 
ability to act ‘‘outside’’ the Plan’s Terms. In 1995 they removed ERISA governing terms and re-
placed them with their own made up authority. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

90 

Dick Cass, President, Baltimore Ravens, appointed by Harold Henderson, Exec-
utive Vice President. 

During the last 5 years, Taylor Smith, Owner, Atlanta Falcons, and Eddie Jones, 
President,  Miami  Dolphins,  also  served  on  the  Retirement  Board.  Each  was  ap-
pointed by Harold Henderson. 

The  Retirement  Board  members  appointed  by  Gene  Upshaw  on  behalf  of  the 

NFLPA are three retired veteran NFL players: 

Tom Condon, who played 12 years in the NFL from 1974–1985; 
Jeff Van Note, who played 17 years in the NFL from 1970–1986; and 
David Duerson, who played 11 years in the NFL from 1983–1993. 

Tom Condon and Jeff Van Note were appointed prior to 2002. Dave Duerson was 
appointed in 2006. Len Teeuws, deceased, preceded Mr. Duerson on the Retirement 
Board. 

The  NFLMC  and  NFLPA  appointments  are  made  based  on  ability,  interest  in, 
and  familiarity  with  employee  benefit  plans,  the  investment  process,  collective  bar-
gaining  history,  and/or  player  welfare,  and  their  knowledge  of  the  types  of  injuries 
that NFL Players may incur. In addition, the members agree to carry out the terms 
of the plan and to accept personal fiduciary liability. 

The  NFLPA  and  the  NFLMC  may  name  a  proxy  for  each  of  the  members  they 

have appointed, for any meeting for which that member is unavailable. 

Question 2. Identify each member of the Disability Initial Claims Committee (the 
‘‘DICC’’),  the  person(s)  who  selected  each  member  to  serve  on  the  Committee,  and 
the reason each member was chosen for such service. 

Answer.  The  Disability  Initial  Claims  Committee  (‘‘DICC’’)  consists  of  two  mem-
bers—one appointed by the NFLPA and one appointed by the NFLMC. The NFLPA 
appointed  Chris  Smith  and  the  NFLMC  appointed  Mary-ann  Fleming.  Mary-ann 
Fleming is an employee of the NFLMC, Manager of Player Benefits, and was chosen 
for  her  familiarity  with  NFL  players  and  benefits  after  agreeing  to  carry  out  the 
terms  of  the  plan.  Harold  Henderson  and  Director  of  Player  Benefits  Valerie  Cross 
selected Ms. Fleming for the NFLMC. Chris Smith is Assistant Director of Benefits 
at the NFLPA. Ms. Smith was chosen for her familiarity with NFL players and ben-
efits  and  her  knowledge  of  the  types  of  injuries  that  NFL  Players  may  incur,  after 
agreeing  to  carry  out  the  terms  of  the  plan.  Executive  Director  Gene  Upshaw  and 
Director of Benefits Michele Yaras-Davis selected her for the NFLPA. 

Both  Chris  Smith  and  Mary-ann  Fleming  have  served  on  the  DICC  since  it  was 

created, pursuant to regulations of the Department of Labor, in 2002. 

Board. 

Question  3.  Explain  the  process  for  choosing  members  of  both  the  DICC  and  the 

Answer.  The  Bert  Bell/Pete  Rozelle  NFL  Player  Retirement  Plan  designates  the 
NFLPA and the NFLMC as having the authority to appoint and to remove the vot-
ing  members  to  the  Retirement  Board  and  to  the  DICC.  The  Executive  Vice  Presi-
dent  who  leads  the  NFLMC  exercises  this  authority  with  respect  to  NFLMC  ap-
pointments.  The  Executive  Director  of  the  NFLPA  exercises  this  authority  with  re-
spect to NFLPA appointments. 

Question 4. State the total amount paid for disability pensions from both the Bert 
Bell/Pete  Rozelle  Plan  and  the  NFL  Supplemental  Disability  Plan  (together,  the 
‘‘Plans’’). 

Answer.  Below  are  the  total  amounts  of  disability  benefits  paid  by  the  Bert  Bell/ 
Pete Rozelle NFL Player Retirement Plan and NFL Player Supplemental Disability 
Plan for the full calendar years 2002 through 2006 and for 2007 through November, 
based  on  records  provided  by  the  Player  Benefits  Office.  These  amounts  may  differ 
from the amounts reported for Plan Years (April 1 to March 31). 

Year 

Amount 

2002 
2003 
2004 
2005 
2006 
2007 (through November) 

Total 

$14,856,632 
15,882,616 
16,934,525 
18,237,320 
20,266,009 
19,981,483 

$106,158,585 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

91 

The  figures  above  include  all  payments  to  players  deemed  to  be  totally  and  per-
manently disabled, including payments to these players after they attain normal re-
tirement age, and payments for line-of-duty disability benefits. 

Question  5.  State  the  total  number  of  players  receiving  disability  payments,  bro-
ken  down  by  category  (i.e.,  Active  Football,  Football  Degenerative,  Line  of  Duty, 
etc.). 

Answer. The following table, based on records provided by the Player Benefits Of-
fice,  shows  the  average  number  of  former  players  paid  for  each  kind  of  disability 
benefit  per  month  for  each  calendar  year  2002  through  2006  and  for  2007  through 
November 2007. 

Year 

Line of duty 

Active 
football 

Active non-

football 

Football 

degenerative 

Inactive 

Retirement 
continuation 

2002 
2003 
2004 
2005 
2006 
2007 
(through 
11/07) 

93 
96 
109 
122 
144 

158 

5 
6 
5 
5 
5 

5 

12 
11 
10 
10 
9 

9 

65 
71 
75 
81 
85 

87 

50 
45 
46 
47 
46 

46 

44 
49 
57 
63 
71 

76 

Question  6.  Please  provide  a  breakdown  of  these  categories  into  types  of  injury 

(i.e, Concussion, Spinal injury, Joint Replacement, etc.). 

Answer.  Awards  of  line-of-duty  disability  benefits  for  orthopedic  impairments  are 
based upon a qualifying percentage impairment of one or more of the cervical spine, 
lower extremity, lumbar spine, thoracic spine, upper extremity or whole body, using 
a  system  developed  by  the  American  Medical  Association.  Awards  of  total  and  per-
manent (T&P) disability benefits are based on whether a player is able to work, tak-
ing  into  account  all  facts  and  circumstances.  The  Player  Benefits  Office  automated 
record system records the decisions of the DICC and the Retirement Board, but not 
the underlying types of injury or impairment. 

Question  7.  State  the  process  for  choosing  doctors  or  other  healthcare  providers 
who  are  eligible  to  administer  medical  examinations  to  claimants  for  consideration 
by  the  DICC  or  the  Board.  Identify  any  qualifications  which  are  considered  or  re-
quired for such service. 

Answer.  Neutral  physicians  are  selected  by  the  Retirement  Board.  The  Retire-
ment  Board  is  advised  by  two  prominent  orthopedic  surgeons,  who  are  not  neutral 
physicians,  and  who  recommend  Board-certified  orthopedists  of  exceptional  quality 
who have substantial experience with the orthopedic problems of athletes. If a non- 
orthopedic  neutral  physician  is  needed  in  a  particular  location,  then,  pursuant  to  a 
procedure set up by the Retirement Board, the nearest orthopedic neutral physician 
is  asked  to  recommend  a  highly  qualified  physician  with  the  needed  medical  spe-
cialty in that area. 

Medical Advisory Physicians are selected by mutual agreement of the NFLPA and 
the  NFLMC,  pursuant  to  section  11.4(a)  of  the  Retirement  Plan.  Medical  Advisory 
Physicians are Board-certified orthopedists who previously were Plan neutral physi-
cians, or are physicians of exceptional quality in other specialties. 

Question  8.  State  the  process  for  removing  doctors  or  other  healthcare  providers 
from  the  list  of  those  eligible  to  administer  medical  examinations  to  claimants  for 
consideration  by  the  DICC  or  the  Board.  [Next  question  is  not  limited  to  5  years] 
Identify every doctor/health care provider who has been removed from that list, and 
the reason(s) for such removal. 

Answer.  A  neutral  physician  can  be  removed  at  any  time  by  the  Retirement 
Board.  A  Medical  Advisory  Physician  can  be  removed  at  any  time  jointly  by  the 
NFLPA  and  NFLMC,  or  30  days  after  the  NFLPA  or  NFLMC  gives  written  notice 
of  the  Medical  Advisory  Physician’s  removal  to  the  other  party,  the  Medical  Advi-
sory Physician, and the Retirement Board. 

The  automated  record  system  of  the  Player  Benefits  Office  does  not  record  the 
reason  why  a  particular  neutral  physician  is  no  longer  being  used.  The  reasons  in-
clude: 

• The physician has died or retired, 
• The physician has voluntarily elected not to be active, 
• A physician was needed on occasion in a specific location and was used so that 

a player would not have to travel, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

92 

ical condition of a player, and 

• A physician was needed on occasion to evaluate a specific type of injury or med-
• The physician did not perform the requested tasks in a timely manner. 
Exhibit  A*  is  a  list  of  neutral  physicians  furnished  by  the  Plan  Office  who  have 
performed  evaluations  for  the  Retirement  Board  since  1985  but  who  are  not  cur-
rently performing evaluations for the plan. 

*(All exhibits mentioned are retained in Committee files.) 
Question  9.  Identify  every  change  in  or  amendment  to  the  Plan  Document,  or  in 
the rules or procedures governing disability claims, or in the benefits offered by the 
Plans  in  the  past  3  years  (e.g.,  use  of  a  Social  Security  standard,  the  ‘‘88  Plan’’). 
State  the  reason  for  each  such  change.  Produce  a  current  copy  of  the  Plan  Docu-
ment,  and  any  rules,  regulations,  or  guidelines  which  are  used  to  administer  the 
Plan Document. 

Answer. Exhibit B contains the Retirement Plan amendments adopted from 2004 
to  the  present,  and  Exhibit  C  contains  the  current  Retirement  Plan  Document  and 
a  listing  of  all  amendments  to  that  document.  Exhibits  D  and  E  contain  the  NFL 
Player  Supplemental  Disability  Plan  and  the  88  Plan,  respectively,  and  all  amend-
ments to those plans from 2004 to the present. 

Question 10. State the mean and median time between initial filing of an applica-
tion  for  disability  benefits,  and  (a)  decision  by  the  DICC,  as  well  as  (b)  decision  on 
appeal by the Board. 

Answer.  The  Player  Benefits  Office  automated  record  system  does  not  maintain 
the  information  needed  to  calculate  the  mean  and  median  time  taken  by  the  DICC 
to  make  an  initial  decision  or  the  Retirement  Board  to  decide  an  appeal.  In  par-
ticular,  the  time  taken  for  the  applicant  to  respond,  and  to  provide  any  additional 
information or to be examined, is not tracked. 

Question 11. [Next question is not limited to 5 years] Identify every case in which 
the  Board  or  the  DICC  has  requested  more  than  one  medical  examination  of  a 
claimant  by  a  Plans-selected  doctor  in  the  same  specialty,  and  state  the  reason  for 
each such request. 

Answer. Exhibit F lists the cases for which the Retirement Board referred an ap-
plicant to a second medical examiner, based on records provided by the Player Bene-
fits Office. This examiner is referred to as the ‘‘Medical Advisory Physician’’ (MAP). 
Such  referrals  are  generally  made  when  there  is  uncertainty  or  ambiguity  in  the 
medical records presented to the Retirement Board. The referral is made at the op-
tion of three or more Retirement Board members. The specific reason for each refer-
ral is not in the automated record system of the Player Benefits Office. 

In  addition,  in  rare  cases,  a  player  has  been  referred  to  an  examining  physician 
in  the  same  specialty,  below  the  MAP  level,  when  the  initial  examination  was  un-
clear  or  inadequate  for  any  reason.  The  number  of  times  this  has  occurred  is  not 
available on the Player Benefits Office system. 

Finally,  in  2002,  the  Disability  Initial  Claims  Committee  selected  14  applicants 
for  line-of-duty  disability  benefits  to  be  reexamined.  The  purpose  of  these  reexam-
inations was to measure their impairments using a rating system developed by the 
American Medical Association. 

Question 12. Identify any training or education provided to members of the DICC 
or  the  Board  in  order  to  perform  their  duties.  Provide  a  copy  of  any  documents 
which  are  used  by  them  to  administer  the  Plans  or  to  decide  claims  or  appeals, 
other than the case files submitted by individual claimants. 

Answer.  As  indicated  in  the  answers  to  questions  1  and  2,  the  members  of  the 
DICC and the Retirement Board were selected based on their ability and their inter-
est in employee benefit plans, among other factors. The members of the DICC have 
attended  numerous  seminars  on  employee  benefit  issues.  The  members  of  the  Re-
tirement  Board  are  extensively  briefed  for  2  days  at  each  quarterly  meeting.  Other 
meetings on special topics and conference calls occur as needed throughout the year. 
In addition to the plan documents provided in response to question 9, the DICC and 
the  Retirement  Board  use  a  variety  of  forms  to  help  them  administer  the  Plans. 
These forms are in Exhibit G. 

Question 13. Explain the role of Sarah Gaunt in the DICC and the Board’s consid-

eration of individual claims and appeals. 

Answer.  Sarah  Gaunt  is  Plan  Director  of  the  Bert  Bell/Pete  Rozelle  NFL  Player 
Retirement  Plan.  In  this  capacity,  she  performs  ministerial  functions  including 
maintaining records and presenting documents, such as disability applications, phy-
sician  reports,  and  other  documents,  to  the  DICC  and  Retirement  Board.  She  has 
no  discretionary  authority  or  discretionary  responsibility  in  the  administration  of 
the Plan, including the determination of disability benefits or the evaluation of med-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

ical  reports,  nor  any  discretionary  control  with  respect  to  the  management  of  the 
Plan or its assets. 

93 

Question 14. [Next question is not limited to 5 years] Explain the role of the Med-
ical Advisory Physician in the decision of individual claims or appeals. Identify each 
case  in  which  the  Medical  Advisory  Physician  was  asked  to  address  a  claim  or  ap-
peal, and the role played by the Physician in each case. 

Answer.  Section  8.3(a)  of  the  Retirement  Plan,  which  is  reproduced  below,  de-

scribes the role of the Medical Advisory Physician: 

‘‘If the voting members of the Retirement Board are deadlocked with respect to 
a  decision  as  to  (1)  whether  a  claimant  medically  is  substantially  prevented 
from or substantially unable to engage in any occupation or employment for re-
muneration or profit within the meaning of Section 5.2, or (2) whether an appli-
cant  meets  the  requisite  percentage  disability  requirements  to  be  eligible  for 
line-of-duty  disability  benefits,  the  Retirement  Board  may  by  an  affirmative 
vote of three voting members submit such disputes to a Medical Advisory Physi-
cian for a final and binding determination regarding such medical issues.’’ 

Exhibit  F  contains  the  requested  list  of  cases,  based  on  records  provided  by  the 

Player Benefits Office. 

Question  15.  With  respect  to  the  summary  table  provided  at  p.  16  of  the  6/26/07 
written testimony of Douglas Ell before the House Committee on the Judiciary Sub-
committee on Commercial and Administrative Law, please state the following: 

a. In the line identified as ‘‘Approved at initial stage,’’ please state whether this 
includes  claims  which  were  approved  for  any  benefits  of  any  kind,  or  whether 
it  includes  only  claims  in  which  the  entire  benefit  sought  (i.e.,  Active  Football) 
was  approved.  Also  state  whether  it  includes  claims  in  which  the  DICC  or  the 
Board  awarded  a  retroactive  date  later  than  was  sought  by  the  claimant.  For 
example,  if  a  claimant  sought  a  retroactive  date  of  11/02,  and  was  awarded  a 
date of 11/04, was that counted as an approval or a denial? 
b. In the line identified as ‘‘Approved on appeal,’’ please provide the same infor-
mation.  Does  this  include  cases  in  which  the  appeal  resulted  in  any  change  in 
the  benefits  awarded  or  the  retroactive  date,  or  does  it  include  only  claims  in 
which  the  claimant  was  awarded  both  the  benefits  and  the  retroactive  date  re-
quested? 

Answer.  The  table  provided  at  page  16  of  the  June  26,  2007  written  testimony 
of  Douglas  Ell  lists  claims  and  appeals  as  ‘‘approved’’  if  disability  benefits  of  any 
kind  were  awarded  at  that  level.  The  table  does  not  capture  the  complexities  of  ef-
fective  dates  or  categorization.  At  each  level,  a  claim  is  listed  as  ‘‘approved’’  if  dis-
ability  benefits  of  any  kind  were  awarded  at  that  level,  whether  or  not  the  partici-
pant was awarded all the benefits for which he applied, and whether or not a retro-
active  award  was  made.  Cases  listed  on  appeal  are  cases  where  no  benefit  was 
awarded at the initial level. 

Question 16. Is it true that you plan to use Social Security standards for disability 

approval? And what does that mean? 

Answer.  The  NFLMC  and  the  NFLPA  have  agreed  to  amend  the  Bert  Bell/Pete 
Rozelle  NFL  Player  Retirement  Plan  such  that  an  eligible  player  who  is  receiving 
Federal Social Security disability benefits will be considered to have met the Retire-
ment  Plan’s  standards  for  total  and  permanent  disability.  Such  a  player  will  not, 
during  the  period  he  is  receiving  Social  Security  disability  benefits,  be  required  to 
further  demonstrate  that  he  is  totally  and  permanently  disabled.  The  Retirement 
Board  will  determine  the  level  of  total  and  permanent  disability  benefit  to  which 
he is entitled. 

Question 17. What is the ‘‘four point’’ plan that will try to simplify approval proc-

ess for disability benefits? 

Answer.  We  do  not  know  to  what  ‘‘four  point’’  plan  you  refer.  The  NFLPA  and 
the NFLMC are, however, taking a number of steps in cooperation with the Retire-
ment  Board  and  the  DICC  in  order  to  streamline  our  process  as  much  as  possible 
under  the  Federal  rules  protecting  plan  participants.  The  NFL  has  hired  inde-
pendent  benefit  consultants  and  independent  counsel  to  identify  best  practices  that 
could be incorporated into the administration of the plans. In addition, as described 
in the answer to question 16, the Plans will now recognize the Federal Social Secu-
rity  determination  of  disability  for  eligible  players.  The  bargaining  parties  have 
asked the DICC and the Retirement Board if they could meet more often, and more 
frequent meetings should take place soon. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

94 

Question  18.  What  is  the  ‘‘Coalition’’  planned  by  Mr.  Goodell  and  Mr.  Upshaw  in 
the July meeting with retired players ‘‘that will try to ease suffering among former 
players’’? What will it do? 

Answer. The ‘‘coalition’’ that we have planned has also been referred to as the ‘‘Al-

liance’’ and is described in the answers to questions 19 and 20 below. 

Question  19.  What  is  the  new  assistance  program  that  will  be  created  to  address 
several  critical  issues  drawing  from  the  league,  union  and  ‘‘charities  affiliated  with 
pro football’’ called the ‘‘Alliance’’? 

Answer. The NFL, the NFLPA, the Pro Football Hall of Fame and the NFL Alum-
ni, Inc. have come together to form an alliance to help former NFL players in need. 
We have established a new charitable foundation called the NFL Player Care Foun-
dation. The Foundation has been established ‘‘to provide relief to the disadvantaged 
and distressed, with preference to former players in the NFL, including, but not lim-
ited to, the support, promotion or funding of medical and other healthcare or assist-
ance and improvement of the qualify of life.’’ 

The Foundation has a number of projects it will immediately pursue. The Founda-
tion  will  provide,  to  former  players  in  need,  substantial  financial  assistance  for  the 
costs  associated  with  the  new  NFL  Player  Joint  Replacement  Benefit  Plan,  a  plan 
for  retired  NFL  players  who  need  joint  replacements,  and  will  also  provide  nec-
essary rehabilitation care after joint replacement surgery. The Foundation also pro-
vides  free  cardiovascular  screening  and  referral  services  for  former  players,  and  is 
also exploring long term care and other assistance for former players. 

Question  20.  How  does  the  Coalition  plan  to  continue  studying  ways  to  improve 

benefits for the pioneers of the NFL? 

Answer. The NFLMC and the NFLPA continually monitor, through many sources 
both  personal  and  institutional,  such  as  the  NFL  Alumni,  the  Pro  Football  Hall  of 
Fame, and the NFL Clubs, all of which employ former NFL players, the status and 
condition of former players, both ‘‘football-related’’ and the normal process of aging. 
Each  and  every  CBA  between  the  NFLPA  and  the  NFLMC  has  addressed  and  pro-
vided significant additional past service benefits for former players, mostly from im-
provements  to  the  pension  plan.  We  are  interested  not  only  in  the  condition  of 
former  players  but  in  continually  improving  the  care  and  environment  for  current 
players. The Alliance and Player Care Foundation are also exploring long term care 
and  other  assistance  for  former  players  and  we  expect  to  announce  initiatives  in 
these areas in the near future. 

Question  21.  In  a  Sept.  13  RTT  News  story  about  the  likely  life-altering  spinal 
injury received by Buffalo Bills tight end Kevin Everett in a game a week ago says 
he will receive compensation from the National Football League Players Association, 
an  organization  that  has  come  under  fire  recently  from  retired  football  players.  Is 
it the NFLPA who determines benefits under the current plan? 

Answer. The NFLPA does not decide claims for benefits. In accordance with regu-
lations of the Department of Labor, initial claims for disability benefits are decided 
by  the  DICC,  whose  members  are  described  in  the  answer  to  question  2.  Appeals 
of  disability  claims  are  decided  by  the  Retirement  Board,  whose  members  are  de-
scribed  in  the  answer  to  question  1.  For  benefits  other  than  disability  benefits, 
please refer to the table contained in the answer to question 22. 

We understand that the reference to compensation in the news story refers to dis-
ability benefits under the Plan. In the event Mr. Everett applies for disability bene-
fits, the Disability Initial Claims Committee and Retirement Board will address that 
claim under its normal claims procedures. 

Mr.  Everett  is  receiving  his  entire  salary  and  all  medical  care  under  his  player 
contract  at  this  time,  and  will  be  eligible  for  other  collectively  bargained  benefits, 
including  pension,  disability  benefits,  401(k),  continuing  medical  benefits,  injury 
protection, a health reimbursement account and a severance benefit. 

Question  22.  Can  we  clear  up  which  sources  are  responsible  for  which  benefits? 
NFLPA?  Retirement  Plan?  Worker’s  Compensation?  New  benefits  in  the  2006  CBA 
imply that some of the benefits do not include the older retired players. Is that true? 
Answer.  The  collective  bargaining  agreement  (‘‘CBA’’)  between  the  NFLPA  and 
the  NFLMC  provides  retirement,  medical,  disability,  and  other  benefits  to  active 
and former players. The 2006 CBA included large increases in the benefits for older 
retired players; for example their pensions were increased by 25 percent. The bene-
fits provided to players, and which players are eligible for which benefits, are sum-
marized below. 

Since  1993,  the  NFLPA  and  the  NFLMC  have  agreed  four  times  in  bargaining 

to increase retirement and disability benefits. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

95 

Plan/Program 

Retirement Benefits (Retirement Plan) 
Death Benefits (Retirement Plan) 
Total and Permanent Disability Benefits 
(Retirement Plan) 
Line-of-Duty Disability 
Group Insurance 2 
Severance Pay 
Retiree Medical 
Savings Plan (401(k)Plan) 
Total and Permanent Disability Benefits 
(NFL Player Supplemental Disability Plan) 
Annuity Program 
88 Plan 
NFL Player Health Reimbursement Account Plan 
Cardiovascular Health Program 

Joint Replacement Surgery 

Assisted Living Program 

Workers’ Compensation 

Responsible entity 

Benefits players on 

or after 1 

Retirement Board  All NFL Players 
Retirement Board  All NFL Players 
Retirement Board  All NFL Players 

Retirement Board  All NFL Players 
NFLMC 
NFLMC 
NFLMC 
Savings Board 
Disability Board 

1970 Forward 
1982 Forward 
1993 Forward 
1993 Forward 
1993 Forward 

Annuity Board 
88 Board 
HRA Board 
NFLPA/NFL 
Alliance 
NFLPA/NFL 
Alliance 
NFLPA/NFL 
Alliance 
NFL Clubs 

1998 Forward 
All NFL Players 
2004 Forward 
All NFL Players 

Approved for 
Implementation 
Approved for 
Implementation 
All NFL Players 

1 This  column  indicates  which  NFL  players  are  eligible  for  these  benefits  by  year  of  play.  In  some  cases, 

vesting or other eligibility requirements may apply. 

2 For  active  players,  group  insurance  includes  life,  medical,  and  dental  benefits.  For  vested  former  players, 

group insurance includes medical and dental benefits for 5 years after their NFL careers end. 

COMBINED RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY 

HON. TRENT LOTT AND HON. DAVID VITTER TO ROGER GOODELL 

Question 1. In oral and written testimony before the Committee, several witnesses 
stated  that  conflicts  of  interest  impair  the  fair  operation  of  the  Retirement  Board, 
because those who appoint the Board will gain economically if the Board rejects dis-
ability claims. What is your response? 

Answer.  Simply  put,  there  is  no  evidence  to  support  their  claim.  The  Retirement 
Board  operates  in  accordance  with  Federal  law  as  defined  by  the  Taft-Hartley  and 
Employee  Retirement  Income  Security  Acts,  and  as  supplemented  by  regulations 
issued  by  the  Department  of  Labor  and  Internal  Revenue  Service.  Board  members 
and staff make decisions, as they are required to do, based on the terms of the Dis-
ability Plan and based on the medical evidence submitted by an applicant for bene-
fits  and  by  one  or  more  neutral  physicians.  In  cases  where  the  Retirement  Board 
is  unable  to  reach  a  decision  on  a  particular  application,  the  matter  is  referred  to 
a  third  neutral  physician  (called  the  ‘‘Medical  Advisory  Physician’’),  whose  medical 
decision is final and binding on the Board. 

The collective bargaining parties, the NFL and the NFLPA, are committed to de-
livering  the  negotiated  benefits,  have  budgeted  ample  funds  to  do  so,  and  have  ap-
pointed  Board  members  and  staff  who  are  directed  to  do  so.  No  member  of  the 
Board or staff has an economic incentive to do otherwise. 

Question 2. As to the inference of collusion between the appointing authorities and 
the Retirement Board, I note that dissatisfied former players can appeal Board deci-
sions to court. Although courts have been deferential to the decisions of the Retire-
ment  Board  trustees  and  the  trustees  of  other  plans,  would  collusion  between  the 
trustees and the appointing authority be a basis to overturn a Board decision? Has 
any  court  anywhere  found  evidence  of  such  collusion  or  a  similar  violation  of  the 
trustees’ fiduciary duties? 

Answer.  Collusion  between  the  trustees  and  the  appointing  authority  would  be  a 
basis for a court to overturn a Board decision. We submit that no court would defer 
to  a  decision  tainted  by  collusion.  That  said,  of  the  25  occasions  on  which  decisions 
of  the  Board  have  been  challenged  in  Federal  court,  the  Board’s  decision  has  been 
upheld in 24 of those cases. In no case—including the one case that did not uphold 
the Board’s decision—was there any finding or credible evidence of collusion, either 
among  the  Trustees  themselves,  or  between  the  Trustees  and  the  party  appointing 
them to the Retirement Board. 

Question 3. It has been suggested that since disability and retirement benefits are 
paid from the current players’ portion of league revenues, management should sup-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

96 

port  leaving  administration  of  the  Plan  strictly  to  the  players.  What  is  your  re-
sponse?  Further,  are  management-appointed  trustees  an  obstacle  to  the  fair  and 
proper administration of the Plan? 

Answer. While it is true that disability and retirement benefits are negotiated and 
treated  as  part  of  the  portion  of  NFL  revenues  assigned  to  players  generally,  that 
is  not  the  same  as  saying  that  these  are  the  current  players’  funds,  and  we  do  not 
agree  that  they  are.  Rather  the  bargaining  parties,  in  budgeting  a  sum  of  money 
for  benefits,  have  agreed  again  and  again  to  earmark  amounts  for  retired  players, 
thus  allowing  both  parties  to  participate  in  addressing  the  needs  of  former  players. 
Joint  management-labor  administration  of  benefit  plans  has  been  part  of  Federal 
law  for  six  decades,  and  is  well  recognized  as  being  consistent  with  and  in  further-
ance  of  Federal  labor  policy.  Far  from  being  an  obstacle  to  the  fair  administration 
of  benefit  plans,  such  joint  administration  serves  important  interests,  including  de-
veloping  support  from  management  for  those  benefit  plans,  and  ensuring  that 
unions—which,  after  all,  have  the  statutory  duty  of  representing  the  interests  of 
current workers who comprise the bargaining unit—do not ignore the needs of retir-
ees.  Further,  as  I  testified,  clubs  do  not  believe  that  the  needs  of  retired  players 
are simply a ‘‘problem’’ for the union to ‘‘solve.’’ Instead, the needs of retired players 
are  a  concern  of  both  the  clubs  and  the  union,  and  of  current  and  retired  players 
alike. 

Not  only  are  the  management-appointed  trustees  not  ‘‘an  obstacle  to  the  fair  and 
proper administration’’ of player benefits, the management trustees contribute valu-
able  business  and  investment  insight,  administrative  capacity  and  employer  per-
spective to the process. Moreover, the overwhelming number of decisions of the Re-
tirement Board are unanimous, reflecting the fact that both management and labor 
trustees  administer  the  plan  fairly,  and  in  accordance  with  its  terms  and  the  med-
ical evidence presented in each case. 

Question  4.  Several  witnesses  complained  that  the  Plan  and  its  operations  are 
opaque  and  difficult  to  understand.  Are  there  steps  you  have  taken  or  can  take  to 
simplify  plan  operations  and  make  them  more  transparent?  If  legal  requirements 
obstruct your ability to streamline the plan, do you recommend modifications to ad-
dress these obstructions? 

Answer. As I testified, we will continue our effort ‘‘to identify and implement any 
reasonable  procedural  changes  that  would  allow  disability  determinations  to  be 
made more quickly and reliably.’’ We have engaged independent counsel and benefit 
consultants to advise us in this regard, particularly with respect to identifying best 
practices  in  the  administration  of  disability  plans  outside  professional  sports.  We 
have attempted to ensure that the standards for making decisions are clear and un-
derstandable. The Retirement Board relies on standards developed by the American 
Medical  Association  for  deciding  partial  disability,  or  ‘‘Line  of  Duty’’  cases.  And  we 
recently  agreed  to  incorporate  the  medical  findings  of  the  Social  Security  Adminis-
tration  in  deciding  cases  of  total  and  permanent  disability.  Thus,  if  a  player  has 
been found to be totally and permanent disabled by Social Security, that finding will 
govern the player’s medical eligibility for NFL disability benefits. 

Much  of  the  complained-of  complexity  is  the  result  of  the  complex  Federal  statu-
tory  and  regulatory  scheme  that  governs  benefit  plans.  We  continue  to  believe,  as 
we advised the Department of Labor in 2002, that the regulations governing the op-
eration  of  the  Initial  Claims  Committee  have  not  served  the  process  well  and  have 
in fact delayed the adjudication of benefit claims. We submitted extensive comments 
to the Labor Department when this requirement was first proposed addressing this 
subject. 

Question 5. Several witnesses alleged that the Plan ‘‘doctor shops’’ in order to find 
physicians  who  will  deny  disability  claims  or  promote  conflict  in  medical  evidence 
that will create a basis to deny claims. What is your response? 

Answer.  This  claim  is  without  substance.  For  example,  the  orthopedic  doctors, 
who  evaluate  most  of  the  claims,  were  identified  by  two  acknowledged  leaders  in 
the  profession,  and  not  by  the  Plan  administrators,  the  parties,  or  the  trustees  on 
the Retirement Board. Doctors are chosen based on their skills and experience. The 
Plan  maintains,  particularly  for  orthopedic  issues,  a  national  network  of  neutral 
physicians. 

No  doctor  has  been  retained  because  of  any  record  of  hostility  toward  disability 
claims, and no doctor has been dismissed because of a history of decisions favorable 
to  disability  claimants.  The  neutral  physicians  are  obligated  to  follow  the  terms  of 
the  Plan,  and  to  apply  well-recognized  standards,  such  as  those  established  by  the 
American  Medical  Association  (in  cases  of  partial  disability  or  ‘‘Line  of  Duty’’ 
claims).  In  cases  involving  claims  of  total  and  permanent  disability,  the  Plan  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

97 

accept  medical  findings  of  the  Social  Security  Administration  and  will  not  require 
separate medical exams in those cases. 

In addition to the report(s) prepared by the neutral physician(s), the Plan will al-
ways  consider  medical  evidence  submitted  by  a  player’s  physician,  as  well  as  med-
ical  records  from  the  Player’s  club.  Players  are  free  to  submit  their  own  medical 
records to the neutral physicians who examine them. Because the Plan’s fiduciaries 
are obligated to make decisions based on medical evidence, players applying for dis-
ability  claims  have  an  opportunity  to  supplement  the  record  and  ensure  that  it  is 
complete and accurate. 

Question 6. The Committee notes that you and the NFL Players Association have 
formed  an  ‘‘Alliance’’  of  programs  designed  to  help  former  players  in  need.  Please 
describe the current status of the Alliance and how you see it evolving. 

Answer.  The  Alliance  is  made  up  of  the  NFL,  the  NFL  Players  Association,  NFL 
Charities,  the  NFL  Alumni  Association  and  the  Pro  Football  Hall  of  Fame.  We  are 
actively  seeking  the  support  of  other  interested  parties,  including  the  Gridiron 
Greats,  the  group  endorsed  by  Coach  Ditka.  The  five  parties  currently  part  of  the 
Alliance have each agreed both to initial funding commitments, as well as to further 
fundraising efforts to ensure that there will be adequate resources available to carry 
out its program. 

The  Alliance  is  currently  focusing  on  several  specific  medical  projects  to  benefit 
retired players. Those projects include joint replacement surgery and rehabilitation, 
which will be provided free or at reduced cost at leading medical centers throughout 
the  country.  A  second  initiative  involves  comprehensive  cardiovascular  health 
screening  and  education,  which  will  be  provided  at  no  cost  to  retired  players  under 
the oversight of the League’s Medical Committee on Cardiovascular Health. A third 
initiative  involves  identifying  a  network  of  assisted  living  facilities  throughout  the 
country  that  will  provide  favorable  access  to  retired  players  in  need  of  these  serv-
ices. 

Apart from these initiatives, the Alliance is exploring other targeted medical serv-
ices  and  ways  of  providing  various  forms  of  supplemental  health  insurance  to  re-
tired players and their families. 

Finally,  the  Alliance  is  committed  to  coordinating  all  of  the  different  services  of-
fered  by  its  various  members.  Doing  so  will  allow  us  more  effectively  to  commu-
nicate to retirees and their families and identify those in need. By pooling our finan-
cial  and  administrative  resources,  we  can  better  achieve  our  goal  of  providing  help 
to retired players in need in a timely, confidential, and dignified way. 

Question  7.  If  the  standard  for  awarding  Total  and  Permanent  disability  claims 
is  that  the  former  player  is  substantially  unable  to  work,  what  programs  do  you 
have  to  assist  former  players  who  do  not  meet  this  standard  but  who  suffer  from 
football-related injuries? 

Answer. The Disability Plan offers both total and permanent disability and partial 
disability benefits. Retired players who are able to work but nonetheless have a dis-
ability  may  seek  partial  disability  or  ‘‘Line  of  Duty’’  benefits.  (They  may  also  seek 
workers’ compensation benefits.) As I testified, we are considering further measures 
with respect to partial disability benefits, including expanding the time in which re-
tired  players  may  apply  for  Line  of  Duty  benefits  to  make  that  benefit  available  to 
a greater number of retired players. In addition, the Plan offers a total and perma-
nent  disability  benefit  based  on  football  degenerative  conditions,  so  if  a  player  be-
comes unable to work within 15 years of his retirement from the NFL, he may still 
apply for and receive a total and permanent disability benefit. 

Question  8.  Former  players  have  said  that  they  have  insufficient  input  into  the 
benefit  programs  that  affect  them.  Understanding  that  they  are  not  parties  to  the 
Collective  Bargaining  Agreement  because  they  are  not  members  of  the  bargaining 
unit,  will  you  establish  a  process  by  which  the  concerns  of  former  players  can  be 
expressed and heard? 

Answer.  As  the  question  recognizes,  Federal  labor  law  requires  the  clubs  to  bar-
gain  with  the  NFL  Players  Association  as  the  representative  of  current  employees. 
Nonetheless, the parties to the NFL–NFLPA Collective Bargaining Agreement have 
an  admirable  and  consistent  record  of  steadily  increasing  benefits  and  of  applying 
those increases on a retroactive basis. In the last ten years, the clubs have assumed 
additional retroactive benefit obligations of nearly $400 million. 

We  are  acutely  aware  of  the  concerns  of  retired  NFL  players.  We  have  consulted 
with  them  and  will  continue  to  do  so,  through  the  Alliance,  the  Hall  of  Fame,  the 
Alumni Association, the many former players who currently work in and around the 
NFL,  and  in  other  ways.  While  it  may  not  be  possible  to  satisfy  all  of  the  desires 
of  retired  players,  we  will  continue  to  work  to  ensure  that  we  have  a  complete  un-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

98 

derstanding  of  their  concerns.  We  are  committed  through  these  and  other  mecha-
nisms to listen to the concerns expressed by former players. 

Question  9.  What  are  the  current  and  accurate  figures  regarding  the  number  of 
players who have applied for disability benefits, and the number who have been ap-
proved? 

Answer.  The  information  set  forth  in  the  NFLPA  ‘‘White  Paper,’’  which  was  filed 
as part of the hearing record, shows that from July 1993, roughly 1,052 people have 
applied for disability benefits. Of that number, 428 applications have been approved, 
576  applications  have  been  denied,  and  the  remaining  48  applications  are  pending. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:26 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\76327.TXT JACKIE

